
Eze27:6 Of the oaks of Bashan have they made thine oars; the company of the Ashurites have made thy benches of ivory, brought out of the isles of Chittim.
Eze27:7 Fine linen with broidered work from Egypt was that which thou spreadest forth to be thy sail; blue and purple from the isles of Elishah was that which covered thee.
Eze27:8 The inhabitants of Zidon and Arvad were thy mariners: thy wise men, O Tyrus, that were in thee, were thy pilots.
Eze27:9 The ancients of Gebal and the wise men thereof were in thee thy calkers: all the ships of the sea with their mariners were in thee to occupy thy merchandise.
Eze27:10 They of Persia and of Lud and of Phut were in thine army, thy men of war: they hanged the shield and helmet in thee; they set forth thy comeliness.
Eze27:11 The men of Arvad with thine army were upon thy walls round about, and the Gammadims were in thy towers: they hanged their shields upon thy walls round about; they have made thy beauty perfect.
Eze27:12 Tarshish was thy merchant by reason of the multitude of all kind of riches; with silver, iron, tin, and lead, they traded in thy fairs.
Eze27:13 Javan, Tubal, and Meshech, they were thy merchants: they traded the persons of men and vessels of brass in thy market.
Eze27:14 They of the house of Togarmah traded in thy fairs with horses and horsemen and mules.
Eze27:15 The men of Dedan were thy merchants; many isles were the merchandise of thine hand: they brought thee for a present horns of ivory and ebony.
Eze27:16 Syria was thy merchant by reason of the multitude of the wares of thy making: they occupied in thy fairs with emeralds, purple, and broidered work, and fine linen, and coral, and agate.
Eze27:17 Judah, and the land of Israel, they were thy merchants: they traded in thy market wheat of Minnith, and Pannag, and honey, and oil, and balm.
Eze27:18 Damascus was thy merchant in the multitude of the wares of thy making, for the multitude of all riches; in the wine of Helbon, and white wool.
Eze27:19 Dan also and Javan going to and fro occupied in thy fairs: bright iron, cassia, and calamus, were in thy market.
Eze27:20 Dedan was thy merchant in precious clothes for chariots.
Eze27:21 Arabia, and all the princes of Kedar, they occupied with thee in lambs, and rams, and goats: in these were they thy merchants.
Eze27:22 The merchants of Sheba and Raamah, they were thy merchants: they occupied in thy fairs with chief of all spices, and with all precious stones, and gold.
Eze27:23 Haran, and Canneh, and Eden, the merchants of Sheba, Asshur, and Chilmad, were thy merchants.
Eze27:24 These were thy merchants in all sorts of things, in blue clothes, and broidered work, and in chests of rich apparel, bound with cords, and made of cedar, among thy merchandise.
Eze27:25 The ships of Tarshish did sing of thee in thy market: and thou wast replenished, and made very glorious in the midst of the seas.
Eze27:26 Thy rowers have brought thee into great waters: the east wind hath broken thee in the midst of the seas.
Eze27:27 Thy riches, and thy fairs, thy merchandise, thy mariners, and thy pilots, thy calkers, and the occupiers of thy merchandise, and all thy men of war, that are in thee, and in all thy company which is in the midst of thee, shall fall into the midst of the seas in the day of thy ruin.
Eze27:28 The suburbs shall shake at the sound of the cry of thy pilots.
Eze27:29 And all that handle the oar, the mariners, and all the pilots of the sea, shall come down from their ships, they shall stand upon the land;
Eze27:30 And shall cause their voice to be heard against thee, and shall cry bitterly, and shall cast up dust upon their heads, they shall wallow themselves in the ashes:
Eze27:31 And they shall make themselves utterly bald for thee, and gird them with sackcloth, and they shall weep for thee with bitterness of heart and bitter wailing.
Eze27:32 And in their wailing they shall take up a lamentation for thee, and lament over thee, saying, What city is like Tyrus, like the destroyed in the midst of the sea?
Eze27:33 When thy wares went forth out of the seas, thou filledst many people; thou didst enrich the kings of the earth with the multitude of thy riches and of thy merchandise.
Eze27:34 In the time when thou shalt be broken by the seas in the depths of the waters thy merchandise and all thy company in the midst of thee shall fall.
Eze27:35 All the inhabitants of the isles shall be astonished at thee, and their kings shall be sore afraid, they shall be troubled in their countenance.
Eze27:36 The merchants among the people shall hiss at thee; thou shalt be a terror, and never shalt be any more.
Eze28:1 The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying,
Eze28:2 Son of man, say unto the prince of Tyrus, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thine heart is lifted up, and thou hast said, I am a God, I sit in the seat of God, in the midst of the seas; yet thou art a man, and not God, though thou set thine heart as the heart of God:
Eze28:3 Behold, thou art wiser than Daniel; there is no secret that they can hide from thee:
Eze28:4 With thy wisdom and with thine understanding thou hast gotten thee riches, and hast gotten gold and silver into thy treasures:
Eze28:5 By thy great wisdom and by thy traffick hast thou increased thy riches, and thine heart is lifted up because of thy riches:
Eze28:6 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou hast set thine heart as the heart of God;
Eze28:7 Behold, therefore I will bring strangers upon thee, the terrible of the nations: and they shall draw their swords against the beauty of thy wisdom, and they shall defile thy brightness.
Eze28:8 They shall bring thee down to the pit, and thou shalt die the deaths of them that are slain in the midst of the seas.
Eze28:9 Wilt thou yet say before him that slayeth thee, I am God? but thou shalt be a man, and no God, in the hand of him that slayeth thee.
Eze28:10 Thou shalt die the deaths of the uncircumcised by the hand of strangers: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze28:11 Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
Eze28:12 Son of man, take up a lamentation upon the king of Tyrus, and say unto him, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Thou sealest up the sum, full of wisdom, and perfect in beauty.
Eze28:13 Thou hast been in Eden the garden of God; every precious stone was thy covering, the sardius, topaz, and the diamond, the beryl, the onyx, and the jasper, the sapphire, the emerald, and the carbuncle, and gold: the workmanship of thy tabrets and of thy pipes was prepared in thee in the day that thou wast created.
Eze28:14 Thou art the anointed cherub that covereth; and I have set thee so: thou wast upon the holy mountain of God; thou hast walked up and down in the midst of the stones of fire.
Eze28:15 Thou wast perfect in thy ways from the day that thou wast created, till iniquity was found in thee.
Eze28:16 By the multitude of thy merchandise they have filled the midst of thee with violence, and thou hast sinned: therefore I will cast thee as profane out of the mountain of God: and I will destroy thee, O covering cherub, from the midst of the stones of fire.
Eze28:17 Thine heart was lifted up because of thy beauty, thou hast corrupted thy wisdom by reason of thy brightness: I will cast thee to the ground, I will lay thee before kings, that they may behold thee.
Eze28:18 Thou hast defiled thy sanctuaries by the multitude of thine iniquities, by the iniquity of thy traffick; therefore will I bring forth a fire from the midst of thee, it shall devour thee, and I will bring thee to ashes upon the earth in the sight of all them that behold thee.
Eze28:19 All they that know thee among the people shall be astonished at thee: thou shalt be a terror, and never shalt thou be any more.
Eze28:20 Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
Eze28:21 Son of man, set thy face against Zidon, and prophesy against it,
Eze28:22 And say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Zidon; and I will be glorified in the midst of thee: and they shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall have executed judgments in her, and shall be sanctified in her.
Eze28:23 For I will send into her pestilence, and blo into her streets; and the wounded shall be judged in the midst of her by the sword upon her on every side; and they shall know that I am the LORD.
Eze28:24 And there shall be no more a pricking brier unto the house of Israel, nor any grieving thorn of all that are round about them, that despised them; and they shall know that I am the Lord GOD.
Eze28:25 Thus saith the Lord GOD; When I shall have gathered the house of Israel from the people among whom they are scattered, and shall be sanctified in them in the sight of the heathen, then shall they dwell in their land that I have given to my servant Jacob.
Eze28:26 And they shall dwell safely therein, and shall build houses, and plant vineyards; yea, they shall dwell with confidence, when I have executed judgments upon all those that despise them round about them; and they shall know that I am the LORD their God.
Eze29:1 In the tenth year, in the tenth month, in the twelfth day of the month, the word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
Eze29:2 Son of man, set thy face against Pharaoh king of Egypt, and prophesy against him, and against all Egypt:
Eze29:3 Speak, and say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, Pharaoh king of Egypt, the great dragon that lieth in the midst of his rivers, which hath said, My river is mine own, and I have made it for myself.
Eze29:4 But I will put hooks in thy jaws, and I will cause the fish of thy rivers to stick unto thy scales, and I will bring thee up out of the midst of thy rivers, and all the fish of thy rivers shall stick unto thy scales.
Eze29:5 And I will leave thee thrown into the wilderness, thee and all the fish of thy rivers: thou shalt fall upon the open fields; thou shalt not be brought together, nor gathered: I have given thee for meat to the beasts of the field and to the fowls of the heaven.
Eze29:6 And all the inhabitants of Egypt shall know that I am the LORD, because they have been a staff of reed to the house of Israel.
Eze29:7 When they took hold of thee by thy hand, thou didst break, and rend all their shoulder: and when they leaned upon thee, thou brakest, and madest all their loins to be at a stand.
Eze29:8 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will bring a sword upon thee, and cut off man and beast out of thee.
Eze29:9 And the land of Egypt shall be desolate and waste; and they shall know that I am the LORD: because he hath said, The river is mine, and I have made it.
Eze29:10 Behold, therefore I am against thee, and against thy rivers, and I will make the land of Egypt utterly waste and desolate, from the tower of Syene even unto the border of Ethiopia.
Eze29:11 No foot of man shall pass through it, nor foot of beast shall pass through it, neither shall it be inhabited forty years.
Eze29:12 And I will make the land of Egypt desolate in the midst of the countries that are desolate, and her cities among the cities that are laid waste shall be desolate forty years: and I will scatter the Egyptians among the nations, and will disperse them through the countries.
Eze29:13 Yet thus saith the Lord GOD; At the end of forty years will I gather the Egyptians from the people whither they were scattered:
Eze29:14 And I will bring again the captivity of Egypt, and will cause them to return into the land of Pathros, into the land of their habitation; and they shall be there a base kingdom.
Eze29:15 It shall be the basest of the kingdoms; neither shall it exalt itself any more above the nations: for I will diminish them, that they shall no more rule over the nations.
Eze29:16 And it shall be no more the confidence of the house of Israel, which bringeth their iniquity to remembrance, when they shall look after them: but they shall know that I am the Lord GOD.
Eze29:17 And it came to pass in the seven and twentieth year, in the first month, in the first day of the month, the word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
Eze29:18 Son of man, Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon caused his army to serve a great service against Tyrus: every head was made bald, and every shoulder was peeled: yet had he no wages, nor his army, for Tyrus, for the service that he had served against it:
Eze29:19 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will give the land of Egypt unto Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon; and he shall take her multitude, and take her spoil, and take her prey; and it shall be the wages for his army.
Eze29:20 I have given him the land of Egypt for his labour wherewith he served against it, because they wrought for me, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze29:21 In that day will I cause the horn of the house of Israel to bud forth, and I will give thee the opening of the mouth in the midst of them; and they shall know that I am the LORD.
Eze30:1 The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying,
Eze30:2 Son of man, prophesy and say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Howl ye, Woe worth the day!
Eze30:3 For the day is near, even the day of the LORD is near, a cloudy day; it shall be the time of the heathen.
Eze30:4 And the sword shall come upon Egypt, and great pain shall be in Ethiopia, when the slain shall fall in Egypt, and they shall take away her multitude, and her foundations shall be broken down.
Eze30:5 Ethiopia, and Libya, and Lydia, and all the mingled people, and Chub, and the men of the land that is in league, shall fall with them by the sword.
Eze30:6 Thus saith the LORD; They also that uphold Egypt shall fall; and the pride of her power shall come down: from the tower of Syene shall they fall in it by the sword, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze30:7 And they shall be desolate in the midst of the countries that are desolate, and her cities shall be in the midst of the cities that are wasted.
Eze30:8 And they shall know that I am the LORD, when I have set a fire in Egypt, and when all her helpers shall be destroyed.
Eze30:9 In that day shall messengers go forth from me in ships to make the careless Ethiopians afraid, and great pain shall come upon them, as in the day of Egypt: for, lo, it cometh.
Eze30:10 Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will also make the multitude of Egypt to cease by the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon.
Eze30:11 He and his people with him, the terrible of the nations, shall be brought to destroy the land: and they shall draw their swords against Egypt, and fill the land with the slain.
Eze30:12 And I will make the rivers dry, and sell the land into the hand of the wicked: and I will make the land waste, and all that is therein, by the hand of strangers: I the LORD have spoken it.
Eze30:13 Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will also destroy the idols, and I will cause their images to cease out of Noph; and there shall be no more a prince of the land of Egypt: and I will put a fear in the land of Egypt.
Eze30:14 And I will make Pathros desolate, and will set fire in Zoan, and will execute judgments in No.
Eze30:15 And I will pour my fury upon Sin, the strength of Egypt; and I will cut off the multitude of No.
Eze30:16 And I will set fire in Egypt: Sin shall have great pain, and No shall be rent asunder, and Noph shall have distresses daily.
Eze30:17 The young men of Aven and of Pibeseth shall fall by the sword: and these cities shall go into captivity.
Eze30:18 At Tehaphnehes also the day shall be darkened, when I shall break there the yokes of Egypt: and the pomp of her strength shall cease in her: as for her, a cloud shall cover her, and her daughters shall go into captivity.
Eze30:19 Thus will I execute judgments in Egypt: and they shall know that I am the LORD.
Eze30:20 And it came to pass in the eleventh year, in the first month, in the seventh day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
Eze30:21 Son of man, I have broken the arm of Pharaoh king of Egypt; and, lo, it shall not be bound up to be healed, to put a roller to bind it, to make it strong to hold the sword.
Eze30:22 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against Pharaoh king of Egypt, and will break his arms, the strong, and that which was broken; and I will cause the sword to fall out of his hand.
Eze30:23 And I will scatter the Egyptians among the nations, and will disperse them through the countries.
Eze30:24 And I will strengthen the arms of the king ofabylon, and put my sword in his hand: but I will break Pharaoh's arms, and he shall groan before him with the groanings of a deadly wounded man.
Eze30:25 But I will strengthen the arms of the king of Babylon, and the arms of Pharaoh shall fall down; and they shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall put my sword into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall stretch it out upon the land of Egypt.
Eze30:26 And I will scatter the Egyptians among the nations, and disperse them among the countries; and they shall know that I am the LORD.
Eze31:1 And it came to pass in the eleventh year, in the third month, in the first day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
Eze31:2 Son of man, speak unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, and to his multitude; Whom art thou like in thy greatness?
Eze31:3 Behold, the Assyrian was a cedar in Lebanon with fair branches, and with a shadowing shroud, and of an high stature; and his top was among the thick boughs.
Eze31:4 The waters made him great, the deep set him up on high with her rivers running round about his plants, and sent out her little rivers unto all the trees of the field.
Eze31:5 Therefore his height was exalted above all the trees of the field, and his boughs were multiplied, and his branches became long because of the multitude of waters, when he shot forth.
Eze31:6 All the fowls of heaven made their nests in his boughs, and under his branches did all the beasts of the field bring forth their young, and under his shadow dwelt all great nations.
Eze31:7 Thus was he fair in his greatness, in the length of his branches: for his root was by great waters.
Eze31:8 The cedars in the garden of God could not hide him: the fir trees were not like his boughs, and the chestnut trees were not like his branches; nor any tree in the garden of God was like unto him in his beauty.
Eze31:9 I have made him fair by the multitude of his branches: so that all the trees of Eden, that were in the garden of God, envied him.
Eze31:10 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou hast lifted up thyself in height, and he hath shot up his top among the thick boughs, and his heart is lifted up in his height;
Eze31:11 I have therefore delivered him into the hand of the mighty one of the heathen; he shall surely deal with him: I have driven him out for his wickedness.
Eze31:12 And strangers, the terrible of the nations, have cut him off, and have left him: upon the mountains and in all the valleys his branches are fallen, and his boughs are broken by all the rivers of the land; and all the people of the earth are gone down from his shadow, and have left him.
Eze31:13 Upon his ruin shall all the fowls of the heaven remain, and all the beasts of the field shall be upon his branches:
Eze31:14 To the end that none of all the trees by the waters exalt themselves for their height, neither shoot up their top among the thick boughs, neither their trees stand up in their height, all that drink water: for they are all delivered unto death, to the nether parts of the earth, in the midst of the children of men, with them that go down to the pit.
Eze31:15 Thus saith the Lord GOD; In the day when he went down to the grave I caused a mourning: I covered the deep for him, and I restrained the floods thereof, and the great waters were stayed: and I caused Lebanon to mourn for him, and all the trees of the field fainted for him.
Eze31:16 I made the nations to shake at the sound of his fall, when I cast him down to hell with them that descend into the pit: and all the trees of Eden, the choice and best of Lebanon, all that drink water, shall be comforted in the nether parts of the earth.
Eze31:17 They also went down into hell with him unto them that be slain with the sword; and they that were his arm, that dwelt under his shadow in the midst of the heathen.
Eze31:18 To whom art thou thus like in glory and in greatness among the trees of Eden? yet shalt thou be brought down with the trees of Eden unto the nether parts of the earth: thou shalt lie in the midst of the uncircumcised with them that be slain by the sword. This is Pharaoh and all his multitude, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze32:1 And it came to pass in the twelfth year, in the twelfth month, in the first day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
Eze32:2 Son of man, take up a lamentation for Pharaoh king of Egypt, and say unto him, Thou art like a young lion of the nations, and thou art as a whale in the seas: and thou camest forth with thy rivers, and troubledst the waters with thy feet, and fouledst their rivers.
Eze32:3 Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will therefore spread out my net over thee with a company of many people; and they shall bring thee up in my net.
Eze32:4 Then will I leave thee upon the land, I will cast thee forth upon the open field, and will cause all the fowls of the heaven to remain upon thee, and I will fill the beasts of the whole earth with thee.
Eze32:5 And I will lay thy flesh upon the mountains, and fill the valleys with thy height.
Eze32:6 I will also water with thy blood the land wherein thou swimmest, even to the mountains; and the rivers shall be full of thee.
Eze32:7 And when I shall put thee out, I will cover the heaven, and make the stars thereof dark; I will cover the sun with a cloud, and the moon shall not give her light.
Eze32:8 All the bright lights of heaven will I make dark over thee, and set darkness upon thy land, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze32:9 I will also vex the hearts of many people, when I shall bring thy destruction among the nations, into the countries which thou hast not known.
Eze32:10 Yea, I will make many people amazed at thee, and their kings shall be horribly afraid for thee, when I shall brandish my sword before them; and they shall tremble at every moment, every man for his own life, in the day of thy fall.
Eze32:11 For thus saith the Lord GOD; The sword of the king of Babylon shall come upon thee.
Eze32:12 By the swords of the mighty will I cause thy multitude to fall, the terrible of the nations, all of them: and they shall spoil the pomp of Egypt, and all the multitude thereof shall be destroyed.
Eze32:13 I will destroy also all the beasts thereof from beside the great waters; neither shall the foot of man trouble them any more, nor the hoofs of beasts trouble them.
Eze32:14 Then will I make their waters deep, and cause their rivers to run like oil, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze32:15 When I shall make the land of Egypt desolate, and the country shall be destitute of that whereof it was full, when I shall smite all them that dwell therein, then shall they know that I am the LORD.
Eze32:16 This is the lamentation wherewith they shall lament her: the daughters of the nations shall lament her: they shall lament for her, even for Egypt, and for all her multitude, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze32:17 It came to pass also in the twelfth year, in the fifteenth day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
Eze32:18 Son of man, wail for the multitude of Egypt, and cast them down, even her, and the daughters of the famous nations, unto the nether parts of the earth, with them that go down into the pit.
Eze32:19 Whom dost thou pass in beauty? go down, and be thou laid with the uncircumcised.
Eze32:20 They shall fall in the midst of them that are slain by the sword: she is delivered to the sword: draw her and all her multitudes.
Eze32:21 The strong among the mighty shall speak to him out of the midst of hell with them that help him: they are gone down, they lie uncircumcised, slain by the sword.
Eze32:22 Asshur is there and all her company: his graves are about him: all of them slain, fallen by the sword:
Eze32:23 Whose graves are set in the sides of the pit, and her company is round about her grave: all of them slain, fallen by the sword, which caused terror in the land of the living.
Eze32:24 There is Elam and all her multitude round about her grave, all of them slain, fallen by the sword, which are gone down uncircumcised into the nether parts of the earth, which caused their terror in the land of the living; yet have they borne their shame with them that go down to the pit.
Eze32:25 They have set whither they be gone, and will gather them on every side, and bring them into their own land:
Eze37:22 And I will make them one nation in the land upon the mountains of Israel; and one king shall be king to them all: and they shall be no more two nations, neither shall they be divided into two kingdoms any more at all:
Eze37:23 Neither shall they defile themselves any more with their idols, nor with their detestable things, nor with any of their transgressions: but I will save them out of all their dwellingplaces, wherein they have sinned, and will cleanse them: so shall they be my people, and I will be their God.
Eze37:24 And David my servant shall be king over them; and they all shall have one shepherd: they shall also walk in my judgments, and observe my statutes, and do them.
Eze37:25 And they shall dwell in the land that I have given unto Jacob my servant, wherein your fathers have dwelt; and they shall dwell therein, even they, and their children, and their children's children for ever: and my servant David shall be their prince for ever.
Eze37:26 Moreover I will make a covenant of peace with them; it shall be an everlasting covenant with them: and I will place them, and multiply them, and will set my sanctuary in the midst of them for evermore.
Eze37:27 My tabernacle also shall be with them: yea, I will be their God, and they shall be my people.
Eze37:28 And the heathen shall know that I the LORD do sanctify Israel, when my sanctuary shall be in the midst of them for evermore.
Eze38:1 And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
Eze38:2 Son of man, set thy face against Gog, the land of Magog, the chief prince of Meshech and Tubal, and prophesy against him,
Eze38:3 And say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Gog, the chief prince of Meshech and Tubal:
Eze38:4 And I will turn thee back, and put hooks into thy jaws, and I will bring thee forth, and all thine army, horses and horsemen, all of them clothed with all sorts of armour, even a great company with bucklers and shields, all of them handling swords:
Eze38:5 Persia, Ethiopia, and Libya with them; all of them with shield and helmet:
Eze38:6 Gomer, and all his bands; the house of Togarmah of the north quarters, and all his bands: and many people with thee.
Eze38:7 Be thou prepared, and prepare for thyself, thou, and all thy company that are assembled unto thee, and be thou a guard unto them.
Eze38:8 After many days thou shalt be visited: in the latter years thou shalt come into the land that is brought back from the sword, and is gathered out of many people, against the mountains of Israel, which have been always waste: but it is brought forth out of the nations, and they shall dwell safely all of them.
Eze38:9 Thou shalt ascend and come like a storm, thou shalt be like a cloud to cover the land, thou, and all thy bands, and many people with thee.
Eze38:10 Thus saith the Lord GOD; It shall also come to pass, that at the same time shall things come into thy mind, and thou shalt think an evil thought:
Eze38:11 And thou shalt say, I will go up to the land of unwalled villages; I will go to them that are at rest, that dwell safely, all of them dwelling without walls, and having neither bars nor gates,
Eze38:12 To take a spoil, and to take a prey; to turn thine hand upon the desolate places that are now inhabited, and upon the people that are gathered out of the nations, which have gotten cattle and goods, that dwell in the midst of the land.
Eze38:13 Sheba, and Dedan, and the merchants of Tarshish, with all the young lions thereof, shall say unto thee, Art thou come to take a spoil? hast thou gathered thy company to take a prey? to carry away silver and gold, to take away cattle and goods, to take a great spoil?
Eze38:14 Therefore, son of man, prophesy and say unto Gog, Thus saith the Lord GOD; In that day when my people of Israel dwelleth safely, shalt thou not know it?
Eze38:15 And thou shalt come from thy place out of the north parts, thou, and many people with thee, all of them riding upon horses, a great company, and a mighty army:
Eze38:16 And thou shalt come up against my people of Israel, as a cloud to cover the land; it shall be in the latter days, and I will bring thee against my land, that the heathen may know me, when I shall be sanctified in thee, O Gog, before their eyes.
Eze38:17 Thus saith the Lord GOD; Art thou he of whom I have spoken in old time by my servants the prophets of Israel, which prophesied in those days many years that I would bring thee against them?
Eze38:18 And it shall come to pass at the same time when Gog shall come against the land of Israel, saith the Lord GOD, that my fury shall come up in my face.
Eze38:19 For in my jealousy and in the fire of my wrath have I spoken, Surely in that day there shall be a great shaking in the land of Israel;
Eze38:20 So that the fishes of the sea, and the fowls of the heaven, and the beasts of the field, and all creeping things that creep upon the earth, and all the men that are upon the face of the earth, shall shake at my presence, and the mountains shall be thrown down, and the steep places shall fall, and every wall shall fall to the ground.
Eze38:21 And I will call for a sword against him throughout all my mountains, saith the Lord GOD: every man's sword shall be against his brother.
Eze38:22 And I will plead against him with pestilence and with blood; and I will rain upon him, and upon his bands, and upon the many people that are with him, an overflowing rain, and great hailstones, fire, and brimstone.
Eze38:23 Thus will I magnify myself, and sanctify myself; and I will be known in the eyes of many nations, and they shall know that I am the LORD.
Eze39:1 Therefore, thou son of man, prophesy against Gog, and say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Gog, the chief prince of Meshech and Tubal:
Eze39:2 And I will turn thee back, and leave but the sixth part of thee, and will cause thee to come up from the north parts, and will bring thee upon the mountains of Israel:
Eze39:3 And I will smite thy bow out of thy left hand, and will cause thine arrows to fall out of thy right hand.
Eze39:4 Thou shalt fall upon the mountains of Israel, thou, and all thy bands, and the people that is with thee: I will give thee unto the ravenous birds of every sort, and to the beasts of the field to be devoured.
Eze39:5 Thou shalt fall upon the open field: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze39:6 And I will send a fire on Magog, and among them that dwell carelessly in the isles: and they shall know that I am the LORD.
Eze39:7 So will I make my holy name known in the midst of my people Israel; and I will not let them pollute my holy name any more: and the heathen shall know that I am the LORD, the Holy One in Israel.
Eze39:8 Behold, it is come, and it is done, saith the Lord GOD; this is the day whereof I have spoken.
Eze39:9 And they that dwell in the cities of Israel shall go forth, and shall set on fire and burn the weapons, both the shields and the bucklers, the bows and the arrows, and the handstaves, and the spears, and they shall burn them with fire seven years:
Eze39:10 So that they shall take no wood out of the field, neither cut down any out of the forests; for they shall burn the weapons with fire: and they shall spoil those that spoiled them, and rob those that robbed them, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze39:11 And it shall come to pass in that day, that I will give unto Gog a place there of graves in Israel, the valley of the passengers on the east of the sea: and it shall stop the noses of the passengers: and there shall they bury Gog and all his multitude: and they shall call it The valley of Hamongog.
Eze39:12 And seven months shall the house of Israel be burying of them, that they may cleanse the land.
Eze39:13 Yea, all the people of the land shall bury them; and it shall be to them a renown the day that I shall be glorified, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze39:14 And they shall sever out men of continual employment, passing through the land to bury with the passengers those that remain upon the face of the earth, to cleanse it: after the end of seven months shall they search.
Eze39:15 A the passengers that pass through the land, when any seeth a man's bone, then shall he set up a sign by it, till the buriers have buried it in the valley of Hamongog.
Eze39:16 And also the name of the city shall be Hamonah. Thus shall they cleanse the land.
Eze39:17 And, thou son of man, thus saith the Lord GOD; Speak unto every feathered fowl, and to every beast of the field, Assemble yourselves, and come; gather yourselves on every side to my sacrifice that I do sacrifice for you, even a great sacrifice upon the mountains of Israel, that ye may eat flesh, and drink blood.
Eze39:18 Ye shall eat the flesh of the mighty, and drink the blood of the princes of the earth, of rams, of lambs, and of goats, of bullocks, all of them fatlings of Bashan.
Eze39:19 And ye shall eat fat till ye be full, and drink blood till ye be drunken, of my sacrifice which I have sacrificed for you.
Eze39:20 Thus ye shall be filled at my table with horses and chariots, with mighty men, and with all men of war, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze39:21 And I will set my glory among the heathen, and all the heathen shall see my judgment that I have executed, and my hand that I have laid upon them.
Eze39:22 So the house of Israel shall know that I am the LORD their God from that day and forward.
Eze39:23 And the heathen shall know that the house of Israel went into captivity for their iniquity: because they trespassed against me, therefore hid I my face from them, and gave them into the hand of their enemies: so fell they all by the sword.
Eze39:24 According to their uncleanness and according to their transgressions have I done unto them, and hid my face from them.
Eze39:25 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Now will I bring again the captivity of Jacob, and have mercy upon the whole house of Israel, and will be jealous for my holy name;
Eze39:26 After that they have borne their shame, and all their trespasses whereby they have trespassed against me, when they dwelt safely in their land, and none made them afraid.
Eze39:27 When I have brought them again from the people, and gathered them out of their enemies' lands, and am sanctified in them in the sight of many nations;
Eze39:28 Then shall they know that I am the LORD their God, which caused them to be led into captivity among the heathen: but I have gathered them unto their own land, and have left none of them any more there.
Eze39:29 Neither will I hide my face any more from them: for I have poured out my spirit upon the house of Israel, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze40:1 In the five and twentieth year of our captivity, in the beginning of the year, in the tenth day of the month, in the fourteenth year after that the city was smitten, in the selfsame day the hand of the LORD was upon me, and brought me thither.
Eze40:2 In the visions of God brought he me into the land of Israel, and set me upon a very high mountain, by which was as the frame of a city on the south.
Eze40:3 And he brought me thither, and, behold, there was a man, whose appearance was like the appearance of brass, with a line of flax in his hand, and a measuring reed; and he stood in the gate.
Eze40:4 And the man said unto me, Son of man, behold with thine eyes, and hear with thine ears, and set thine heart upon all that I shall shew thee; for to the intent that I might shew them unto thee art thou brought hither: declare all that thou seest to the house of Israel.
Eze40:5 And behold a wall on the outside of the house round about, and in the man's hand a measuring reed of six cubits long by the cubit and an hand breadth: so he measured the breadth of the building, one reed; and the height, one reed.
Eze40:6 Then came he unto the gate which looketh toward the east, and went up the stairs thereof, and measured the threshold of the gate, which was one reed broad; and the other threshold of the gate, which was one reed broad.
Eze40:7 And every little chamber was one reed long, and one reed broad; and between the little chambers were five cubits; and the threshold of the gate by the porch of the gate within was one reed.
Eze40:8 He measured also the porch of the gate within, one reed.
Eze40:9 Then measured he the porch of the gate, eight cubits; and the posts thereof, two cubits; and the porch of the gate was inward.
Eze40:10 And the little chambers of the gate eastward were three on this side, and three on that side; they three were of one measure: and the posts had one measure on this side and on that side.
Eze40:11 And he measured the breadth of the entry of the gate, ten cubits; and the length of the gate, thirteen cubits.
Eze40:12 The space also before the little chambers was one cubit on this side, and the space was one cubit on that side: and the little chambers were six cubits on this side, and six cubits on that side.
Eze40:13 He measured then the gate from the roof of one little chamber to the roof of another: the breadth was five and twenty cubits, door against door.
Eze40:14 He made also posts of threescore cubits, even unto the post of the court round about the gate.
Eze40:15 And from the face of the gate of the entrance unto the face of the porch of the inner gate were fifty cubits.
Eze40:16 And there were narrow windows to the little chambers, and to their posts within the gate round about, and likewise to the arches: and windows were round about inward: and upon each post were palm trees.
Eze40:17 Then brought he me into the outward court, and, lo, there were chambers, and a pavement made for the court round about: thirty chambers were upon the pavement.
Eze40:18 And the pavement by the side of the gates over against the length of the gates was the lower pavement.
Eze40:19 Then he measured the breadth from the forefront of the lower gate unto the forefront of the inner court without, an hundred cubits eastward and northward.
Eze40:20 And the gate of the outward court that looked toward the north, he measured the length thereof, and the breadth thereof.
Eze40:21 And the little chambers thereof were three on this side and three on that side; and the posts thereof and the arches thereof were after the measure of the first gate: the length thereof was fifty cubits, and the breadth five and twenty cubits.
Eze40:22 And their windows, and their arches, and their palm trees, were after the measure of the gate that looketh toward the east; and they went up unto it by seven steps; and the arches thereof were before them.
Eze40:23 And the gate of the inner court was over against the gate toward the north, and toward the east; and he measured from gate to gate an hundred cubits.
Eze40:24 After that he brought me toward the south, and behold a gate toward the south: and he measured the posts thereof and the arches thereof according to these measures.
Eze40:25 And there were windows in it and in the arches thereof round about, like those windows: the length was fifty cubits, and the breadth five and twenty cubits.
Eze40:26 And there were seven steps to go up to it, and the arches thereof were before them: and it had palm trees, one on this side, and another on that side, upon the posts thereof.
Eze40:27 And there was a gate in the inner court toward the south: and he measured from gate to gate toward the south an hundred cubits.
Eze40:28 And he brought me to the inner court by the south gate: and he measured the south gate according to these measures;
Eze40:29 And the little chambers thereof, and the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, according to these measures: and there were windows in it and in the arches thereof round about: it was fifty cubits long, and five and twenty cubits broad.
Eze40:30 And the arches round about were five and twenty cubits long, and five cubits broad.
Eze40:31 And the arches thereof were toward the utter court; and palm trees were upon the posts thereof: and the going up to it had eight steps.
Eze40:32 And he brought me into the inner court toward the east: and he measured the gate according to these measures.
Eze40:33 And the little chambers thereof, and the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, were according to these measures: and there were windows therein and in the arches thereof round about: it was fifty cubits long, and five a twenty cubits broad.
Eze40:34 And the arches thereof were toward the outward court; and palm trees were upon the posts thereof, on this side, and on that side: and the going up to it had eight steps.
Eze40:35 And he brought me to the north gate, and measured it according to these measures;
Eze40:36 The little chambers thereof, the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, and the windows to it round about: the length was fifty cubits, and the breadth five and twenty cubits.
Eze40:37 And the posts thereof were toward the utter court; and palm trees were upon the posts thereof, on this side, and on that side: and the going up to it had eight steps.
Eze40:38 And the chambers and the entries thereof were by the posts of the gates, where they washed the burnt offering.
Eze40:39 And in the porch of the gate were two tables on this side, and two tables on that side, to slay thereon the burnt offering and the sin offering and the trespass offering.
Eze40:40 And at the side without, as one goeth up to the entry of the north gate, were two tables; and on the other side, which was at the porch of the gate, were two tables.
Eze40:41 Four tables were on this side, and four tables on that side, by the side of the gate; eight tables, whereupon they slew their sacrifices.
Eze40:42 And the four tables were of hewn stone for the burnt offering, of a cubit and an half long, and a cubit and an half broad, and one cubit high: whereupon also they laid the instruments wherewith they slew the burnt offering and the sacrifice.
Eze40:43 And within were hooks, an hand broad, fastened round about: and upon the tables was the flesh of the offering.
Eze40:44 And without the inner gate were the chambers of the singers in the inner court, which was at the side of the north gate; and their prospect was toward the south: one at the side of the east gate having the prospect toward the north.
Eze40:45 And he said unto me, This chamber, whose prospect is toward the south, is for the priests, the keepers of the charge of the house.
Eze40:46 And the chamber whose prospect is toward the north is for the priests, the keepers of the charge of the altar: these are the sons of Zadok among the sons of Levi, which come near to the LORD to minister unto him.
Eze40:47 So he measured the court, an hundred cubits long, and an hundred cubits broad, foursquare; and the altar that was before the house.
Eze40:48 And he brought me to the porch of the house, and measured each post of the porch, five cubits on this side, and five cubits on that side: and the breadth of the gate was three cubits on this side, and three cubits on that side.
Eze40:49 The length of the porch was twenty cubits, and the breadth eleven cubits; and he brought me by the steps whereby they went up to it: and there were pillars by the posts, one on this side, and another on that side.
Eze41:1 Afterward he brought me to the temple, and measured the posts, six cubits broad on the one side, and six cubits broad on the other side, which was the breadth of the tabernacle.
Eze41:2 And the breadth of the door was ten cubits; and the sides of the door were five cubits on the one side, and five cubits on the other side: and he measured the length thereof, forty cubits: and the breadth, twenty cubits.
Eze41:3 Then went he inward, and measured the post of the door, two cubits; and the door, six cubits; and the breadth of the door, seven cubits.
Eze41:4 So he measured the length thereof, twenty cubits; and the breadth, twenty cubits, before the temple: and he said unto me, This is the most holy place.
Eze41:5 After he measured the wall of the house, six cubits; and the breadth of every side chamber, four cubits, round about the house on every side.
Eze41:6 And the side chambers were three, one over another, and thirty in order; and they entered into the wall which was of the house for the side chambers round about, that they might have hold, but they had not hold in the wall of the house.
Eze41:7 And there was an enlarging, and a winding about still upward to the side chambers: for the winding about of the house went still upward round about the house: therefore the breadth of the house was still upward, and so increased from the lowest chamber to the highest by the midst.
Eze41:8 I saw also the height of the house round about: the foundations of the side chambers were a full reed of six great cubits.
Eze41:9 The thickness of the wall, which was for the side chamber without, was five cubits: and that which was left was the place of the side chambers that were within.
Eze41:10 And between the chambers was the wideness of twenty cubits round about the house on every side.
Eze41:11 And the doors of the side chambers were toward the place that was left, one door toward the north, and another door toward the south: and the breadth of the place that was left was five cubits round about.
Eze41:12 Now the building that was before the separate place at the end toward the west was seventy cubits broad; and the wall of the building was five cubits thick round about, and the length thereof ninety cubits.
Eze41:13 So he measured the house, an hundred cubits long; and the separate place, and the building, with the walls thereof, an hundred cubits long;
Eze41:14 Also the breadth of the face of the house, and of the separate place toward the east, an hundred cubits.
Eze41:15 And he measured the length of the building over against the separate place which was behind it, and the galleries thereof on the one side and on the other side, an hundred cubits, with the inner temple, and the porches of the court;
Eze41:16 The door posts, and the narrow windows, and the galleries round about on their three stories, over against the door, cieled with wood round about, and from the ground up to the windows, and the windows were covered;
Eze41:17 To that above the door, even unto the inner house, and without, and by all the wall round about within and without, by measure.
Eze41:18 And it was made with cherubims and palm trees, so that a palm tree was between a cherub and a cherub; and every cherub had two faces;
Eze41:19 So that the face of a man was toward the palm tree on the one side, and the face of a young lion toward the palm tree on the other side: it was made through all the house round about.
Eze41:20 From the ground unto above the door were cherubims and palm trees made, and on the wall of the temple.
Eze41:21 The posts of the temple were squared, and the face of the sanctuary; the appearance of the one as the appearance of the other.
Eze41:22 The altar of wood was three cubits high, and the length thereof two cubits; and the corners thereof, and the length thereof, and the walls thereof, were of wood: and he said unto me, This is the table that is before the LORD.
Eze41:23 And the temple and the sanctuary had two doors.
Eze41:24 And the doors had two leaves apiece, two turning leaves; two leaves for the one door, and two leaves for the other door.
Eze41:25 And there were made on them, on the doors of the temple, cherubims and palm trees, like as were made upon the walls; and there were thick planks upon the face of the porch without.
Eze41:26 And there were narrow windows and palm trees on the one side and on the other side, on the sides of the porch, and upon the side chambers of the house, and thick planks.
Eze42:1 Then he brought me forth into the utter court, the way toward the north: and he brought me into the chamber that was over against the separate place, and which was before the building toward the north.
Eze42:2 Before the length of an hundred cubits was the north door, and the breadth was fifty cubits.
Eze42:3 Over against the twenty cubits which were for the inner court, and over against the pavement which was for the utter court, was gallery against gallery in three stories.
Eze42:4 And before the chambers was a walk of ten cubits breadth inward, a way of one cubit; and their doors toward the north.
Eze42:5 Now the upper chambers were shorter: for the galleries were higher than these, than the lower, and than the middlemost of the building.
Eze42:6 For they were in three stories, but had not pillars as the pillars of the courts: therefoforth nets; their fish shall be according to their kinds, as the fish of the great sea, exceeding many.
Eze47:11 But the miry places thereof and the marishes thereof shall not be healed; they shall be given to salt.
Eze47:12 And by the river upon the bank thereof, on this side and on that side, shall grow all trees for meat, whose leaf shall not fade, neither shall the fruit thereof be consumed: it shall bring forth new fruit according to his months, because their waters they issued out of the sanctuary: and the fruit thereof shall be for meat, and the leaf thereof for medicine.
Eze47:13 Thus saith the Lord GOD; This shall be the border, whereby ye shall inherit the land according to the twelve tribes of Israel: Joseph shall have two portions.
Eze47:14 And ye shall inherit it, one as well as another: concerning the which I lifted up mine hand to give it unto your fathers: and this land shall fall unto you for inheritance.
Eze47:15 And this shall be the border of the land toward the north side, from the great sea, the way of Hethlon, as men go to Zedad;
Eze47:16 Hamath, Berothah, Sibraim, which is between the border of Damascus and the border of Hamath; Hazarhatticon, which is by the coast of Hauran.
Eze47:17 And the border from the sea shall be Hazarenan, the border of Damascus, and the north northward, and the border of Hamath. And this is the north side.
Eze47:18 And the east side ye shall measure from Hauran, and from Damascus, and from Gilead, and from the land of Israel by Jordan, from the border unto the east sea. And this is the east side.
Eze47:19 And the south side southward, from Tamar even to the waters of strife in Kadesh, the river to the great sea. And this is the south side southward.
Eze47:20 The west side also shall be the great sea from the border, till a man come over against Hamath. This is the west side.
Eze47:21 So shall ye divide this land unto you according to the tribes of Israel.
Eze47:22 And it shall come to pass, that ye shall divide it by lot for an inheritance unto you, and to the strangers that sojourn among you, which shall beget children among you: and they shall be unto you as born in the country among the children of Israel; they shall have inheritance with you among the tribes of Israel.
Eze47:23 And it shall come to pass, that in what tribe the stranger sojourneth, there shall ye give him his inheritance, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze48:1 Now these are the names of the tribes. From the north end to the coast of the way of Hethlon, as one goeth to Hamath, Hazarenan, the border of Damascus northward, to the coast of Hamath; for these are his sides east and west; a portion for Dan.
Eze48:2 And by the border of Dan, from the east side unto the west side, a portion for Asher.
Eze48:3 And by the border of Asher, from the east side even unto the west side, a portion for Naphtali.
Eze48:4 And by the border of Naphtali, from the east side unto the west side, a portion for Manasseh.
Eze48:5 And by the border of Manasseh, from the east side unto the west side, a portion for Ephraim.
Eze48:6 And by the border of Ephraim, from the east side even unto the west side, a portion for Reuben.
Eze48:7 And by the border of Reuben, from the east side unto the west side, a portion for Judah.
Eze48:8 And by the border of Judah, from the east side unto the west side, shall be the offering which ye shall offer of five and twenty thousand reeds in breadth, and in length as one of the other parts, from the east side unto the west side: and the sanctuary shall be in the midst of it.
Eze48:9 The oblation that ye shall offer unto the LORD shall be of five and twenty thousand in length, and of ten thousand in breadth.
Eze48:10 And for them, even for the priests, shall be this holy oblation; toward the north five and twenty thousand in length, and toward the west ten thousand in breadth, and toward the east ten thousand in breadth, and toward the south five and twenty thousand in length: and the sanctuary of the LORD shall be in the midst thereof.
Eze48:11 It shall be for the priests that are sanctified of the sons of Zadok; which have kept my charge, which went not astray when the children of Israel went astray, as the Levites went astray.
Eze48:12 And this oblation of the land that is offered shall be unto them a thing most holy by the border of the Levites.
Eze48:13 And over against the border of the priests the Levites shall have five and twenty thousand in length, and ten thousand in breadth: all the length shall be five and twenty thousand, and the breadth ten thousand.
Eze48:14 And they shall not sell of it, neither exchange, nor alienate the firstfruits of the land: for it is holy unto the LORD.
Eze48:15 And the five thousand, that are left in the breadth over against the five and twenty thousand, shall be a profane place for the city, for dwelling, and for suburbs: and the city shall be in the midst thereof.
Eze48:16 And these shall be the measures thereof; the north side four thousand and five hundred, and the south side four thousand and five hundred, and on the east side four thousand and five hundred, and the west side four thousand and five hundred.
Eze48:17 And the suburbs of the city shall be toward the north two hundred and fifty, and toward the south two hundred and fifty, and toward the east two hundred and fifty, and toward the west two hundred and fifty.
Eze48:18 And the residue in length over against the oblation of the holy portion shall be ten thousand eastward, and ten thousand westward: and it shall be over against the oblation of the holy portion; and the increase thereof shall be for food unto them that serve the city.
Eze48:19 And they that serve the city shall serve it out of all the tribes of Israel.
Eze48:20 All the oblation shall be five and twenty thousand by five and twenty thousand: ye shall offer the holy oblation foursquare, with the possession of the city.
Eze48:21 And the residue shall be for the prince, on the one side and on the other of the holy oblation, and of the possession of the city, over against the five and twenty thousand of the oblation toward the east border, and westward over against the five and twenty thousand toward the west border, over against the portions for the prince: and it shall be the holy oblation; and the sanctuary of the house shall be in the midst thereof.
Eze48:22 Moreover from the possession of the Levites, and from the possession of the city, being in the midst of that which is the prince's, between the border of Judah and the border of Benjamin, shall be for the prince.
Eze48:23 As for the rest of the tribes, from the east side unto the west side, Benjamin shall have a portion.
Eze48:24 And by the border of Benjamin, from the east side unto the west side, Simeon shall have a portion.
Eze48:25 And by the border of Simeon, from the east side unto the west side, Issachar a portion.
Eze48:26 And by the border of Issachar, from the east side unto the west side, Zebulun a portion.
Eze48:27 And by the border of Zebulun, from the east side unto the west side, Gad a portion.
Eze48:28 And by the border of Gad, at the south side southward, the border shall be even from Tamar unto the waters of strife in Kadesh, and to the river toward the great sea.
Eze48:29 This is the land which ye shall divide by lot unto the tribes of Israel for inheritance, and these are their portions, saith the Lord GOD.
Eze48:30 And these are the goings out of the city on the north side, four thousand and five hundred measures.
Eze48:31 And the gates of the city shall be after the names of the tribes of Israel: three gates northward; one gate of Reuben, one gate of Judah, one gate of Levi.
Eze48:32 And at the east side four thousand and five hundred: and three gates; and one gate of Joseph, one gate of Benjamin, one gate of Dan.
Eze48:33 And at the south side four thousand and five hundred measures: and three gates; one gate of Simeon, one gate of Issachar, one gate of Zebulun.
Eze48:34 At the west side four thousand and five hundred, with their three gates; one gate of Gad, one gate of Asher, one gate of Naphtali.
Eze48:35 It was round about eighteen thousand measures: and the name of the city fromhat day shall be, The LORD is there.
Dan1:1 In the third year of the reign of Jehoiakim king of Judah came Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon unto Jerusalem, and besieged it.
Dan1:2 And the Lord gave Jehoiakim king of Judah into his hand, with part of the vessels of the house of God: which he carried into the land of Shinar to the house of his god; and he brought the vessels into the treasure house of his god.
Dan1:3 And the king spake unto Ashpenaz the master of his eunuchs, that he should bring certain of the children of Israel, and of the king's seed, and of the princes;
Dan1:4 Children in whom was no blemish, but well favoured, and skilful in all wisdom, and cunning in knowledge, and understanding science, and such as had ability in them to stand in the king's palace, and whom they might teach the learning and the tongue of the Chaldeans.
Dan1:5 And the king appointed them a daily provision of the king's meat, and of the wine which he drank: so nourishing them three years, that at the end thereof they might stand before the king.
Dan1:6 Now among these were of the children of Judah, Daniel, Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah:
Dan1:7 Unto whom the prince of the eunuchs gave names: for he gave unto Daniel the name of Belteshazzar; and to Hananiah, of Shadrach; and to Mishael, of Meshach; and to Azariah, of Abednego.
Dan1:8 But Daniel purposed in his heart that he would not defile himself with the portion of the king's meat, nor with the wine which he drank: therefore he requested of the prince of the eunuchs that he might not defile himself.
Dan1:9 Now God had brought Daniel into favour and tender love with the prince of the eunuchs.
Dan1:10 And the prince of the eunuchs said unto Daniel, I fear my lord the king, who hath appointed your meat and your drink: for why should he see your faces worse liking than the children which are of your sort? then shall ye make me endanger my head to the king.
Dan1:11 Then said Daniel to Melzar, whom the prince of the eunuchs had set over Daniel, Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah,
Dan1:12 Prove thy servants, I beseech thee, ten days; and let them give us pulse to eat, and water to drink.
Dan1:13 Then let our countenances be looked upon before thee, and the countenance of the children that eat of the portion of the king's meat: and as thou seest, deal with thy servants.
Dan1:14 So he consented to them in this matter, and proved them ten days.
Dan1:15 And at the end of ten days their countenances appeared fairer and fatter in flesh than all the children which did eat the portion of the king's meat.
Dan1:16 Thus Melzar took away the portion of their meat, and the wine that they should drink; and gave them pulse.
Dan1:17 As for these four children, God gave them knowledge and skill in all learning and wisdom: and Daniel had understanding in all visions and dreams.
Dan1:18 Now at the end of the days that the king had said he should bring them in, then the prince of the eunuchs brought them in before Nebuchadnezzar.
Dan1:19 And the king communed with them; and among them all was found none like Daniel, Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah: therefore stood they before the king.
Dan1:20 And in all matters of wisdom and understanding, that the king enquired of them, he found them ten times better than all the magicians and astrologers that were in all his realm.
Dan1:21 And Daniel continued even unto the first year of king Cyrus.
Dan2:1 And in the second year of the reign of Nebuchadnezzar Nebuchadnezzar dreamed dreams, wherewith his spirit was troubled, and his sleep brake from him.
Dan2:2 Then the king commanded to call the magicians, and the astrologers, and the sorcerers, and the Chaldeans, for to shew the king his dreams. So they came and stood before the king.
Dan2:3 And the king said unto them, I have dreamed a dream, and my spirit was troubled to know the dream.
Dan2:4 Then spake the Chaldeans to the king in Syriack, O king, live for ever: tell thy servants the dream, and we will shew the interpretation.
Dan2:5 The king answered and said to the Chaldeans, The thing is gone from me: if ye will not make known unto me the dream, with the interpretation thereof, ye shall be cut in pieces, and your houses shall be made a dunghill.
Dan2:6 But if ye shew the dream, and the interpretation thereof, ye shall receive of me gifts and rewards and great honour: therefore shew me the dream, and the interpretation thereof.
Dan2:7 They answered again and said, Let the king tell his servants the dream, and we will shew the interpretation of it.
Dan2:8 The king answered and said, I know of certainty that ye would gain the time, because ye see the thing is gone from me.
Dan2:9 But if ye will not make known unto me the dream, there is but one decree for you: for ye have prepared lying and corrupt words to speak before me, till the time be changed: therefore tell me the dream, and I shall know that ye can shew me the interpretation thereof.
Dan2:10 The Chaldeans answered before the king, and said, There is not a man upon the earth that can shew the king's matter: therefore there is no king, lord, nor ruler, that asked such things at any magician, or astrologer, or Chaldean.
Dan2:11 And it is a rare thing that the king requireth, and there is none other that can shew it before the king, except the gods, whose dwelling is not with flesh.
Dan2:12 For this cause the king was angry and very furious, and commanded to destroy all the wise men of Babylon.
Dan2:13 And the decree went forth that the wise men should be slain; and they sought Daniel and his fellows to be slain.
Dan2:14 Then Daniel answered with counsel and wisdom to Arioch the captain of the king's guard, which was gone forth to slay the wise men of Babylon:
Dan2:15 He answered and said to Arioch the king's captain, Why is the decree so hasty from the king? Then Arioch made the thing known to Daniel.
Dan2:16 Then Daniel went in, and desired of the king that he would give him time, and that he would shew the king the interpretation.
Dan2:17 Then Daniel went to his house, and made the thing known to Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah, his companions:
Dan2:18 That they would desire mercies of the God of heaven concerning this secret; that Daniel and his fellows should not perish with the rest of the wise men of Babylon.
Dan2:19 Then was the secret revealed unto Daniel in a night vision. Then Daniel blessed the God of heaven.
Dan2:20 Daniel answered and said, Blessed be the name of God for ever and ever: for wisdom and might are his:
Dan2:21 And he changeth the times and the seasons: he removeth kings, and setteth up kings: he giveth wisdom unto the wise, and knowledge to them that know understanding:
Dan2:22 He revealeth the deep and secret things: he knoweth what is in the darkness, and the light dwelleth with him.
Dan2:23 I thank thee, and praise thee, O thou God of my fathers, who hast given me wisdom and might, and hast made known unto me now what we desired of thee: for thou hast now made known unto us the king's matter.
Dan2:24 Therefore Daniel went in unto Arioch, whom the king had ordained to destroy the wise men of Babylon: he went and said thus unto him; Destroy not the wise men of Babylon: bring me in before the king, and I will shew unto the king the interpretation.
Dan2:25 Then Arioch brought in Daniel before the king in haste, and said thus unto him, I have found a man of the captives of Judah, that will make known unto the king the interpretation.
Dan2:26 The king answered and said to Daniel, whose name was Belteshazzar, Art thou able to make known unto me the dream which I have seen, and the interpretation thereof?
Dan2:27 Daniel answered in the presence of the king, and said, The secret which the king hath demanded cannot the wise men, the astrologers, the magicians, the soothsayers, shew unto the king;
Dan2:28 But there is a God in heaven that revealeth secrets, and maketh known to the king Nebuchadnezzar what shall be in the latter days. Thy dream, and the visions of thy head upon thy bed, are these;
Dan2:29 As for thee, O king, thy thoughts came into thy mind upon thy bed, what should come to pass hereafter: and he that revealeth secrets maketh known to thee what shall me to pass.
Dan2:30 But as for me, this secret is not revealed to me for any wisdom that I have more than any living, but for their sakes that shall make known the interpretation to the king, and that thou mightest know the thoughts of thy heart.
Dan2:31 Thou, O king, sawest, and behold a great image. This great image, whose brightness was excellent, stood before thee; and the form thereof was terrible.
Dan2:32 This image's head was of fine gold, his breast and his arms of silver, his belly and his thighs of brass,
Dan2:33 His legs of iron, his feet part of iron and part of clay.
Dan2:34 Thou sawest till that a stone was cut out without hands, which smote the image upon his feet that were of iron and clay, and brake them to pieces.
Dan2:35 Then was the iron, the clay, the brass, the silver, and the gold, broken to pieces together, and became like the chaff of the summer threshingfloors; and the wind carried them away, that no place was found for them: and the stone that smote the image became a great mountain, and filled the whole earth.
Dan2:36 This is the dream; and we will tell the interpretation thereof before the king.
Dan2:37 Thou, O king, art a king of kings: for the God of heaven hath given thee a kingdom, power, and strength, and glory.
Dan2:38 And wheresoever the children of men dwell, the beasts of the field and the fowls of the heaven hath he given into thine hand, and hath made thee ruler over them all. Thou art this head of gold.
Dan2:39 And after thee shall arise another kingdom inferior to thee, and another third kingdom of brass, which shall bear rule over all the earth.
Dan2:40 And the fourth kingdom shall be strong as iron: forasmuch as iron breaketh in pieces and subdueth all things: and as iron that breaketh all these, shall it break in pieces and bruise.
Dan2:41 And whereas thou sawest the feet and toes, part of potters' clay, and part of iron, the kingdom shall be divided; but there shall be in it of the strength of the iron, forasmuch as thou sawest the iron mixed with miry clay.
Dan2:42 And as the toes of the feet were part of iron, and part of clay, so the kingdom shall be partly strong, and partly broken.
Dan2:43 And whereas thou sawest iron mixed with miry clay, they shall mingle themselves with the seed of men: but they shall not cleave one to another, even as iron is not mixed with clay.
Dan2:44 And in the days of these kings shall the God of heaven set up a kingdom, which shall never be destroyed: and the kingdom shall not be left to other people, but it shall break in pieces and consume all these kingdoms, and it shall stand for ever.
Dan2:45 Forasmuch as thou sawest that the stone was cut out of the mountain without hands, and that it brake in pieces the iron, the brass, the clay, the silver, and the gold; the great God hath made known to the king what shall come to pass hereafter: and the dream is certain, and the interpretation thereof sure.
Dan2:46 Then the king Nebuchadnezzar fell upon his face, and worshipped Daniel, and commanded that they should offer an oblation and sweet odours unto him.
Dan2:47 The king answered unto Daniel, and said, Of a truth it is, that your God is a God of gods, and a Lord of kings, and a revealer of secrets, seeing thou couldest reveal this secret.
Dan2:48 Then the king made Daniel a great man, and gave him many great gifts, and made him ruler over the whole province of Babylon, and chief of the governors over all the wise men of Babylon.
Dan2:49 Then Daniel requested of the king, and he set Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, over the affairs of the province of Babylon: but Daniel sat in the gate of the king.
Dan3:1 Nebuchadnezzar the king made an image of gold, whose height was threescore cubits, and the breadth thereof six cubits: he set it up in the plain of Dura, in the province of Babylon.
Dan3:2 Then Nebuchadnezzar the king sent to gather together the princes, the governors, and the captains, the judges, the treasurers, the counsellors, the sheriffs, and all the rulers of the provinces, to come to the dedication of the image which Nebuchadnezzar the king had set up.
Dan3:3 Then the princes, the governors, and captains, the judges, the treasurers, the counsellors, the sheriffs, and all the rulers of the provinces, were gathered together unto the dedication of the image that Nebuchadnezzar the king had set up; and they stood before the image that Nebuchadnezzar had set up.
Dan3:4 Then an herald cried aloud, To you it is commanded, O people, nations, and languages,
Dan3:5 That at what time ye hear the sound of the cornet, flute, harp, sackbut, psaltery, dulcimer, and all kinds of musick, ye fall down and worship the golden image that Nebuchadnezzar the king hath set up:
Dan3:6 And whoso falleth not down and worshippeth shall the same hour be cast into the midst of a burning fiery furnace.
Dan3:7 Therefore at that time, when all the people heard the sound of the cornet, flute, harp, sackbut, psaltery, and all kinds of musick, all the people, the nations, and the languages, fell down and worshipped the golden image that Nebuchadnezzar the king had set up.
Dan3:8 Wherefore at that time certain Chaldeans came near, and accused the Jews.
Dan3:9 They spake and said to the king Nebuchadnezzar, O king, live for ever.
Dan3:10 Thou, O king, hast made a decree, that every man that shall hear the sound of the cornet, flute, harp, sackbut, psaltery, and dulcimer, and all kinds of musick, shall fall down and worship the golden image:
Dan3:11 And whoso falleth not down and worshippeth, that he should be cast into the midst of a burning fiery furnace.
Dan3:12 There are certain Jews whom thou hast set over the affairs of the province of Babylon, Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego; these men, O king, have not regarded thee: they serve not thy gods, nor worship the golden image which thou hast set up.
Dan3:13 Then Nebuchadnezzar in his rage and fury commanded to bring Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego. Then they brought these men before the king.
Dan3:14 Nebuchadnezzar spake and said unto them, Is it true, O Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, do not ye serve my gods, nor worship the golden image which I have set up?
Dan3:15 Now if ye be ready that at what time ye hear the sound of the cornet, flute, harp, sackbut, psaltery, and dulcimer, and all kinds of musick, ye fall down and worship the image which I have made; well: but if ye worship not, ye shall be cast the same hour into the midst of a burning fiery furnace; and who is that God that shall deliver you out of my hands?
Dan3:16 Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, answered and said to the king, O Nebuchadnezzar, we are not careful to answer thee in this matter.
Dan3:17 If it be so, our God whom we serve is able to deliver us from the burning fiery furnace, and he will deliver us out of thine hand, O king.
Dan3:18 But if not, be it known unto thee, O king, that we will not serve thy gods, nor worship the golden image which thou hast set up.
Dan3:19 Then was Nebuchadnezzar full of fury, and the form of his visage was changed against Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego: therefore he spake, and commanded that they should heat the furnace one seven times more than it was wont to be heated.
Dan3:20 And he commanded the most mighty men that were in his army to bind Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, and to cast them into the burning fiery furnace.
Dan3:21 Then these men were bound in their coats, their hosen, and their hats, and their other garments, and were cast into the midst of the burning fiery furnace.
Dan3:22 Therefore because the king's commandment was urgent, and the furnace exceeding hot, the flame of the fire slew those men that took up Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego.
Dan3:23 And these three men, Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, fell down bound into the midst of the burning fiery furnace.
Dan3:24 Then Nebuchadnezzar the king was astonied, and rose up in haste, and spake, and said unto his counsellors, Did not we cast three men bound into the midst of the fire? They answered and said unto the king, True, O king.
Dan3:25 He answered and said, Lo, I see four men loose, walking in the midst of the fire, and they have no hurt; and the form of the foere stood before the river a ram which had two horns: and the two horns were high; but one was higher than the other, and the higher came up last.
Dan8:4 I saw the ram pushing westward, and northward, and southward; so that no beasts might stand before him, neither was there any that could deliver out of his hand; but he did according to his will, and became great.
Dan8:5 And as I was considering, behold, an he goat came from the west on the face of the whole earth, and touched not the ground: and the goat had a notable horn between his eyes.
Dan8:6 And he came to the ram that had two horns, which I had seen standing before the river, and ran unto him in the fury of his power.
Dan8:7 And I saw him come close unto the ram, and he was moved with choler against him, and smote the ram, and brake his two horns: and there was no power in the ram to stand before him, but he cast him down to the ground, and stamped upon him: and there was none that could deliver the ram out of his hand.
Dan8:8 Therefore the he goat waxed very great: and when he was strong, the great horn was broken; and for it came up four notable ones toward the four winds of heaven.
Dan8:9 And out of one of them came forth a little horn, which waxed exceeding great, toward the south, and toward the east, and toward the pleasant land.
Dan8:10 And it waxed great, even to the host of heaven; and it cast down some of the host and of the stars to the ground, and stamped upon them.
Dan8:11 Yea, he magnified himself even to the prince of the host, and by him the daily sacrifice was taken away, and the place of his sanctuary was cast down.
Dan8:12 And an host was given him against the daily sacrifice by reason of transgression, and it cast down the truth to the ground; and it practised, and prospered.
Dan8:13 Then I heard one saint speaking, and another saint said unto that certain saint which spake, How long shall be the vision concerning the daily sacrifice, and the transgression of desolation, to give both the sanctuary and the host to be trodden under foot?
Dan8:14 And he said unto me, Unto two thousand and three hundred days; then shall the sanctuary be cleansed.
Dan8:15 And it came to pass, when I, even I Daniel, had seen the vision, and sought for the meaning, then, behold, there stood before me as the appearance of a man.
Dan8:16 And I heard a man's voice between the banks of Ulai, which called, and said, Gabriel, make this man to understand the vision.
Dan8:17 So he came near where I stood: and when he came, I was afraid, and fell upon my face: but he said unto me, Understand, O son of man: for at the time of the end shall be the vision.
Dan8:18 Now as he was speaking with me, I was in a deep sleep on my face toward the ground: but he touched me, and set me upright.
Dan8:19 And he said, Behold, I will make thee know what shall be in the last end of the indignation: for at the time appointed the end shall be.
Dan8:20 The ram which thou sawest having two horns are the kings of Media and Persia.
Dan8:21 And the rough goat is the king of Grecia: and the great horn that is between his eyes is the first king.
Dan8:22 Now that being broken, whereas four stood up for it, four kingdoms shall stand up out of the nation, but not in his power.
Dan8:23 And in the latter time of their kingdom, when the transgressors are come to the full, a king of fierce countenance, and understanding dark sentences, shall stand up.
Dan8:24 And his power shall be mighty, but not by his own power: and he shall destroy wonderfully, and shall prosper, and practise, and shall destroy the mighty and the holy people.
Dan8:25 And through his policy also he shall cause craft to prosper in his hand; and he shall magnify himself in his heart, and by peace shall destroy many: he shall also stand up against the Prince of princes; but he shall be broken without hand.
Dan8:26 And the vision of the evening and the morning which was told is true: wherefore shut thou up the vision; for it shall be for many days.
Dan8:27 And I Daniel fainted, and was sick certain days; afterward I rose up, and did the king's business; and I was astonished at the vision, but none understood it.
Dan9:1 In the first year of Darius the son of Ahasuerus, of the seed of the Medes, which was made king over the realm of the Chaldeans;
Dan9:2 In the first year of his reign I Daniel understood by books the number of the years, whereof the word of the LORD came to Jeremiah the prophet, that he would accomplish seventy years in the desolations of Jerusalem.
Dan9:3 And I set my face unto the Lord God, to seek by prayer and supplications, with fasting, and sackcloth, and ashes:
Dan9:4 And I prayed unto the LORD my God, and made my confession, and said, O Lord, the great and dreadful God, keeping the covenant and mercy to them that love him, and to them that keep his commandments;
Dan9:5 We have sinned, and have committed iniquity, and have done wickedly, and have rebelled, even by departing from thy precepts and from thy judgments:
Dan9:6 Neither have we hearkened unto thy servants the prophets, which spake in thy name to our kings, our princes, and our fathers, and to all the people of the land.
Dan9:7 O LORD, righteousness belongeth unto thee, but unto us confusion of faces, as at this day; to the men of Judah, and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and unto all Israel, that are near, and that are far off, through all the countries whither thou hast driven them, because of their trespass that they have trespassed against thee.
Dan9:8 O Lord, to us belongeth confusion of face, to our kings, to our princes, and to our fathers, because we have sinned against thee.
Dan9:9 To the Lord our God belong mercies and forgivenesses, though we have rebelled against him;
Dan9:10 Neither have we obeyed the voice of the LORD our God, to walk in his laws, which he set before us by his servants the prophets.
Dan9:11 Yea, all Israel have transgressed thy law, even by departing, that they might not obey thy voice; therefore the curse is poured upon us, and the oath that is written in the law of Moses the servant of God, because we have sinned against him.
Dan9:12 And he hath confirmed his words, which he spake against us, and against our judges that judged us, by bringing upon us a great evil: for under the whole heaven hath not been done as hath been done upon Jerusalem.
Dan9:13 As it is written in the law of Moses, all this evil is come upon us: yet made we not our prayer before the LORD our God, that we might turn from our iniquities, and understand thy truth.
Dan9:14 Therefore hath the LORD watched upon the evil, and brought it upon us: for the LORD our God is righteous in all his works which he doeth: for we obeyed not his voice.
Dan9:15 And now, O Lord our God, that hast brought thy people forth out of the land of Egypt with a mighty hand, and hast gotten thee renown, as at this day; we have sinned, we have done wickedly.
Dan9:16 O LORD, according to all thy righteousness, I beseech thee, let thine anger and thy fury be turned away from thy city Jerusalem, thy holy mountain: because for our sins, and for the iniquities of our fathers, Jerusalem and thy people are become a reproach to all that are about us.
Dan9:17 Now therefore, O our God, hear the prayer of thy servant, and his supplications, and cause thy face to shine upon thy sanctuary that is desolate, for the Lord's sake.
Dan9:18 O my God, incline thine ear, and hear; open thine eyes, and behold our desolations, and the city which is called by thy name: for we do not present our supplications before thee for our righteousnesses, but for thy great mercies.
Dan9:19 O Lord, hear; O Lord, forgive; O Lord, hearken and do; defer not, for thine own sake, O my God: for thy city and thy people are called by thy name.
Dan9:20 And whiles I was speaking, and praying, and confessing my sin and the sin of my people Israel, and presenting my supplication before the LORD my God for the holy mountain of my God;
Dan9:21 Yea, whiles I was speaking in prayer, even the man Gabriel, whom I had seen in the vision at the beginning, being caused to fly swiftly, touched me about the time of the evening oblation.
Dan9:22 And he informeme, and talked with me, and said, O Daniel, I am now come forth to give thee skill and understanding.
Dan9:23 At the beginning of thy supplications the commandment came forth, and I am come to shew thee; for thou art greatly beloved: therefore understand the matter, and consider the vision.
Dan9:24 Seventy weeks are determined upon thy people and upon thy holy city, to finish the transgression, and to make an end of sins, and to make reconciliation for iniquity, and to bring in everlasting righteousness, and to seal up the vision and prophecy, and to anoint the most Holy.
Dan9:25 Know therefore and understand, that from the going forth of the commandment to restore and to build Jerusalem unto the Messiah the Prince shall be seven weeks, and threescore and two weeks: the street shall be built again, and the wall, even in troublous times.
Dan9:26 And after threescore and two weeks shall Messiah be cut off, but not for himself: and the people of the prince that shall come shall destroy the city and the sanctuary; and the end thereof shall be with a flood, and unto the end of the war desolations are determined.
Dan9:27 And he shall confirm the covenant with many for one week: and in the midst of the week he shall cause the sacrifice and the oblation to cease, and for the overspreading of abominations he shall make it desolate, even until the consummation, and that determined shall be poured upon the desolate.
Dan10:1 In the third year of Cyrus king of Persia a thing was revealed unto Daniel, whose name was called Belteshazzar; and the thing was true, but the time appointed was long: and he understood the thing, and had understanding of the vision.
Dan10:2 In those days I Daniel was mourning three full weeks.
Dan10:3 I ate no pleasant bread, neither came flesh nor wine in my mouth, neither did I anoint myself at all, till three whole weeks were fulfilled.
Dan10:4 And in the four and twentieth day of the first month, as I was by the side of the great river, which is Hiddekel;
Dan10:5 Then I lifted up mine eyes, and looked, and behold a certain man clothed in linen, whose loins were girded with fine gold of Uphaz:
Dan10:6 His body also was like the beryl, and his face as the appearance of lightning, and his eyes as lamps of fire, and his arms and his feet like in colour to polished brass, and the voice of his words like the voice of a multitude.
Dan10:7 And I Daniel alone saw the vision: for the men that were with me saw not the vision; but a great quaking fell upon them, so that they fled to hide themselves.
Dan10:8 Therefore I was left alone, and saw this great vision, and there remained no strength in me: for my comeliness was turned in me into corruption, and I retained no strength.
Dan10:9 Yet heard I the voice of his words: and when I heard the voice of his words, then was I in a deep sleep on my face, and my face toward the ground.
Dan10:10 And, behold, an hand touched me, which set me upon my knees and upon the palms of my hands.
Dan10:11 And he said unto me, O Daniel, a man greatly beloved, understand the words that I speak unto thee, and stand upright: for unto thee am I now sent. And when he had spoken this word unto me, I stood trembling.
Dan10:12 Then said he unto me, Fear not, Daniel: for from the first day that thou didst set thine heart to understand, and to chasten thyself before thy God, thy words were heard, and I am come for thy words.
Dan10:13 But the prince of the kingdom of Persia withstood me one and twenty days: but, lo, Michael, one of the chief princes, came to help me; and I remained there with the kings of Persia.
Dan10:14 Now I am come to make thee understand what shall befall thy people in the latter days: for yet the vision is for many days.
Dan10:15 And when he had spoken such words unto me, I set my face toward the ground, and I became dumb.
Dan10:16 And, behold, one like the similitude of the sons of men touched my lips: then I opened my mouth, and spake, and said unto him that stood before me, O my lord, by the vision my sorrows are turned upon me, and I have retained no strength.
Dan10:17 For how can the servant of this my lord talk with this my lord? for as for me, straightway there remained no strength in me, neither is there breath left in me.
Dan10:18 Then there came again and touched me one like the appearance of a man, and he strengthened me,
Dan10:19 And said, O man greatly beloved, fear not: peace be unto thee, be strong, yea, be strong. And when he had spoken unto me, I was strengthened, and said, Let my lord speak; for thou hast strengthened me.
Dan10:20 Then said he, Knowest thou wherefore I come unto thee? and now will I return to fight with the prince of Persia: and when I am gone forth, lo, the prince of Grecia shall come.
Dan10:21 But I will shew thee that which is noted in the scripture of truth: and there is none that holdeth with me in these things, but Michael your prince.
Dan11:1 Also I in the first year of Darius the Mede, even I, stood to confirm and to strengthen him.
Dan11:2 And now will I shew thee the truth. Behold, there shall stand up yet three kings in Persia; and the fourth shall be far richer than they all: and by his strength through his riches he shall stir up all against the realm of Grecia.
Dan11:3 And a mighty king shall stand up, that shall rule with great dominion, and do according to his will.
Dan11:4 And when he shall stand up, his kingdom shall be broken, and shall be divided toward the four winds of heaven; and not to his posterity, nor according to his dominion which he ruled: for his kingdom shall be plucked up, even for others beside those.
Dan11:5 And the king of the south shall be strong, and one of his princes; and he shall be strong above him, and have dominion; his dominion shall be a great dominion.
Dan11:6 And in the end of years they shall join themselves together; for the king's daughter of the south shall come to the king of the north to make an agreement: but she shall not retain the power of the arm; neither shall he stand, nor his arm: but she shall be given up, and they that brought her, and he that begat her, and he that strengthened her in these times.
Dan11:7 But out of a branch of her roots shall one stand up in his estate, which shall come with an army, and shall enter into the fortress of the king of the north, and shall deal against them, and shall prevail:
Dan11:8 And shall also carry captives into Egypt their gods, with their princes, and with their precious vessels of silver and of gold; and he shall continue more years than the king of the north.
Dan11:9 So the king of the south shall come into his kingdom, and shall return into his own land.
Dan11:10 But his sons shall be stirred up, and shall assemble a multitude of great forces: and one shall certainly come, and overflow, and pass through: then shall he return, and be stirred up, even to his fortress.
Dan11:11 And the king of the south shall be moved with choler, and shall come forth and fight with him, even with the king of the north: and he shall set forth a great multitude; but the multitude shall be given into his hand.
Dan11:12 And when he hath taken away the multitude, his heart shall be lifted up; and he shall cast down many ten thousands: but he shall not be strengthened by it.
Dan11:13 For the king of the north shall return, and shall set forth a multitude greater than the former, and shall certainly come after certain years with a great army and with much riches.
Dan11:14 And in those times there shall many stand up against the king of the south: also the robbers of thy people shall exalt themselves to establish the vision; but they shall fall.
Dan11:15 So the king of the north shall come, and cast up a mount, and take the most fenced cities: and the arms of the south shall not withstand, neither his chosen people, neither shall there be any strength to withstand.
Dan11:16 But he that cometh against him shall do according to his own will, and none shall stand before him: and he shall stand in the glorious land, which by his hand shall be consumed.
Dan11:17 He shall also set his face to enter with the strength of his whole kingdom, and upright ones with him; thus shall he doand he shall give him the daughter of women, corrupting her: but she shall not stand on his side, neither be for him.
Dan11:18 After this shall he turn his face unto the isles, and shall take many: but a prince for his own behalf shall cause the reproach offered by him to cease; without his own reproach he shall cause it to turn upon him.
Dan11:19 Then he shall turn his face toward the fort of his own land: but he shall stumble and fall, and not be found.
Dan11:20 Then shall stand up in his estate a raiser of taxes in the glory of the kingdom: but within few days he shall be destroyed, neither in anger, nor in battle.
Dan11:21 And in his estate shall stand up a vile person, to whom they shall not give the honour of the kingdom: but he shall come in peaceably, and obtain the kingdom by flatteries.
Dan11:22 And with the arms of a flood shall they be overflown from before him, and shall be broken; yea, also the prince of the covenant.
Dan11:23 And after the league made with him he shall work deceitfully: for he shall come up, and shall become strong with a small people.
Dan11:24 He shall enter peaceably even upon the fattest places of the province; and he shall do that which his fathers have not done, nor his fathers' fathers; he shall scatter among them the prey, and spoil, and riches: yea, and he shall forecast his devices against the strong holds, even for a time.
Dan11:25 And he shall stir up his power and his courage against the king of the south with a great army; and the king of the south shall be stirred up to battle with a very great and mighty army; but he shall not stand: for they shall forecast devices against him.
Dan11:26 Yea, they that feed of the portion of his meat shall destroy him, and his army shall overflow: and many shall fall down slain.
Dan11:27 And both these kings' hearts shall be to do mischief, and they shall speak lies at one table; but it shall not prosper: for yet the end shall be at the time appointed.
Dan11:28 Then shall he return into his land with great riches; and his heart shall be against the holy covenant; and he shall do exploits, and return to his own land.
Dan11:29 At the time appointed he shall return, and come toward the south; but it shall not be as the former, or as the latter.
Dan11:30 For the ships of Chittim shall come against him: therefore he shall be grieved, and return, and have indignation against the holy covenant: so shall he do; he shall even return, and have intelligence with them that forsake the holy covenant.
Dan11:31 And arms shall stand on his part, and they shall pollute the sanctuary of strength, and shall take away the daily sacrifice, and they shall place the abomination that maketh desolate.
Dan11:32 And such as do wickedly against the covenant shall he corrupt by flatteries: but the people that do know their God shall be strong, and do exploits.
Dan11:33 And they that understand among the people shall instruct many: yet they shall fall by the sword, and by flame, by captivity, and by spoil, many days.
Dan11:34 Now when they shall fall, they shall be holpen with a little help: but many shall cleave to them with flatteries.
Dan11:35 And some of them of understanding shall fall, to try them, and to purge, and to make them white, even to the time of the end: because it is yet for a time appointed.
Dan11:36 And the king shall do according to his will; and he shall exalt himself, and magnify himself above every god, and shall speak marvellous things against the God of gods, and shall prosper till the indignation be accomplished: for that that is determined shall be done.
Dan11:37 Neither shall he regard the God of his fathers, nor the desire of women, nor regard any god: for he shall magnify himself above all.
Dan11:38 But in his estate shall he honour the God of forces: and a god whom his fathers knew not shall he honour with gold, and silver, and with precious stones, and pleasant things.
Dan11:39 Thus shall he do in the most strong holds with a strange god, whom he shall acknowledge and increase with glory: and he shall cause them to rule over many, and shall divide the land for gain.
Dan11:40 And at the time of the end shall the king of the south push at him: and the king of the north shall come against him like a whirlwind, with chariots, and with horsemen, and with many ships; and he shall enter into the countries, and shall overflow and pass over.
Dan11:41 He shall enter also into the glorious land, and many countries shall be overthrown: but these shall escape out of his hand, even Edom, and Moab, and the chief of the children of Ammon.
Dan11:42 He shall stretch forth his hand also upon the countries: and the land of Egypt shall not escape.
Dan11:43 But he shall have power over the treasures of gold and of silver, and over all the precious things of Egypt: and the Libyans and the Ethiopians shall be at his steps.
Dan11:44 But tidings out of the east and out of the north shall trouble him: therefore he shall go forth with great fury to destroy, and utterly to make away many.
Dan11:45 And he shall plant the tabernacles of his palace between the seas in the glorious holy mountain; yet he shall come to his end, and none shall help him.
Dan12:1 And at that time shall Michael stand up, the great prince which standeth for the children of thy people: and there shall be a time of trouble, such as never was since there was a nation even to that same time: and at that time thy people shall be delivered, every one that shall be found written in the book.
Dan12:2 And many of them that sleep in the dust of the earth shall awake, some to everlasting life, and some to shame and everlasting contempt.
Dan12:3 And they that be wise shall shine as the brightness of the firmament; and they that turn many to righteousness as the stars for ever and ever.
Dan12:4 But thou, O Daniel, shut up the words, and seal the book, even to the time of the end: many shall run to and fro, and knowledge shall be increased.
Dan12:5 Then I Daniel looked, and, behold, there stood other two, the one on this side of the bank of the river, and the other on that side of the bank of the river.
Dan12:6 And one said to the man clothed in linen, which was upon the waters of the river, How long shall it be to the end of these wonders?
Dan12:7 And I heard the man clothed in linen, which was upon the waters of the river, when he held up his right hand and his left hand unto heaven, and sware by him that liveth for ever that it shall be for a time, times, and an half; and when he shall have accomplished to scatter the power of the holy people, all these things shall be finished.
Dan12:8 And I heard, but I understood not: then said I, O my Lord, what shall be the end of these things?
Dan12:9 And he said, Go thy way, Daniel: for the words are closed up and sealed till the time of the end.
Dan12:10 Many shall be purified, and made white, and tried; but the wicked shall do wickedly: and none of the wicked shall understand; but the wise shall understand.
Dan12:11 And from the time that the daily sacrifice shall be taken away, and the abomination that maketh desolate set up, there shall be a thousand two hundred and ninety days.
Dan12:12 Blessed is he that waiteth, and cometh to the thousand three hundred and five and thirty days.
Dan12:13 But go thou thy way till the end be: for thou shalt rest, and stand in thy lot at the end of the days.
Hos1:1 The word of the LORD that came unto Hosea, the son of Beeri, in the days of Uzziah, Jotham, Ahaz, and Hezekiah, kings of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam the son of Joash, king of Israel.
Hos1:2 The beginning of the word of the LORD by Hosea. And the LORD said to Hosea, Go, take unto thee a wife of whoredoms and children of whoredoms: for the land hath committed great whoredom, departing from the LORD.
Hos1:3 So he went and took Gomer the daughter of Diblaim; which conceived, and bare him a son.
Hos1:4 And the LORD said unto him, Call his name Jezreel; for yet a little while, and I will avenge the blood of Jezreel upon the house of Jehu, and will cause to cease the kingdom of the house of Israel.
Hos1:5 And it shall come to pass at that day, that I will break the bow of Israel in tifice kiss the calves.
Hos13:3 Therefore they shall be as the morning cloud, and as the early dew that passeth away, as the chaff that is driven with the whirlwind out of the floor, and as the smoke out of the chimney.
Hos13:4 Yet I am the LORD thy God from the land of Egypt, and thou shalt know no god but me: for there is no saviour beside me.
Hos13:5 I did know thee in the wilderness, in the land of great drought.
Hos13:6 According to their pasture, so were they filled; they were filled, and their heart was exalted; therefore have they forgotten me.
Hos13:7 Therefore I will be unto them as a lion: as a leopard by the way will I observe them:
Hos13:8 I will meet them as a bear that is bereaved of her whelps, and will rend the caul of their heart, and there will I devour them like a lion: the wild beast shall tear them.
Hos13:9 O Israel, thou hast destroyed thyself; but in me is thine help.
Hos13:10 I will be thy king: where is any other that may save thee in all thy cities? and thy judges of whom thou saidst, Give me a king and princes?
Hos13:11 I gave thee a king in mine anger, and took him away in my wrath.
Hos13:12 The iniquity of Ephraim is bound up; his sin is hid.
Hos13:13 The sorrows of a travailing woman shall come upon him: he is an unwise son; for he should not stay long in the place of the breaking forth of children.
Hos13:14 I will ransom them from the power of the grave; I will redeem them from death: O death, I will be thy plagues; O grave, I will be thy destruction: repentance shall be hid from mine eyes.
Hos13:15 Though he be fruitful among his brethren, an east wind shall come, the wind of the LORD shall come up from the wilderness, and his spring shall become dry, and his fountain shall be dried up: he shall spoil the treasure of all pleasant vessels.
Hos13:16 Samaria shall become desolate; for she hath rebelled against her God: they shall fall by the sword: their infants shall be dashed in pieces, and their women with child shall be ripped up.
Hos14:1 O Israel, return unto the LORD thy God; for thou hast fallen by thine iniquity.
Hos14:2 Take with you words, and turn to the LORD: say unto him, Take away all iniquity, and receive us graciously: so will we render the calves of our lips.
Hos14:3 Asshur shall not save us; we will not ride upon horses: neither will we say any more to the work of our hands, Ye are our gods: for in thee the fatherless findeth mercy.
Hos14:4 I will heal their backsliding, I will love them freely: for mine anger is turned away from him.
Hos14:5 I will be as the dew unto Israel: he shall grow as the lily, and cast forth his roots as Lebanon.
Hos14:6 His branches shall spread, and his beauty shall be as the olive tree, and his smell as Lebanon.
Hos14:7 They that dwell under his shadow shall return; they shall revive as the corn, and grow as the vine: the scent thereof shall be as the wine of Lebanon.
Hos14:8 Ephraim shall say, What have I to do any more with idols? I have heard him, and observed him: I am like a green fir tree. From me is thy fruit found.
Hos14:9 Who is wise, and he shall understand these things? prudent, and he shall know them? for the ways of the LORD are right, and the just shall walk in them: but the transgressors shall fall therein.
Joel1:1 The word of the LORD that came to Joel the son of Pethuel.
Joel1:2 Hear this, ye old men, and give ear, all ye inhabitants of the land. Hath this been in your days, or even in the days of your fathers?
Joel1:3 Tell ye your children of it, and let your children tell their children, and their children another generation.
Joel1:4 That which the palmerworm hath left hath the locust eaten; and that which the locust hath left hath the cankerworm eaten; and that which the cankerworm hath left hath the caterpiller eaten.
Joel1:5 Awake, ye drunkards, and weep; and howl, all ye drinkers of wine, because of the new wine; for it is cut off from your mouth.
Joel1:6 For a nation is come up upon my land, strong, and without number, whose teeth are the teeth of a lion, and he hath the cheek teeth of a great lion.
Joel1:7 He hath laid my vine waste, and barked my fig tree: he hath made it clean bare, and cast it away; the branches thereof are made white.
Joel1:8 Lament like a virgin girded with sackcloth for the husband of her youth.
Joel1:9 The meat offering and the drink offering is cut off from the house of the LORD; the priests, the LORD's ministers, mourn.
Joel1:10 The field is wasted, the land mourneth; for the corn is wasted: the new wine is dried up, the oil languisheth.
Joel1:11 Be ye ashamed, O ye husbandmen; howl, O ye vinedressers, for the wheat and for the barley; because the harvest of the field is perished.
Joel1:12 The vine is dried up, and the fig tree languisheth; the pomegranate tree, the palm tree also, and the apple tree, even all the trees of the field, are withered: because joy is withered away from the sons of men.
Joel1:13 Gird yourselves, and lament, ye priests: howl, ye ministers of the altar: come, lie all night in sackcloth, ye ministers of my God: for the meat offering and the drink offering is withholden from the house of your God.
Joel1:14 Sanctify ye a fast, call a solemn assembly, gather the elders and all the inhabitants of the land into the house of the LORD your God, and cry unto the LORD.
Joel1:15 Alas for the day! for the day of the LORD is at hand, and as a destruction from the Almighty shall it come.
Joel1:16 Is not the meat cut off before our eyes, yea, joy and gladness from the house of our God?
Joel1:17 The seed is rotten under their clods, the garners are laid desolate, the barns are broken down; for the corn is withered.
Joel1:18 How do the beasts groan! the herds of cattle are perplexed, because they have no pasture; yea, the flocks of sheep are made desolate.
Joel1:19 O LORD, to thee will I cry: for the fire hath devoured the pastures of the wilderness, and the flame hath burned all the trees of the field.
Joel1:20 The beasts of the field cry also unto thee: for the rivers of waters are dried up, and the fire hath devoured the pastures of the wilderness.
Joel2:1 Blow ye the trumpet in Zion, and sound an alarm in my holy mountain: let all the inhabitants of the land tremble: for the day of the LORD cometh, for it is nigh at hand;
Joel2:2 A day of darkness and of gloominess, a day of clouds and of thick darkness, as the morning spread upon the mountains: a great people and a strong; there hath not been ever the like, neither shall be any more after it, even to the years of many generations.
Joel2:3 A fire devoureth before them; and behind them a flame burneth: the land is as the garden of Eden before them, and behind them a desolate wilderness; yea, and nothing shall escape them.
Joel2:4 The appearance of them is as the appearance of horses; and as horsemen, so shall they run.
Joel2:5 Like the noise of chariots on the tops of mountains shall they leap, like the noise of a flame of fire that devoureth the stubble, as a strong people set in battle array.
Joel2:6 Before their face the people shall be much pained: all faces shall gather blackness.
Joel2:7 They shall run like mighty men; they shall climb the wall like men of war; and they shall march every one on his ways, and they shall not break their ranks:
Joel2:8 Neither shall one thrust another; they shall walk every one in his path: and when they fall upon the sword, they shall not be wounded.
Joel2:9 They shall run to and fro in the city; they shall run upon the wall, they shall climb up upon the houses; they shall enter in at the windows like a thief.
Joel2:10 The earth shall quake before them; the heavens shall tremble: the sun and the moon shall be dark, and the stars shall withdraw their shining:
Joel2:11 And the LORD shall utter his voice before his army: for his camp is very great: for he is strong that executeth his word: for the day of the LORD is great and very terrible; and who can abide it?
Joel2:12 Therefore also now, saith the LORD, turn ye even to me with all your heart, and with fasting, and with weeping, and with mourning:
Joel2:13 And rend your heart, and not your garments, and turn unto the LORD your God: for he is gracious and mercifu slow to anger, and of great kindness, and repenteth him of the evil.
Joel2:14 Who knoweth if he will return and repent, and leave a blessing behind him; even a meat offering and a drink offering unto the LORD your God?
Joel2:15 Blow the trumpet in Zion, sanctify a fast, call a solemn assembly:
Joel2:16 Gather the people, sanctify the congregation, assemble the elders, gather the children, and those that suck the breasts: let the bridegroom go forth of his chamber, and the bride out of her closet.
Joel2:17 Let the priests, the ministers of the LORD, weep between the porch and the altar, and let them say, Spare thy people, O LORD, and give not thine heritage to reproach, that the heathen should rule over them: wherefore should they say among the people, Where is their God?
Joel2:18 Then will the LORD be jealous for his land, and pity his people.
Joel2:19 Yea, the LORD will answer and say unto his people, Behold, I will send you corn, and wine, and oil, and ye shall be satisfied therewith: and I will no more make you a reproach among the heathen:
Joel2:20 But I will remove far off from you the northern army, and will drive him into a land barren and desolate, with his face toward the east sea, and his hinder part toward the utmost sea, and his stink shall come up, and his ill savour shall come up, because he hath done great things.
Joel2:21 Fear not, O land; be glad and rejoice: for the LORD will do great things.
Joel2:22 Be not afraid, ye beasts of the field: for the pastures of the wilderness do spring, for the tree beareth her fruit, the fig tree and the vine do yield their strength.
Joel2:23 Be glad then, ye children of Zion, and rejoice in the LORD your God: for he hath given you the former rain moderately, and he will cause to come down for you the rain, the former rain, and the latter rain in the first month.
Joel2:24 And the floors shall be full of wheat, and the vats shall overflow with wine and oil.
Joel2:25 And I will restore to you the years that the locust hath eaten, the cankerworm, and the caterpiller, and the palmerworm, my great army which I sent among you.
Joel2:26 And ye shall eat in plenty, and be satisfied, and praise the name of the LORD your God, that hath dealt wondrously with you: and my people shall never be ashamed.
Joel2:27 And ye shall know that I am in the midst of Israel, and that I am the LORD your God, and none else: and my people shall never be ashamed.
Joel2:28 And it shall come to pass afterward, that I will pour out my spirit upon all flesh; and your sons and your daughters shall prophesy, your old men shall dream dreams, your young men shall see visions:
Joel2:29 And also upon the servants and upon the handmaids in those days will I pour out my spirit.
Joel2:30 And I will shew wonders in the heavens and in the earth, blood, and fire, and pillars of smoke.
Joel2:31 The sun shall be turned into darkness, and the moon into blood, before the great and the terrible day of the LORD come.
Joel2:32 And it shall come to pass, that whosoever shall call on the name of the LORD shall be delivered: for in mount Zion and in Jerusalem shall be deliverance, as the LORD hath said, and in the remnant whom the LORD shall call.
Joel3:1 For, behold, in those days, and in that time, when I shall bring again the captivity of Judah and Jerusalem,
Joel3:2 I will also gather all nations, and will bring them down into the valley of Jehoshaphat, and will plead with them there for my people and for my heritage Israel, whom they have scattered among the nations, and parted my land.
Joel3:3 And they have cast lots for my people; and have given a boy for an harlot, and sold a girl for wine, that they might drink.
Joel3:4 Yea, and what have ye to do with me, O Tyre, and Zidon, and all the coasts of Palestine? will ye render me a recompence? and if ye recompense me, swiftly and speedily will I return your recompence upon your own head;
Joel3:5 Because ye have taken my silver and my gold, and have carried into your temples my goodly pleasant things:
Joel3:6 The children also of Judah and the children of Jerusalem have ye sold unto the Grecians, that ye might remove them far from their border.
Joel3:7 Behold, I will raise them out of the place whither ye have sold them, and will return your recompence upon your own head:
Joel3:8 And I will sell your sons and your daughters into the hand of the children of Judah, and they shall sell them to the Sabeans, to a people far off: for the LORD hath spoken it.
Joel3:9 Proclaim ye this among the Gentiles; Prepare war, wake up the mighty men, let all the men of war draw near; let them come up:
Joel3:10 Beat your plowshares into swords, and your pruninghooks into spears: let the weak say, I am strong.
Joel3:11 Assemble yourselves, and come, all ye heathen, and gather yourselves together round about: thither cause thy mighty ones to come down, O LORD.
Joel3:12 Let the heathen be wakened, and come up to the valley of Jehoshaphat: for there will I sit to judge all the heathen round about.
Joel3:13 Put ye in the sickle, for the harvest is ripe: come, get you down; for the press is full, the fats overflow; for their wickedness is great.
Joel3:14 Multitudes, multitudes in the valley of decision: for the day of the LORD is near in the valley of decision.
Joel3:15 The sun and the moon shall be darkened, and the stars shall withdraw their shining.
Joel3:16 The LORD also shall roar out of Zion, and utter his voice from Jerusalem; and the heavens and the earth shall shake: but the LORD will be the hope of his people, and the strength of the children of Israel.
Joel3:17 So shall ye know that I am the LORD your God dwelling in Zion, my holy mountain: then shall Jerusalem be holy, and there shall no strangers pass through her any more.
Joel3:18 And it shall come to pass in that day, that the mountains shall drop down new wine, and the hills shall flow with milk, and all the rivers of Judah shall flow with waters, and a fountain shall come forth of the house of the LORD, and shall water the valley of Shittim.
Joel3:19 Egypt shall be a desolation, and Edom shall be a desolate wilderness, for the violence against the children of Judah, because they have shed innocent blood in their land.
Joel3:20 But Judah shall dwell for ever, and Jerusalem from generation to generation.
Joel3:21 For I will cleanse their blood that I have not cleansed: for the LORD dwelleth in Zion.
Amos1:1 The words of Amos, who was among the herdmen of Tekoa, which he saw concerning Israel in the days of Uzziah king of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam the son of Joash king of Israel, two years before the earthquake.
Amos1:2 And he said, The LORD will roar from Zion, and utter his voice from Jerusalem; and the habitations of the shepherds shall mourn, and the top of Carmel shall wither.
Amos1:3 Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Damascus, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have threshed Gilead with threshing instruments of iron:
Amos1:4 But I will send a fire into the house of Hazael, which shall devour the palaces of Benhadad.
Amos1:5 I will break also the bar of Damascus, and cut off the inhabitant from the plain of Aven, and him that holdeth the sceptre from the house of Eden: and the people of Syria shall go into captivity unto Kir, saith the LORD.
Amos1:6 Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Gaza, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they carried away captive the whole captivity, to deliver them up to Edom:
Amos1:7 But I will send a fire on the wall of Gaza, which shall devour the palaces thereof:
Amos1:8 And I will cut off the inhabitant from Ashdod, and him that holdeth the sceptre from Ashkelon, and I will turn mine hand against Ekron: and the remnant of the Philistines shall perish, saith the Lord GOD.
Amos1:9 Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Tyrus, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they delivered up the whole captivity to Edom, and remembered not the brotherly covenant:
Amos1:10 But I will send a fire on the wall of Tyrus, which shall devour the palaces thereof.
Amos1:11 Thus saith the LORD; F three transgressions of Edom, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because he did pursue his brother with the sword, and did cast off all pity, and his anger did tear perpetually, and he kept his wrath for ever:
Amos1:12 But I will send a fire upon Teman, which shall devour the palaces of Bozrah.
Amos1:13 Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of the children of Ammon, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have ripped up the women with child of Gilead, that they might enlarge their border:
Amos1:14 But I will kindle a fire in the wall of Rabbah, and it shall devour the palaces thereof, with shouting in the day of battle, with a tempest in the day of the whirlwind:
Amos1:15 And their king shall go into captivity, he and his princes together, saith the LORD.
Amos2:1 Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Moab, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because he burned the bones of the king of Edom into lime:
Amos2:2 But I will send a fire upon Moab, and it shall devour the palaces of Kirioth: and Moab shall die with tumult, with shouting, and with the sound of the trumpet:
Amos2:3 And I will cut off the judge from the midst thereof, and will slay all the princes thereof with him, saith the LORD.
Amos2:4 Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Judah, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have despised the law of the LORD, and have not kept his commandments, and their lies caused them to err, after the which their fathers have walked:
Amos2:5 But I will send a fire upon Judah, and it shall devour the palaces of Jerusalem.
Amos2:6 Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Israel, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they sold the righteous for silver, and the poor for a pair of shoes;
Amos2:7 That pant after the dust of the earth on the head of the poor, and turn aside the way of the meek: and a man and his father will go in unto the same maid, to profane my holy name:
Amos2:8 And they lay themselves down upon clothes laid to pledge by every altar, and they drink the wine of the condemned in the house of their god.
Amos2:9 Yet destroyed I the Amorite before them, whose height was like the height of the cedars, and he was strong as the oaks; yet I destroyed his fruit from above, and his roots from beneath.
Amos2:10 Also I brought you up from the land of Egypt, and led you forty years through the wilderness, to possess the land of the Amorite.
Amos2:11 And I raised up of your sons for prophets, and of your young men for Nazarites. Is it not even thus, O ye children of Israel? saith the LORD.
Amos2:12 But ye gave the Nazarites wine to drink; and commanded the prophets, saying, Prophesy not.
Amos2:13 Behold, I am pressed under you, as a cart is pressed that is full of sheaves.
Amos2:14 Therefore the flight shall perish from the swift, and the strong shall not strengthen his force, neither shall the mighty deliver himself:
Amos2:15 Neither shall he stand that handleth the bow; and he that is swift of foot shall not deliver himself: neither shall he that rideth the horse deliver himself.
Amos2:16 And he that is courageous among the mighty shall flee away naked in that day, saith the LORD.
Amos3:1 Hear this word that the LORD hath spoken against you, O children of Israel, against the whole family which I brought up from the land of Egypt, saying,
Amos3:2 You only have I known of all the families of the earth: therefore I will punish you for all your iniquities.
Amos3:3 Can two walk together, except they be agreed?
Amos3:4 Will a lion roar in the forest, when he hath no prey? will a young lion cry out of his den, if he have taken nothing?
Amos3:5 Can a bird fall in a snare upon the earth, where no gin is for him? shall one take up a snare from the earth, and have taken nothing at all?
Amos3:6 Shall a trumpet be blown in the city, and the people not be afraid? shall there be evil in a city, and the LORD hath not done it?
Amos3:7 Surely the Lord GOD will do nothing, but he revealeth his secret unto his servants the prophets.
Amos3:8 The lion hath roared, who will not fear? the Lord GOD hath spoken, who can but prophesy?
Amos3:9 Publish in the palaces at Ashdod, and in the palaces in the land of Egypt, and say, Assemble yourselves upon the mountains of Samaria, and behold the great tumults in the midst thereof, and the oppressed in the midst thereof.
Amos3:10 For they know not to do right, saith the LORD, who store up violence and robbery in their palaces.
Amos3:11 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; An adversary there shall be even round about the land; and he shall bring down thy strength from thee, and thy palaces shall be spoiled.
Amos3:12 Thus saith the LORD; As the shepherd taketh out of the mouth of the lion two legs, or a piece of an ear; so shall the children of Israel be taken out that dwell in Samaria in the corner of a bed, and in Damascus in a couch.
Amos3:13 Hear ye, and testify in the house of Jacob, saith the Lord GOD, the God of hosts,
Amos3:14 That in the day that I shall visit the transgressions of Israel upon him I will also visit the altars of Bethel: and the horns of the altar shall be cut off, and fall to the ground.
Amos3:15 And I will smite the winter house with the summer house; and the houses of ivory shall perish, and the great houses shall have an end, saith the LORD.
Amos4:1 Hear this word, ye kine of Bashan, that are in the mountain of Samaria, which oppress the poor, which crush the needy, which say to their masters, Bring, and let us drink.
Amos4:2 The Lord GOD hath sworn by his holiness, that, lo, the days shall come upon you, that he will take you away with hooks, and your posterity with fishhooks.
Amos4:3 And ye shall go out at the breaches, every cow at that which is before her; and ye shall cast them into the palace, saith the LORD.
Amos4:4 Come to Bethel, and transgress; at Gilgal multiply transgression; and bring your sacrifices every morning, and your tithes after three years:
Amos4:5 And offer a sacrifice of thanksgiving with leaven, and proclaim and publish the free offerings: for this liketh you, O ye children of Israel, saith the Lord GOD.
Amos4:6 And I also have given you cleanness of teeth in all your cities, and want of bread in all your places: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD.
Amos4:7 And also I have withholden the rain from you, when there were yet three months to the harvest: and I caused it to rain upon one city, and caused it not to rain upon another city: one piece was rained upon, and the piece whereupon it rained not withered.
Amos4:8 So two or three cities wandered unto one city, to drink water; but they were not satisfied: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD.
Amos4:9 I have smitten you with blasting and mildew: when your gardens and your vineyards and your fig trees and your olive trees increased, the palmerworm devoured them: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD.
Amos4:10 I have sent among you the pestilence after the manner of Egypt: your young men have I slain with the sword, and have taken away your horses; and I have made the stink of your camps to come up unto your nostrils: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD.
Amos4:11 I have overthrown some of you, as God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah, and ye were as a firebrand plucked out of the burning: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD.
Amos4:12 Therefore thus will I do unto thee, O Israel: and because I will do this unto thee, prepare to meet thy God, O Israel.
Amos4:13 For, lo, he that formeth the mountains, and createth the wind, and declareth unto man what is his thought, that maketh the morning darkness, and treadeth upon the high places of the earth, The LORD, The God of hosts, is his name.
Amos5:1 Hear ye this word which I take up against you, even a lamentation, O house of Israel.
Amos5:2 The virgin of Israel is fallen; she shall no more rise: she is forsaken upon her land; there is none to raise her up.
Amos5:3 For thus saith the Lord GOD; The city that went out by a thousand shall leave an hundred, and ion of Jacob is all this, and for the sins of the house of Israel. What is the transgression of Jacob? is it not Samaria? and what are the high places of Judah? are they not Jerusalem?
Mic1:6 Therefore I will make Samaria as an heap of the field, and as plantings of a vineyard: and I will pour down the stones thereof into the valley, and I will discover the foundations thereof.
Mic1:7 And all the graven images thereof shall be beaten to pieces, and all the hires thereof shall be burned with the fire, and all the idols thereof will I lay desolate: for she gathered it of the hire of an harlot, and they shall return to the hire of an harlot.
Mic1:8 Therefore I will wail and howl, I will go stripped and naked: I will make a wailing like the dragons, and mourning as the owls.
Mic1:9 For her wound is incurable; for it is come unto Judah; he is come unto the gate of my people, even to Jerusalem.
Mic1:10 Declare ye it not at Gath, weep ye not at all: in the house of Aphrah roll thyself in the dust.
Mic1:11 Pass ye away, thou inhabitant of Saphir, having thy shame naked: the inhabitant of Zaanan came not forth in the mourning of Bethezel; he shall receive of you his standing.
Mic1:12 For the inhabitant of Maroth waited carefully for good: but evil came down from the LORD unto the gate of Jerusalem.
Mic1:13 O thou inhabitant of Lachish, bind the chariot to the swift beast: she is the beginning of the sin to the daughter of Zion: for the transgressions of Israel were found in thee.
Mic1:14 Therefore shalt thou give presents to Moreshethgath: the houses of Achzib shall be a lie to the kings of Israel.
Mic1:15 Yet will I bring an heir unto thee, O inhabitant of Mareshah: he shall come unto Adullam the glory of Israel.
Mic1:16 Make thee bald, and poll thee for thy delicate children; enlarge thy baldness as the eagle; for they are gone into captivity from thee.
Mic2:1 Woe to them that devise iniquity, and work evil upon their beds! when the morning is light, they practise it, because it is in the power of their hand.
Mic2:2 And they covet fields, and take them by violence; and houses, and take them away: so they oppress a man and his house, even a man and his heritage.
Mic2:3 Therefore thus saith the LORD; Behold, against this family do I devise an evil, from which ye shall not remove your necks; neither shall ye go haughtily: for this time is evil.
Mic2:4 In that day shall one take up a parable against you, and lament with a doleful lamentation, and say, We be utterly spoiled: he hath changed the portion of my people: how hath he removed it from me! turning away he hath divided our fields.
Mic2:5 Therefore thou shalt have none that shall cast a cord by lot in the congregation of the LORD.
Mic2:6 Prophesy ye not, say they to them that prophesy: they shall not prophesy to them, that they shall not take shame.
Mic2:7 O thou that art named the house of Jacob, is the spirit of the LORD straitened? are these his doings? do not my words do good to him that walketh uprightly?
Mic2:8 Even of late my people is risen up as an enemy: ye pull off the robe with the garment from them that pass by securely as men averse from war.
Mic2:9 The women of my people have ye cast out from their pleasant houses; from their children have ye taken away my glory for ever.
Mic2:10 Arise ye, and depart; for this is not your rest: because it is polluted, it shall destroy you, even with a sore destruction.
Mic2:11 If a man walking in the spirit and falsehood do lie, saying, I will prophesy unto thee of wine and of strong drink; he shall even be the prophet of this people.
Mic2:12 I will surely assemble, O Jacob, all of thee; I will surely gather the remnant of Israel; I will put them together as the sheep of Bozrah, as the flock in the midst of their fold: they shall make great noise by reason of the multitude of men.
Mic2:13 The breaker is come up before them: they have broken up, and have passed through the gate, and are gone out by it: and their king shall pass before them, and the LORD on the head of them.
Mic3:1 And I said, Hear, I pray you, O heads of Jacob, and ye princes of the house of Israel; Is it not for you to know judgment?
Mic3:2 Who hate the good, and love the evil; who pluck off their skin from off them, and their flesh from off their bones;
Mic3:3 Who also eat the flesh of my people, and flay their skin from off them; and they break their bones, and chop them in pieces, as for the pot, and as flesh within the caldron.
Mic3:4 Then shall they cry unto the LORD, but he will not hear them: he will even hide his face from them at that time, as they have behaved themselves ill in their doings.
Mic3:5 Thus saith the LORD concerning the prophets that make my people err, that bite with their teeth, and cry, Peace; and he that putteth not into their mouths, they even prepare war against him.
Mic3:6 Therefore night shall be unto you, that ye shall not have a vision; and it shall be dark unto you, that ye shall not divine; and the sun shall go down over the prophets, and the day shall be dark over them.
Mic3:7 Then shall the seers be ashamed, and the diviners confounded: yea, they shall all cover their lips; for there is no answer of God.
Mic3:8 But truly I am full of power by the spirit of the LORD, and of judgment, and of might, to declare unto Jacob his transgression, and to Israel his sin.
Mic3:9 Hear this, I pray you, ye heads of the house of Jacob, and princes of the house of Israel, that abhor judgment, and pervert all equity.
Mic3:10 They build up Zion with blood, and Jerusalem with iniquity.
Mic3:11 The heads thereof judge for reward, and the priests thereof teach for hire, and the prophets thereof divine for money: yet will they lean upon the LORD, and say, Is not the LORD among us? none evil can come upon us.
Mic3:12 Therefore shall Zion for your sake be plowed as a field, and Jerusalem shall become heaps, and the mountain of the house as the high places of the forest.
Mic4:1 But in the last days it shall come to pass, that the mountain of the house of the LORD shall be established in the top of the mountains, and it shall be exalted above the hills; and people shall flow unto it.
Mic4:2 And many nations shall come, and say, Come, and let us go up to the mountain of the LORD, and to the house of the God of Jacob; and he will teach us of his ways, and we will walk in his paths: for the law shall go forth of Zion, and the word of the LORD from Jerusalem.
Mic4:3 And he shall judge among many people, and rebuke strong nations afar off; and they shall beat their swords into plowshares, and their spears into pruninghooks: nation shall not lift up a sword against nation, neither shall they learn war any more.
Mic4:4 But they shall sit every man under his vine and under his fig tree; and none shall make them afraid: for the mouth of the LORD of hosts hath spoken it.
Mic4:5 For all people will walk every one in the name of his god, and we will walk in the name of the LORD our God for ever and ever.
Mic4:6 In that day, saith the LORD, will I assemble her that halteth, and I will gather her that is driven out, and her that I have afflicted;
Mic4:7 And I will make her that halted a remnant, and her that was cast far off a strong nation: and the LORD shall reign over them in mount Zion from henceforth, even for ever.
Mic4:8 And thou, O tower of the flock, the strong hold of the daughter of Zion, unto thee shall it come, even the first dominion; the kingdom shall come to the daughter of Jerusalem.
Mic4:9 Now why dost thou cry out aloud? is there no king in thee? is thy counsellor perished? for pangs have taken thee as a woman in travail.
Mic4:10 Be in pain, and labour to bring forth, O daughter of Zion, like a woman in travail: for now shalt thou go forth out of the city, and thou shalt dwell in the field, and thou shalt go even to Babylon; there shalt thou be delivered; there the LORD shall redeem thee from the hand of thine enemies.
Mic4:11 Now also many nations are gathered against thee, that say, Let her be defiled, and let our eye look upon Zion.
Mic4:12 But they know not the thoughts of the LORD, neither understand they his counsel: for he shall gather them as the sheaveinto the floor.
Mic4:13 Arise and thresh, O daughter of Zion: for I will make thine horn iron, and I will make thy hoofs brass: and thou shalt beat in pieces many people: and I will consecrate their gain unto the LORD, and their substance unto the Lord of the whole earth.
Mic5:1 Now gather thyself in troops, O daughter of troops: he hath laid siege against us: they shall smite the judge of Israel with a rod upon the cheek.
Mic5:2 But thou, Bethlehem Ephratah, though thou be little among the thousands of Judah, yet out of thee shall he come forth unto me that is to be ruler in Israel; whose goings forth have been from of old, from everlasting.
Mic5:3 Therefore will he give them up, until the time that she which travaileth hath brought forth: then the remnant of his brethren shall return unto the children of Israel.
Mic5:4 And he shall stand and feed in the strength of the LORD, in the majesty of the name of the LORD his God; and they shall abide: for now shall he be great unto the ends of the earth.
Mic5:5 And this man shall be the peace, when the Assyrian shall come into our land: and when he shall tread in our palaces, then shall we raise against him seven shepherds, and eight principal men.
Mic5:6 And they shall waste the land of Assyria with the sword, and the land of Nimrod in the entrances thereof: thus shall he deliver us from the Assyrian, when he cometh into our land, and when he treadeth within our borders.
Mic5:7 And the remnant of Jacob shall be in the midst of many people as a dew from the LORD, as the showers upon the grass, that tarrieth not for man, nor waiteth for the sons of men.
Mic5:8 And the remnant of Jacob shall be among the Gentiles in the midst of many people as a lion among the beasts of the forest, as a young lion among the flocks of sheep: who, if he go through, both treadeth down, and teareth in pieces, and none can deliver.
Mic5:9 Thine hand shall be lifted up upon thine adversaries, and all thine enemies shall be cut off.
Mic5:10 And it shall come to pass in that day, saith the LORD, that I will cut off thy horses out of the midst of thee, and I will destroy thy chariots:
Mic5:11 And I will cut off the cities of thy land, and throw down all thy strong holds:
Mic5:12 And I will cut off witchcrafts out of thine hand; and thou shalt have no more soothsayers:
Mic5:13 Thy graven images also will I cut off, and thy standing images out of the midst of thee; and thou shalt no more worship the work of thine hands.
Mic5:14 And I will pluck up thy groves out of the midst of thee: so will I destroy thy cities.
Mic5:15 And I will execute vengeance in anger and fury upon the heathen, such as they have not heard.
Mic6:1 Hear ye now what the LORD saith; Arise, contend thou before the mountains, and let the hills hear thy voice.
Mic6:2 Hear ye, O mountains, the LORD's controversy, and ye strong foundations of the earth: for the LORD hath a controversy with his people, and he will plead with Israel.
Mic6:3 O my people, what have I done unto thee? and wherein have I wearied thee? testify against me.
Mic6:4 For I brought thee up out of the land of Egypt, and redeemed thee out of the house of servants; and I sent before thee Moses, Aaron, and Miriam.
Mic6:5 O my people, remember now what Balak king of Moab consulted, and what Balaam the son of Beor answered him from Shittim unto Gilgal; that ye may know the righteousness of the LORD.
Mic6:6 Wherewith shall I come before the LORD, and bow myself before the high God? shall I come before him with burnt offerings, with calves of a year old?
Mic6:7 Will the LORD be pleased with thousands of rams, or with ten thousands of rivers of oil? shall I give my firstborn for my transgression, the fruit of my body for the sin of my soul?
Mic6:8 He hath shewed thee, O man, what is good; and what doth the LORD require of thee, but to do justly, and to love mercy, and to walk humbly with thy God?
Mic6:9 The LORD's voice crieth unto the city, and the man of wisdom shall see thy name: hear ye the rod, and who hath appointed it.
Mic6:10 Are there yet the treasures of wickedness in the house of the wicked, and the scant measure that is abominable?
Mic6:11 Shall I count them pure with the wicked balances, and with the bag of deceitful weights?
Mic6:12 For the rich men thereof are full of violence, and the inhabitants thereof have spoken lies, and their tongue is deceitful in their mouth.
Mic6:13 Therefore also will I make thee sick in smiting thee, in making thee desolate because of thy sins.
Mic6:14 Thou shalt eat, but not be satisfied; and thy casting down shall be in the midst of thee; and thou shalt take hold, but shalt not deliver; and that which thou deliverest will I give up to the sword.
Mic6:15 Thou shalt sow, but thou shalt not reap; thou shalt tread the olives, but thou shalt not anoint thee with oil; and sweet wine, but shalt not drink wine.
Mic6:16 For the statutes of Omri are kept, and all the works of the house of Ahab, and ye walk in their counsels; that I should make thee a desolation, and the inhabitants thereof an hissing: therefore ye shall bear the reproach of my people.
Mic7:1 Woe is me! for I am as when they have gathered the summer fruits, as the grapegleanings of the vintage: there is no cluster to eat: my soul desired the firstripe fruit.
Mic7:2 The good man is perished out of the earth: and there is none upright among men: they all lie in wait for blood; they hunt every man his brother with a net.
Mic7:3 That they may do evil with both hands earnestly, the prince asketh, and the judge asketh for a reward; and the great man, he uttereth his mischievous desire: so they wrap it up.
Mic7:4 The best of them is as a brier: the most upright is sharper than a thorn hedge: the day of thy watchmen and thy visitation cometh; now shall be their perplexity.
Mic7:5 Trust ye not in a friend, put ye not confidence in a guide: keep the doors of thy mouth from her that lieth in thy bosom.
Mic7:6 For the son dishonoureth the father, the daughter riseth up against her mother, the daughter in law against her mother in law; a man's enemies are the men of his own house.
Mic7:7 Therefore I will look unto the LORD; I will wait for the God of my salvation: my God will hear me.
Mic7:8 Rejoice not against me, O mine enemy: when I fall, I shall arise; when I sit in darkness, the LORD shall be a light unto me.
Mic7:9 I will bear the indignation of the LORD, because I have sinned against him, until he plead my cause, and execute judgment for me: he will bring me forth to the light, and I shall behold his righteousness.
Mic7:10 Then she that is mine enemy shall see it, and shame shall cover her which said unto me, Where is the LORD thy God? mine eyes shall behold her: now shall she be trodden down as the mire of the streets.
Mic7:11 In the day that thy walls are to be built, in that day shall the decree be far removed.
Mic7:12 In that day also he shall come even to thee from Assyria, and from the fortified cities, and from the fortress even to the river, and from sea to sea, and from mountain to mountain.
Mic7:13 Notwithstanding the land shall be desolate because of them that dwell therein, for the fruit of their doings.
Mic7:14 Feed thy people with thy rod, the flock of thine heritage, which dwell solitarily in the wood, in the midst of Carmel: let them feed in Bashan and Gilead, as in the days of old.
Mic7:15 According to the days of thy coming out of the land of Egypt will I shew unto him marvellous things.
Mic7:16 The nations shall see and be confounded at all their might: they shall lay their hand upon their mouth, their ears shall be deaf.
Mic7:17 They shall lick the dust like a serpent, they shall move out of their holes like worms of the earth: they shall be afraid of the LORD our God, and shall fear because of thee.
Mic7:18 Who is a God like unto thee, that pardoneth iniquity, and passeth by the transgression of the remnant of his heritage? he retaineth not his anger for ever, because he delighteth in mercy.
Mic7:19 He will turn again, he will have compassion upon us; he will subdue our iniquities; and thou wilt cast all their sins into the depths of the sea.
Mic7:20 Thou wilt perform the truth  Jacob, and the mercy to Abraham, which thou hast sworn unto our fathers from the days of old.
Nahum1:1 The burden of Nineveh. The book of the vision of Nahum the Elkoshite.
Nahum1:2 God is jealous, and the LORD revengeth; the LORD revengeth, and is furious; the LORD will take vengeance on his adversaries, and he reserveth wrath for his enemies.
Nahum1:3 The LORD is slow to anger, and great in power, and will not at all acquit the wicked: the LORD hath his way in the whirlwind and in the storm, and the clouds are the dust of his feet.
Nahum1:4 He rebuketh the sea, and maketh it dry, and drieth up all the rivers: Bashan languisheth, and Carmel, and the flower of Lebanon languisheth.
Nahum1:5 The mountains quake at him, and the hills melt, and the earth is burned at his presence, yea, the world, and all that dwell therein.
Nahum1:6 Who can stand before his indignation? and who can abide in the fierceness of his anger? his fury is poured out like fire, and the rocks are thrown down by him.
Nahum1:7 The LORD is good, a strong hold in the day of trouble; and he knoweth them that trust in him.
Nahum1:8 But with an overrunning flood he will make an utter end of the place thereof, and darkness shall pursue his enemies.
Nahum1:9 What do ye imagine against the LORD? he will make an utter end: affliction shall not rise up the second time.
Nahum1:10 For while they be folden together as thorns, and while they are drunken as drunkards, they shall be devoured as stubble fully dry.
Nahum1:11 There is one come out of thee, that imagineth evil against the LORD, a wicked counsellor.
Nahum1:12 Thus saith the LORD; Though they be quiet, and likewise many, yet thus shall they be cut down, when he shall pass through. Though I have afflicted thee, I will afflict thee no more.
Nahum1:13 For now will I break his yoke from off thee, and will burst thy bonds in sunder.
Nahum1:14 And the LORD hath given a commandment concerning thee, that no more of thy name be sown: out of the house of thy gods will I cut off the graven image and the molten image: I will make thy grave; for thou art vile.
Nahum1:15 Behold upon the mountains the feet of him that bringeth good tidings, that publisheth peace! O Judah, keep thy solemn feasts, perform thy vows: for the wicked shall no more pass through thee; he is utterly cut off.
Nahum2:1 He that dasheth in pieces is come up before thy face: keep the munition, watch the way, make thy loins strong, fortify thy power mightily.
Nahum2:2 For the LORD hath turned away the excellency of Jacob, as the excellency of Israel: for the emptiers have emptied them out, and marred their vine branches.
Nahum2:3 The shield of his mighty men is made red, the valiant men are in scarlet: the chariots shall be with flaming torches in the day of his preparation, and the fir trees shall be terribly shaken.
Nahum2:4 The chariots shall rage in the streets, they shall justle one against another in the broad ways: they shall seem like torches, they shall run like the lightnings.
Nahum2:5 He shall recount his worthies: they shall stumble in their walk; they shall make haste to the wall thereof, and the defence shall be prepared.
Nahum2:6 The gates of the rivers shall be opened, and the palace shall be dissolved.
Nahum2:7 And Huzzab shall be led away captive, she shall be brought up, and her maids shall lead her as with the voice of doves, tabering upon their breasts.
Nahum2:8 But Nineveh is of old like a pool of water: yet they shall flee away. Stand, stand, shall they cry; but none shall look back.
Nahum2:9 Take ye the spoil of silver, take the spoil of gold: for there is none end of the store and glory out of all the pleasant furniture.
Nahum2:10 She is empty, and void, and waste: and the heart melteth, and the knees smite together, and much pain is in all loins, and the faces of them all gather blackness.
Nahum2:11 Where is the dwelling of the lions, and the feedingplace of the young lions, where the lion, even the old lion, walked, and the lion's whelp, and none made them afraid?
Nahum2:12 The lion did tear in pieces enough for his whelps, and strangled for his lionesses, and filled his holes with prey, and his dens with ravin.
Nahum2:13 Behold, I am against thee, saith the LORD of hosts, and I will burn her chariots in the smoke, and the sword shall devour thy young lions: and I will cut off thy prey from the earth, and the voice of thy messengers shall no more be heard.
Nahum3:1 Woe to the bloody city! it is all full of lies and robbery; the prey departeth not;
Nahum3:2 The noise of a whip, and the noise of the rattling of the wheels, and of the pransing horses, and of the jumping chariots.
Nahum3:3 The horseman lifteth up both the bright sword and the glittering spear: and there is a multitude of slain, and a great number of carcases; and there is none end of their corpses; they stumble upon their corpses:
Nahum3:4 Because of the multitude of the whoredoms of the wellfavoured harlot, the mistress of witchcrafts, that selleth nations through her whoredoms, and families through her witchcrafts.
Nahum3:5 Behold, I am against thee, saith the LORD of hosts; and I will discover thy skirts upon thy face, and I will shew the nations thy nakedness, and the kingdoms thy shame.
Nahum3:6 And I will cast abominable filth upon thee, and make thee vile, and will set thee as a gazingstock.
Nahum3:7 And it shall come to pass, that all they that look upon thee shall flee from thee, and say, Nineveh is laid waste: who will bemoan her? whence shall I seek comforters for thee?
Nahum3:8 Art thou better than populous No, that was situate among the rivers, that had the waters round about it, whose rampart was the sea, and her wall was from the sea?
Nahum3:9 Ethiopia and Egypt were her strength, and it was infinite; Put and Lubim were thy helpers.
Nahum3:10 Yet was she carried away, she went into captivity: her young children also were dashed in pieces at the top of all the streets: and they cast lots for her honourable men, and all her great men were bound in chains.
Nahum3:11 Thou also shalt be drunken: thou shalt be hid, thou also shalt seek strength because of the enemy.
Nahum3:12 All thy strong holds shall be like fig trees with the firstripe figs: if they be shaken, they shall even fall into the mouth of the eater.
Nahum3:13 Behold, thy people in the midst of thee are women: the gates of thy land shall be set wide open unto thine enemies: the fire shall devour thy bars.
Nahum3:14 Draw thee waters for the siege, fortify thy strong holds: go into clay, and tread the morter, make strong the brickkiln.
Nahum3:15 There shall the fire devour thee; the sword shall cut thee off, it shall eat thee up like the cankerworm: make thyself many as the cankerworm, make thyself many as the locusts.
Nahum3:16 Thou hast multiplied thy merchants above the stars of heaven: the cankerworm spoileth, and fleeth away.
Nahum3:17 Thy crowned are as the locusts, and thy captains as the great grasshoppers, which camp in the hedges in the cold day, but when the sun ariseth they flee away, and their place is not known where they are.
Nahum3:18 Thy shepherds slumber, O king of Assyria: thy nobles shall dwell in the dust: thy people is scattered upon the mountains, and no man gathereth them.
Nahum3:19 There is no healing of thy bruise; thy wound is grievous: all that hear the bruit of thee shall clap the hands over thee: for upon whom hath not thy wickedness passed continually?
Hab1:1 The burden which Habakkuk the prophet did see.
Hab1:2 O LORD, how long shall I cry, and thou wilt not hear! even cry out unto thee of violence, and thou wilt not save!
Hab1:3 Why dost thou shew me iniquity, and cause me to behold grievance? for spoiling and violence are before me: and there are that raise up strife and contention.
Hab1:4 Therefore the law is slacked, and judgment doth never go forth: for the wicked doth compass about the righteous; therefore wrong judgment proceedeth.
Hab1:5 Behold ye among the heathen, and regard, and wonder marvellously: for I will work a work in your days, which ye will not believe, though it be told you.
Hab1:6 For, lo, I raise up the Chaldeans, that bitter and hasty nation, which shallyears?
Zec1:13 And the LORD answered the angel that talked with me with good words and comfortable words.
Zec1:14 So the angel that communed with me said unto me, Cry thou, saying, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; I am jealous for Jerusalem and for Zion with a great jealousy.
Zec1:15 And I am very sore displeased with the heathen that are at ease: for I was but a little displeased, and they helped forward the affliction.
Zec1:16 Therefore thus saith the LORD; I am returned to Jerusalem with mercies: my house shall be built in it, saith the LORD of hosts, and a line shall be stretched forth upon Jerusalem.
Zec1:17 Cry yet, saying, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; My cities through prosperity shall yet be spread abroad; and the LORD shall yet comfort Zion, and shall yet choose Jerusalem.
Zec1:18 Then lifted I up mine eyes, and saw, and behold four horns.
Zec1:19 And I said unto the angel that talked with me, What be these? And he answered me, These are the horns which have scattered Judah, Israel, and Jerusalem.
Zec1:20 And the LORD shewed me four carpenters.
Zec1:21 Then said I, What come these to do? And he spake, saying, These are the horns which have scattered Judah, so that no man did lift up his head: but these are come to fray them, to cast out the horns of the Gentiles, which lifted up their horn over the land of Judah to scatter it.
Zec2:1 I lifted up mine eyes again, and looked, and behold a man with a measuring line in his hand.
Zec2:2 Then said I, Whither goest thou? And he said unto me, To measure Jerusalem, to see what is the breadth thereof, and what is the length thereof.
Zec2:3 And, behold, the angel that talked with me went forth, and another angel went out to meet him,
Zec2:4 And said unto him, Run, speak to this young man, saying, Jerusalem shall be inhabited as towns without walls for the multitude of men and cattle therein:
Zec2:5 For I, saith the LORD, will be unto her a wall of fire round about, and will be the glory in the midst of her.
Zec2:6 Ho, ho, come forth, and flee from the land of the north, saith the LORD: for I have spread you abroad as the four winds of the heaven, saith the LORD.
Zec2:7 Deliver thyself, O Zion, that dwellest with the daughter of Babylon.
Zec2:8 For thus saith the LORD of hosts; After the glory hath he sent me unto the nations which spoiled you: for he that toucheth you toucheth the apple of his eye.
Zec2:9 For, behold, I will shake mine hand upon them, and they shall be a spoil to their servants: and ye shall know that the LORD of hosts hath sent me.
Zec2:10 Sing and rejoice, O daughter of Zion: for, lo, I come, and I will dwell in the midst of thee, saith the LORD.
Zec2:11 And many nations shall be joined to the LORD in that day, and shall be my people: and I will dwell in the midst of thee, and thou shalt know that the LORD of hosts hath sent me unto thee.
Zec2:12 And the LORD shall inherit Judah his portion in the holy land, and shall choose Jerusalem again.
Zec2:13 Be silent, O all flesh, before the LORD: for he is raised up out of his holy habitation.
Zec3:1 And he shewed me Joshua the high priest standing before the angel of the LORD, and Satan standing at his right hand to resist him.
Zec3:2 And the LORD said unto Satan, The LORD rebuke thee, O Satan; even the LORD that hath chosen Jerusalem rebuke thee: is not this a brand plucked out of the fire?
Zec3:3 Now Joshua was clothed with filthy garments, and stood before the angel.
Zec3:4 And he answered and spake unto those that stood before him, saying, Take away the filthy garments from him. And unto him he said, Behold, I have caused thine iniquity to pass from thee, and I will clothe thee with change of raiment.
Zec3:5 And I said, Let them set a fair mitre upon his head. So they set a fair mitre upon his head, and clothed him with garments. And the angel of the LORD stood by.
Zec3:6 And the angel of the LORD protested unto Joshua, saying,
Zec3:7 Thus saith the LORD of hosts; If thou wilt walk in my ways, and if thou wilt keep my charge, then thou shalt also judge my house, and shalt also keep my courts, and I will give thee places to walk among these that stand by.
Zec3:8 Hear now, O Joshua the high priest, thou, and thy fellows that sit before thee: for they are men wondered at: for, behold, I will bring forth my servant the BRANCH.
Zec3:9 For behold the stone that I have laid before Joshua; upon one stone shall be seven eyes: behold, I will engrave the graving thereof, saith the LORD of hosts, and I will remove the iniquity of that land in one day.
Zec3:10 In that day, saith the LORD of hosts, shall ye call every man his neighbour under the vine and under the fig tree.
Zec4:1 And the angel that talked with me came again, and waked me, as a man that is wakened out of his sleep,
Zec4:2 And said unto me, What seest thou? And I said, I have looked, and behold a candlestick all of gold, with a bowl upon the top of it, and his seven lamps thereon, and seven pipes to the seven lamps, which are upon the top thereof:
Zec4:3 And two olive trees by it, one upon the right side of the bowl, and the other upon the left side thereof.
Zec4:4 So I answered and spake to the angel that talked with me, saying, What are these, my lord?
Zec4:5 Then the angel that talked with me answered and said unto me, Knowest thou not what these be? And I said, No, my lord.
Zec4:6 Then he answered and spake unto me, saying, This is the word of the LORD unto Zerubbabel, saying, Not by might, nor by power, but by my spirit, saith the LORD of hosts.
Zec4:7 Who art thou, O great mountain? before Zerubbabel thou shalt become a plain: and he shall bring forth the headstone thereof with shoutings, crying, Grace, grace unto it.
Zec4:8 Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
Zec4:9 The hands of Zerubbabel have laid the foundation of this house; his hands shall also finish it; and thou shalt know that the LORD of hosts hath sent me unto you.
Zec4:10 For who hath despised the day of small things? for they shall rejoice, and shall see the plummet in the hand of Zerubbabel with those seven; they are the eyes of the LORD, which run to and fro through the whole earth.
Zec4:11 Then answered I, and said unto him, What are these two olive trees upon the right side of the candlestick and upon the left side thereof?
Zec4:12 And I answered again, and said unto him, What be these two olive branches which through the two golden pipes empty the golden oil out of themselves?
Zec4:13 And he answered me and said, Knowest thou not what these be? And I said, No, my lord.
Zec4:14 Then said he, These are the two anointed ones, that stand by the LORD of the whole earth.
Zec5:1 Then I turned, and lifted up mine eyes, and looked, and behold a flying roll.
Zec5:2 And he said unto me, What seest thou? And I answered, I see a flying roll; the length thereof is twenty cubits, and the breadth thereof ten cubits.
Zec5:3 Then said he unto me, This is the curse that goeth forth over the face of the whole earth: for every one that stealeth shall be cut off as on this side according to it; and every one that sweareth shall be cut off as on that side according to it.
Zec5:4 I will bring it forth, saith the LORD of hosts, and it shall enter into the house of the thief, and into the house of him that sweareth falsely by my name: and it shall remain in the midst of his house, and shall consume it with the timber thereof and the stones thereof.
Zec5:5 Then the angel that talked with me went forth, and said unto me, Lift up now thine eyes, and see what is this that goeth forth.
Zec5:6 And I said, What is it? And he said, This is an ephah that goeth forth. He said moreover, This is their resemblance through all the earth.
Zec5:7 And, behold, there was lifted up a talent of lead: and this is a woman that sitteth in the midst of the ephah.
Zec5:8 And he said, This is wickedness. And he cast it into the midst of the ephah; and he cast the weight of lead upon the mouth thereof.
Zec5:9 Then lifted I up mine eyes, and looked, and, behold, there came out two women, and the wind was in their wings; for they had wings like the wings of a stork: and they lifted up the ephah between the earth and the heaven.
Zec5:1Then said I to the angel that talked with me, Whither do these bear the ephah?
Zec5:11 And he said unto me, To build it an house in the land of Shinar: and it shall be established, and set there upon her own base.
Zec6:1 And I turned, and lifted up mine eyes, and looked, and, behold, there came four chariots out from between two mountains; and the mountains were mountains of brass.
Zec6:2 In the first chariot were red horses; and in the second chariot black horses;
Zec6:3 And in the third chariot white horses; and in the fourth chariot grisled and bay horses.
Zec6:4 Then I answered and said unto the angel that talked with me, What are these, my lord?
Zec6:5 And the angel answered and said unto me, These are the four spirits of the heavens, which go forth from standing before the LORD of all the earth.
Zec6:6 The black horses which are therein go forth into the north country; and the white go forth after them; and the grisled go forth toward the south country.
Zec6:7 And the bay went forth, and sought to go that they might walk to and fro through the earth: and he said, Get you hence, walk to and fro through the earth. So they walked to and fro through the earth.
Zec6:8 Then cried he upon me, and spake unto me, saying, Behold, these that go toward the north country have quieted my spirit in the north country.
Zec6:9 And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
Zec6:10 Take of them of the captivity, even of Heldai, of Tobijah, and of Jedaiah, which are come from Babylon, and come thou the same day, and go into the house of Josiah the son of Zephaniah;
Zec6:11 Then take silver and gold, and make crowns, and set them upon the head of Joshua the son of Josedech, the high priest;
Zec6:12 And speak unto him, saying, Thus speaketh the LORD of hosts, saying, Behold the man whose name is The BRANCH; and he shall grow up out of his place, and he shall build the temple of the LORD:
Zec6:13 Even he shall build the temple of the LORD; and he shall bear the glory, and shall sit and rule upon his throne; and he shall be a priest upon his throne: and the counsel of peace shall be between them both.
Zec6:14 And the crowns shall be to Helem, and to Tobijah, and to Jedaiah, and to Hen the son of Zephaniah, for a memorial in the temple of the LORD.
Zec6:15 And they that are far off shall come and build in the temple of the LORD, and ye shall know that the LORD of hosts hath sent me unto you. And this shall come to pass, if ye will diligently obey the voice of the LORD your God.
Zec7:1 And it came to pass in the fourth year of king Darius, that the word of the LORD came unto Zechariah in the fourth day of the ninth month, even in Chisleu;
Zec7:2 When they had sent unto the house of God Sherezer and Regemmelech, and their men, to pray before the LORD,
Zec7:3 And to speak unto the priests which were in the house of the LORD of hosts, and to the prophets, saying, Should I weep in the fifth month, separating myself, as I have done these so many years?
Zec7:4 Then came the word of the LORD of hosts unto me, saying,
Zec7:5 Speak unto all the people of the land, and to the priests, saying, When ye fasted and mourned in the fifth and seventh month, even those seventy years, did ye at all fast unto me, even to me?
Zec7:6 And when ye did eat, and when ye did drink, did not ye eat for yourselves, and drink for yourselves?
Zec7:7 Should ye not hear the words which the LORD hath cried by the former prophets, when Jerusalem was inhabited and in prosperity, and the cities thereof round about her, when men inhabited the south and the plain?
Zec7:8 And the word of the LORD came unto Zechariah, saying,
Zec7:9 Thus speaketh the LORD of hosts, saying, Execute true judgment, and shew mercy and compassions every man to his brother:
Zec7:10 And oppress not the widow, nor the fatherless, the stranger, nor the poor; and let none of you imagine evil against his brother in your heart.
Zec7:11 But they refused to hearken, and pulled away the shoulder, and stopped their ears, that they should not hear.
Zec7:12 Yea, they made their hearts as an adamant stone, lest they should hear the law, and the words which the LORD of hosts hath sent in his spirit by the former prophets: therefore came a great wrath from the LORD of hosts.
Zec7:13 Therefore it is come to pass, that as he cried, and they would not hear; so they cried, and I would not hear, saith the LORD of hosts:
Zec7:14 But I scattered them with a whirlwind among all the nations whom they knew not. Thus the land was desolate after them, that no man passed through nor returned: for they laid the pleasant land desolate.
Zec8:1 Again the word of the LORD of hosts came to me, saying,
Zec8:2 Thus saith the LORD of hosts; I was jealous for Zion with great jealousy, and I was jealous for her with great fury.
Zec8:3 Thus saith the LORD; I am returned unto Zion, and will dwell in the midst of Jerusalem: and Jerusalem shall be called a city of truth; and the mountain of the LORD of hosts the holy mountain.
Zec8:4 Thus saith the LORD of hosts; There shall yet old men and old women dwell in the streets of Jerusalem, and every man with his staff in his hand for very age.
Zec8:5 And the streets of the city shall be full of boys and girls playing in the streets thereof.
Zec8:6 Thus saith the LORD of hosts; If it be marvellous in the eyes of the remnant of this people in these days, should it also be marvellous in mine eyes? saith the LORD of hosts.
Zec8:7 Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Behold, I will save my people from the east country, and from the west country;
Zec8:8 And I will bring them, and they shall dwell in the midst of Jerusalem: and they shall be my people, and I will be their God, in truth and in righteousness.
Zec8:9 Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Let your hands be strong, ye that hear in these days these words by the mouth of the prophets, which were in the day that the foundation of the house of the LORD of hosts was laid, that the temple might be built.
Zec8:10 For before these days there was no hire for man, nor any hire for beast; neither was there any peace to him that went out or came in because of the affliction: for I set all men every one against his neighbour.
Zec8:11 But now I will not be unto the residue of this people as in the former days, saith the LORD of hosts.
Zec8:12 For the seed shall be prosperous; the vine shall give her fruit, and the ground shall give her increase, and the heavens shall give their dew; and I will cause the remnant of this people to possess all these things.
Zec8:13 And it shall come to pass, that as ye were a curse among the heathen, O house of Judah, and house of Israel; so will I save you, and ye shall be a blessing: fear not, but let your hands be strong.
Zec8:14 For thus saith the LORD of hosts; As I thought to punish you, when your fathers provoked me to wrath, saith the LORD of hosts, and I repented not:
Zec8:15 So again have I thought in these days to do well unto Jerusalem and to the house of Judah: fear ye not.
Zec8:16 These are the things that ye shall do; Speak ye every man the truth to his neighbour; execute the judgment of truth and peace in your gates:
Zec8:17 And let none of you imagine evil in your hearts against his neighbour; and love no false oath: for all these are things that I hate, saith the LORD.
Zec8:18 And the word of the LORD of hosts came unto me, saying,
Zec8:19 Thus saith the LORD of hosts; The fast of the fourth month, and the fast of the fifth, and the fast of the seventh, and the fast of the tenth, shall be to the house of Judah joy and gladness, and cheerful feasts; therefore love the truth and peace.
Zec8:20 Thus saith the LORD of hosts; It shall yet come to pass, that there shall come people, and the inhabitants of many cities:
Zec8:21 And the inhabitants of one city shall go to another, saying, Let us go speedily to pray before the LORD, and to seek the LORD of hosts: I will go also.
Zec8:22 Yea, many people and strong nations shall come to seek the LORD of hosts in Jerusalem, and to pray before the LORD.
Zec8:23 Thus saith the LORD of hosts; In those days it shall come to pass, that ten men shall take hold out of all languages of the nations, even shall ke hold of the skirt of him that is a Jew, saying, We will go with you: for we have heard that God is with you.
Zec9:1 The burden of the word of the LORD in the land of Hadrach, and Damascus shall be the rest thereof: when the eyes of man, as of all the tribes of Israel, shall be toward the LORD.
Zec9:2 And Hamath also shall border thereby; Tyrus, and Zidon, though it be very wise.
Zec9:3 And Tyrus did build herself a strong hold, and heaped up silver as the dust, and fine gold as the mire of the streets.
Zec9:4 Behold, the LORD will cast her out, and he will smite her power in the sea; and she shall be devoured with fire.
Zec9:5 Ashkelon shall see it, and fear; Gaza also shall see it, and be very sorrowful, and Ekron; for her expectation shall be ashamed; and the king shall perish from Gaza, and Ashkelon shall not be inhabited.
Zec9:6 And a bastard shall dwell in Ashdod, and I will cut off the pride of the Philistines.
Zec9:7 And I will take away his blood out of his mouth, and his abominations from between his teeth: but he that remaineth, even he, shall be for our God, and he shall be as a governor in Judah, and Ekron as a Jebusite.
Zec9:8 And I will encamp about mine house because of the army, because of him that passeth by, and because of him that returneth: and no oppressor shall pass through them any more: for now have I seen with mine eyes.
Zec9:9 Rejoice greatly, O daughter of Zion; shout, O daughter of Jerusalem: behold, thy King cometh unto thee: he is just, and having salvation; lowly, and riding upon an ass, and upon a colt the foal of an ass.
Zec9:10 And I will cut off the chariot from Ephraim, and the horse from Jerusalem, and the battle bow shall be cut off: and he shall speak peace unto the heathen: and his dominion shall be from sea even to sea, and from the river even to the ends of the earth.
Zec9:11 As for thee also, by the blood of thy covenant I have sent forth thy prisoners out of the pit wherein is no water.
Zec9:12 Turn you to the strong hold, ye prisoners of hope: even to day do I declare that I will render double unto thee;
Zec9:13 When I have bent Judah for me, filled the bow with Ephraim, and raised up thy sons, O Zion, against thy sons, O Greece, and made thee as the sword of a mighty man.
Zec9:14 And the LORD shall be seen over them, and his arrow shall go forth as the lightning: and the LORD God shall blow the trumpet, and shall go with whirlwinds of the south.
Zec9:15 The LORD of hosts shall defend them; and they shall devour, and subdue with sling stones; and they shall drink, and make a noise as through wine; and they shall be filled like bowls, and as the corners of the altar.
Zec9:16 And the LORD their God shall save them in that day as the flock of his people: for they shall be as the stones of a crown, lifted up as an ensign upon his land.
Zec9:17 For how great is his goodness, and how great is his beauty! corn shall make the young men cheerful, and new wine the maids.
Zec10:1 Ask ye of the LORD rain in the time of the latter rain; so the LORD shall make bright clouds, and give them showers of rain, to every one grass in the field.
Zec10:2 For the idols have spoken vanity, and the diviners have seen a lie, and have told false dreams; they comfort in vain: therefore they went their way as a flock, they were troubled, because there was no shepherd.
Zec10:3 Mine anger was kindled against the shepherds, and I punished the goats: for the LORD of hosts hath visited his flock the house of Judah, and hath made them as his goodly horse in the battle.
Zec10:4 Out of him came forth the corner, out of him the nail, out of him the battle bow, out of him every oppressor together.
Zec10:5 And they shall be as mighty men, which tread down their enemies in the mire of the streets in the battle: and they shall fight, because the LORD is with them, and the riders on horses shall be confounded.
Zec10:6 And I will strengthen the house of Judah, and I will save the house of Joseph, and I will bring them again to place them; for I have mercy upon them: and they shall be as though I had not cast them off: for I am the LORD their God, and will hear them.
Zec10:7 And they of Ephraim shall be like a mighty man, and their heart shall rejoice as through wine: yea, their children shall see it, and be glad; their heart shall rejoice in the LORD.
Zec10:8 I will hiss for them, and gather them; for I have redeemed them: and they shall increase as they have increased.
Zec10:9 And I will sow them among the people: and they shall remember me in far countries; and they shall live with their children, and turn again.
Zec10:10 I will bring them again also out of the land of Egypt, and gather them out of Assyria; and I will bring them into the land of Gilead and Lebanon; and place shall not be found for them.
Zec10:11 And he shall pass through the sea with affliction, and shall smite the waves in the sea, and all the deeps of the river shall dry up: and the pride of Assyria shall be brought down, and the sceptre of Egypt shall depart away.
Zec10:12 And I will strengthen them in the LORD; and they shall walk up and down in his name, saith the LORD.
Zec11:1 Open thy doors, O Lebanon, that the fire may devour thy cedars.
Zec11:2 Howl, fir tree; for the cedar is fallen; because the mighty are spoiled: howl, O ye oaks of Bashan; for the forest of the vintage is come down.
Zec11:3 There is a voice of the howling of the shepherds; for their glory is spoiled: a voice of the roaring of young lions; for the pride of Jordan is spoiled.
Zec11:4 Thus saith the LORD my God; Feed the flock of the slaughter;
Zec11:5 Whose possessors slay them, and hold themselves not guilty: and they that sell them say, Blessed be the LORD; for I am rich: and their own shepherds pity them not.
Zec11:6 For I will no more pity the inhabitants of the land, saith the LORD: but, lo, I will deliver the men every one into his neighbour's hand, and into the hand of his king: and they shall smite the land, and out of their hand I will not deliver them.
Zec11:7 And I will feed the flock of slaughter, even you, O poor of the flock. And I took unto me two staves; the one I called Beauty, and the other I called Bands; and I fed the flock.
Zec11:8 Three shepherds also I cut off in one month; and my soul lothed them, and their soul also abhorred me.
Zec11:9 Then said I, I will not feed you: that that dieth, let it die; and that that is to be cut off, let it be cut off; and let the rest eat every one the flesh of another.
Zec11:10 And I took my staff, even Beauty, and cut it asunder, that I might break my covenant which I had made with all the people.
Zec11:11 And it was broken in that day: and so the poor of the flock that waited upon me knew that it was the word of the LORD.
Zec11:12 And I said unto them, If ye think good, give me my price; and if not, forbear. So they weighed for my price thirty pieces of silver.
Zec11:13 And the LORD said unto me, Cast it unto the potter: a goodly price that I was prised at of them. And I took the thirty pieces of silver, and cast them to the potter in the house of the LORD.
Zec11:14 Then I cut asunder mine other staff, even Bands, that I might break the brotherhood between Judah and Israel.
Zec11:15 And the LORD said unto me, Take unto thee yet the instruments of a foolish shepherd.
Zec11:16 For, lo, I will raise up a shepherd in the land, which shall not visit those that be cut off, neither shall seek the young one, nor heal that that is broken, nor feed that that standeth still: but he shall eat the flesh of the fat, and tear their claws in pieces.
Zec11:17 Woe to the idol shepherd that leaveth the flock! the sword shall be upon his arm, and upon his right eye: his arm shall be clean dried up, and his right eye shall be utterly darkened.
Zec12:1 The burden of the word of the LORD for Israel, saith the LORD, which stretcheth forth the heavens, and layeth the foundation of the earth, and formeth the spirit of man within him.
Zec12:2 Behold, I will make Jerusalem a cup of trembling unto all the people round about, when they shall be in the siege both against Judah and against Jerusalem.
Zec12:3 And in that day will I make Jerusalem a burdensome s of vipers, who hath warned you to flee from the wrath to come?
Mat3:8 Bring forth therefore fruits meet for repentance:
Mat3:9 And think not to say within yourselves, We have Abraham to our father: for I say unto you, that God is able of these stones to raise up children unto Abraham.
Mat3:10 And now also the axe is laid unto the root of the trees: therefore every tree which bringeth not forth good fruit is hewn down, and cast into the fire.
Mat3:11 I indeed baptize you with water unto repentance: but he that cometh after me is mightier than I, whose shoes I am not worthy to bear: he shall baptize you with the Holy Ghost, and with fire:
Mat3:12 Whose fan is in his hand, and he will throughly purge his floor, and gather his wheat into the garner; but he will burn up the chaff with unquenchable fire.
Mat3:13 Then cometh Jesus from Galilee to Jordan unto John, to be baptized of him.
Mat3:14 But John forbad him, saying, I have need to be baptized of thee, and comest thou to me?
Mat3:15 And Jesus answering said unto him, Suffer it to be so now: for thus it becometh us to fulfil all righteousness. Then he suffered him.
Mat3:16 And Jesus, when he was baptized, went up straightway out of the water: and, lo, the heavens were opened unto him, and he saw the Spirit of God descending like a dove, and lighting upon him:
Mat3:17 And lo a voice from heaven, saying, This is my beloved Son, in whom I am well pleased.
Mat4:1 Then was Jesus led up of the Spirit into the wilderness to be tempted of the devil.
Mat4:2 And when he had fasted forty days and forty nights, he was afterward an hungred.
Mat4:3 And when the tempter came to him, he said, If thou be the Son of God, command that these stones be made bread.
Mat4:4 But he answered and said, It is written, Man shall not live by bread alone, but by every word that proceedeth out of the mouth of God.
Mat4:5 Then the devil taketh him up into the holy city, and setteth him on a pinnacle of the temple,
Mat4:6 And saith unto him, If thou be the Son of God, cast thyself down: for it is written, He shall give his angels charge concerning thee: and in their hands they shall bear thee up, lest at any time thou dash thy foot against a stone.
Mat4:7 Jesus said unto him, It is written again, Thou shalt not tempt the Lord thy God.
Mat4:8 Again, the devil taketh him up into an exceeding high mountain, and sheweth him all the kingdoms of the world, and the glory of them;
Mat4:9 And saith unto him, All these things will I give thee, if thou wilt fall down and worship me.
Mat4:10 Then saith Jesus unto him, Get thee hence, Satan: for it is written, Thou shalt worship the Lord thy God, and him only shalt thou serve.
Mat4:11 Then the devil leaveth him, and, behold, angels came and ministered unto him.
Mat4:12 Now when Jesus had heard that John was cast into prison, he departed into Galilee;
Mat4:13 And leaving Nazareth, he came and dwelt in Capernaum, which is upon the sea coast, in the borders of Zabulon and Nephthalim:
Mat4:14 That it might be fulfilled which was spoken by Esaias the prophet, saying,
Mat4:15 The land of Zabulon, and the land of Nephthalim, by the way of the sea, beyond Jordan, Galilee of the Gentiles;
Mat4:16 The people which sat in darkness saw great light; and to them which sat in the region and shadow of death light is sprung up.
Mat4:17 From that time Jesus began to preach, and to say, Repent: for the kingdom of heaven is at hand.
Mat4:18 And Jesus, walking by the sea of Galilee, saw two brethren, Simon called Peter, and Andrew his brother, casting a net into the sea: for they were fishers.
Mat4:19 And he saith unto them, Follow me, and I will make you fishers of men.
Mat4:20 And they straightway left their nets, and followed him.
Mat4:21 And going on from thence, he saw other two brethren, James the son of Zebedee, and John his brother, in a ship with Zebedee their father, mending their nets; and he called them.
Mat4:22 And they immediately left the ship and their father, and followed him.
Mat4:23 And Jesus went about all Galilee, teaching in their synagogues, and preaching the gospel of the kingdom, and healing all manner of sickness and all manner of disease among the people.
Mat4:24 And his fame went throughout all Syria: and they brought unto him all sick people that were taken with divers diseases and torments, and those which were possessed with devils, and those which were lunatick, and those that had the palsy; and he healed them.
Mat4:25 And there followed him great multitudes of people from Galilee, and from Decapolis, and from Jerusalem, and from Judaea, and from beyond Jordan.
Mat5:1 And seeing the multitudes, he went up into a mountain: and when he was set, his disciples came unto him:
Mat5:2 And he opened his mouth, and taught them, saying,
Mat5:3 Blessed are the poor in spirit: for theirs is the kingdom of heaven.
Mat5:4 Blessed are they that mourn: for they shall be comforted.
Mat5:5 Blessed are the meek: for they shall inherit the earth.
Mat5:6 Blessed are they which do hunger and thirst after righteousness: for they shall be filled.
Mat5:7 Blessed are the merciful: for they shall obtain mercy.
Mat5:8 Blessed are the pure in heart: for they shall see God.
Mat5:9 Blessed are the peacemakers: for they shall be called the children of God.
Mat5:10 Blessed are they which are persecuted for righteousness' sake: for theirs is the kingdom of heaven.
Mat5:11 Blessed are ye, when men shall revile you, and persecute you, and shall say all manner of evil against you falsely, for my sake.
Mat5:12 Rejoice, and be exceeding glad: for great is your reward in heaven: for so persecuted they the prophets which were before you.
Mat5:13 Ye are the salt of the earth: but if the salt have lost his savour, wherewith shall it be salted? it is thenceforth good for nothing, but to be cast out, and to be trodden under foot of men.
Mat5:14 Ye are the light of the world. A city that is set on an hill cannot be hid.
Mat5:15 Neither do men light a candle, and put it under a bushel, but on a candlestick; and it giveth light unto all that are in the house.
Mat5:16 Let your light so shine before men, that they may see your good works, and glorify your Father which is in heaven.
Mat5:17 Think not that I am come to destroy the law, or the prophets: I am not come to destroy, but to fulfil.
Mat5:18 For verily I say unto you, Till heaven and earth pass, one jot or one tittle shall in no wise pass from the law, till all be fulfilled.
Mat5:19 Whosoever therefore shall break one of these least commandments, and shall teach men so, he shall be called the least in the kingdom of heaven: but whosoever shall do and teach them, the same shall be called great in the kingdom of heaven.
Mat5:20 For I say unto you, That except your righteousness shall exceed the righteousness of the scribes and Pharisees, ye shall in no case enter into the kingdom of heaven.
Mat5:21 Ye have heard that it was said by them of old time, Thou shalt not kill; and whosoever shall kill shall be in danger of the judgment:
Mat5:22 But I say unto you, That whosoever is angry with his brother without a cause shall be in danger of the judgment: and whosoever shall say to his brother, Raca, shall be in danger of the council: but whosoever shall say, Thou fool, shall be in danger of hell fire.
Mat5:23 Therefore if thou bring thy gift to the altar, and there rememberest that thy brother hath ought against thee;
Mat5:24 Leave there thy gift before the altar, and go thy way; first be reconciled to thy brother, and then come and offer thy gift.
Mat5:25 Agree with thine adversary quickly, whiles thou art in the way with him; lest at any time the adversary deliver thee to the judge, and the judge deliver thee to the officer, and thou be cast into prison.
Mat5:26 Verily I say unto thee, Thou shalt by no means come out thence, till thou hast paid the uttermost farthing.
Mat5:27 Ye have heard that it was said by them of old time, Thou shalt not commit adultery:
Mat5:28 But I say unto you, That whosoever looketh on a woman to lust after her hath committed adultery with her already in his heart.
Mat5:29 And if thy right eye offend thee, pluck it out, and cast it from thee: r it is profitable for thee that one of thy members should perish, and not that thy whole body should be cast into hell.
Mat5:30 And if thy right hand offend thee, cut it off, and cast it from thee: for it is profitable for thee that one of thy members should perish, and not that thy whole body should be cast into hell.
Mat5:31 It hath been said, Whosoever shall put away his wife, let him give her a writing of divorcement:
Mat5:32 But I say unto you, That whosoever shall put away his wife, saving for the cause of fornication, causeth her to commit adultery: and whosoever shall marry her that is divorced committeth adultery.
Mat5:33 Again, ye have heard that it hath been said by them of old time, Thou shalt not forswear thyself, but shalt perform unto the Lord thine oaths:
Mat5:34 But I say unto you, Swear not at all; neither by heaven; for it is God's throne:
Mat5:35 Nor by the earth; for it is his footstool: neither by Jerusalem; for it is the city of the great King.
Mat5:36 Neither shalt thou swear by thy head, because thou canst not make one hair white or black.
Mat5:37 But let your communication be, Yea, yea; Nay, nay: for whatsoever is more than these cometh of evil.
Mat5:38 Ye have heard that it hath been said, An eye for an eye, and a tooth for a tooth:
Mat5:39 But I say unto you, That ye resist not evil: but whosoever shall smite thee on thy right cheek, turn to him the other also.
Mat5:40 And if any man will sue thee at the law, and take away thy coat, let him have thy cloak also.
Mat5:41 And whosoever shall compel thee to go a mile, go with him twain.
Mat5:42 Give to him that asketh thee, and from him that would borrow of thee turn not thou away.
Mat5:43 Ye have heard that it hath been said, Thou shalt love thy neighbour, and hate thine enemy.
Mat5:44 But I say unto you, Love your enemies, bless them that curse you, do good to them that hate you, and pray for them which despitefully use you, and persecute you;
Mat5:45 That ye may be the children of your Father which is in heaven: for he maketh his sun to rise on the evil and on the good, and sendeth rain on the just and on the unjust.
Mat5:46 For if ye love them which love you, what reward have ye? do not even the publicans the same?
Mat5:47 And if ye salute your brethren only, what do ye more than others? do not even the publicans so?
Mat5:48 Be ye therefore perfect, even as your Father which is in heaven is perfect.
Mat6:1 Take heed that ye do not your alms before men, to be seen of them: otherwise ye have no reward of your Father which is in heaven.
Mat6:2 Therefore when thou doest thine alms, do not sound a trumpet before thee, as the hypocrites do in the synagogues and in the streets, that they may have glory of men. Verily I say unto you, They have their reward.
Mat6:3 But when thou doest alms, let not thy left hand know what thy right hand doeth:
Mat6:4 That thine alms may be in secret: and thy Father which seeth in secret himself shall reward thee openly.
Mat6:5 And when thou prayest, thou shalt not be as the hypocrites are: for they love to pray standing in the synagogues and in the corners of the streets, that they may be seen of men. Verily I say unto you, They have their reward.
Mat6:6 But thou, when thou prayest, enter into thy closet, and when thou hast shut thy door, pray to thy Father which is in secret; and thy Father which seeth in secret shall reward thee openly.
Mat6:7 But when ye pray, use not vain repetitions, as the heathen do: for they think that they shall be heard for their much speaking.
Mat6:8 Be not ye therefore like unto them: for your Father knoweth what things ye have need of, before ye ask him.
Mat6:9 After this manner therefore pray ye: Our Father which art in heaven, Hallowed be thy name.
Mat6:10 Thy kingdom come. Thy will be done in earth, as it is in heaven.
Mat6:11 Give us this day our daily bread.
Mat6:12 And forgive us our debts, as we forgive our debtors.
Mat6:13 And lead us not into temptation, but deliver us from evil: For thine is the kingdom, and the power, and the glory, for ever. Amen.
Mat6:14 For if ye forgive men their trespasses, your heavenly Father will also forgive you:
Mat6:15 But if ye forgive not men their trespasses, neither will your Father forgive your trespasses.
Mat6:16 Moreover when ye fast, be not, as the hypocrites, of a sad countenance: for they disfigure their faces, that they may appear unto men to fast. Verily I say unto you, They have their reward.
Mat6:17 But thou, when thou fastest, anoint thine head, and wash thy face;
Mat6:18 That thou appear not unto men to fast, but unto thy Father which is in secret: and thy Father, which seeth in secret, shall reward thee openly.
Mat6:19 Lay not up for yourselves treasures upon earth, where moth and rust doth corrupt, and where thieves break through and steal:
Mat6:20 But lay up for yourselves treasures in heaven, where neither moth nor rust doth corrupt, and where thieves do not break through nor steal:
Mat6:21 For where your treasure is, there will your heart be also.
Mat6:22 The light of the body is the eye: if therefore thine eye be single, thy whole body shall be full of light.
Mat6:23 But if thine eye be evil, thy whole body shall be full of darkness. If therefore the light that is in thee be darkness, how great is that darkness!
Mat6:24 No man can serve two masters: for either he will hate the one, and love the other; or else he will hold to the one, and despise the other. Ye cannot serve God and mammon.
Mat6:25 Therefore I say unto you, Take no thought for your life, what ye shall eat, or what ye shall drink; nor yet for your body, what ye shall put on. Is not the life more than meat, and the body than raiment?
Mat6:26 Behold the fowls of the air: for they sow not, neither do they reap, nor gather into barns; yet your heavenly Father feedeth them. Are ye not much better than they?
Mat6:27 Which of you by taking thought can add one cubit unto his stature?
Mat6:28 And why take ye thought for raiment? Consider the lilies of the field, how they grow; they toil not, neither do they spin:
Mat6:29 And yet I say unto you, That even Solomon in all his glory was not arrayed like one of these.
Mat6:30 Wherefore, if God so clothe the grass of the field, which to day is, and to morrow is cast into the oven, shall he not much more clothe you, O ye of little faith?
Mat6:31 Therefore take no thought, saying, What shall we eat? or, What shall we drink? or, Wherewithal shall we be clothed?
Mat6:32 (For after all these things do the Gentiles seek:) for your heavenly Father knoweth that ye have need of all these things.
Mat6:33 But seek ye first the kingdom of God, and his righteousness; and all these things shall be added unto you.
Mat6:34 Take therefore no thought for the morrow: for the morrow shall take thought for the things of itself. Sufficient unto the day is the evil thereof.
Mat7:1 Judge not, that ye be not judged.
Mat7:2 For with what judgment ye judge, ye shall be judged: and with what measure ye mete, it shall be measured to you again.
Mat7:3 And why beholdest thou the mote that is in thy brother's eye, but considerest not the beam that is in thine own eye?
Mat7:4 Or how wilt thou say to thy brother, Let me pull out the mote out of thine eye; and, behold, a beam is in thine own eye?
Mat7:5 Thou hypocrite, first cast out the beam out of thine own eye; and then shalt thou see clearly to cast out the mote out of thy brother's eye.
Mat7:6 Give not that which is holy unto the dogs, neither cast ye your pearls before swine, lest they trample them under their feet, and turn again and rend you.
Mat7:7 Ask, and it shall be given you; seek, and ye shall find; knock, and it shall be opened unto you:
Mat7:8 For every one that asketh receiveth; and he that seeketh findeth; and to him that knocketh it shall be opened.
Mat7:9 Or what man is there of you, whom if his son ask bread, will he give him a stone?
Mat7:10 Or if he ask a fish, will he give him a serpent?
Mat7:11 If ye then, being evil, know how to give good gifts unto your children, how much more shall your Father which is in heaven give good things to them that ask him?
Mat7:12 Therefore all things whatsoever ye would th men should do to you, do ye even so to them: for this is the law and the prophets.
Mat7:13 Enter ye in at the strait gate: for wide is the gate, and broad is the way, that leadeth to destruction, and many there be which go in thereat:
Mat7:14 Because strait is the gate, and narrow is the way, which leadeth unto life, and few there be that find it.
Mat7:15 Beware of false prophets, which come to you in sheep's clothing, but inwardly they are ravening wolves.
Mat7:16 Ye shall know them by their fruits. Do men gather grapes of thorns, or figs of thistles?
Mat7:17 Even so every good tree bringeth forth good fruit; but a corrupt tree bringeth forth evil fruit.
Mat7:18 A good tree cannot bring forth evil fruit, neither can a corrupt tree bring forth good fruit.
Mat7:19 Every tree that bringeth not forth good fruit is hewn down, and cast into the fire.
Mat7:20 Wherefore by their fruits ye shall know them.
Mat7:21 Not every one that saith unto me, Lord, Lord, shall enter into the kingdom of heaven; but he that doeth the will of my Father which is in heaven.
Mat7:22 Many will say to me in that day, Lord, Lord, have we not prophesied in thy name? and in thy name have cast out devils? and in thy name done many wonderful works?
Mat7:23 And then will I profess unto them, I never knew you: depart from me, ye that work iniquity.
Mat7:24 Therefore whosoever heareth these sayings of mine, and doeth them, I will liken him unto a wise man, which built his house upon a rock:
Mat7:25 And the rain descended, and the floods came, and the winds blew, and beat upon that house; and it fell not: for it was founded upon a rock.
Mat7:26 And every one that heareth these sayings of mine, and doeth them not, shall be likened unto a foolish man, which built his house upon the sand:
Mat7:27 And the rain descended, and the floods came, and the winds blew, and beat upon that house; and it fell: and great was the fall of it.
Mat7:28 And it came to pass, when Jesus had ended these sayings, the people were astonished at his doctrine:
Mat7:29 For he taught them as one having authority, and not as the scribes.
Mat8:1 When he was come down from the mountain, great multitudes followed him.
Mat8:2 And, behold, there came a leper and worshipped him, saying, Lord, if thou wilt, thou canst make me clean.
Mat8:3 And Jesus put forth his hand, and touched him, saying, I will; be thou clean. And immediately his leprosy was cleansed.
Mat8:4 And Jesus saith unto him, See thou tell no man; but go thy way, shew thyself to the priest, and offer the gift that Moses commanded, for a testimony unto them.
Mat8:5 And when Jesus was entered into Capernaum, there came unto him a centurion, beseeching him,
Mat8:6 And saying, Lord, my servant lieth at home sick of the palsy, grievously tormented.
Mat8:7 And Jesus saith unto him, I will come and heal him.
Mat8:8 The centurion answered and said, Lord, I am not worthy that thou shouldest come under my roof: but speak the word only, and my servant shall be healed.
Mat8:9 For I am a man under authority, having soldiers under me: and I say to this man, Go, and he goeth; and to another, Come, and he cometh; and to my servant, Do this, and he doeth it.
Mat8:10 When Jesus heard it, he marvelled, and said to them that followed, Verily I say unto you, I have not found so great faith, no, not in Israel.
Mat8:11 And I say unto you, That many shall come from the east and west, and shall sit down with Abraham, and Isaac, and Jacob, in the kingdom of heaven.
Mat8:12 But the children of the kingdom shall be cast out into outer darkness: there shall be weeping and gnashing of teeth.
Mat8:13 And Jesus said unto the centurion, Go thy way; and as thou hast believed, so be it done unto thee. And his servant was healed in the selfsame hour.
Mat8:14 And when Jesus was come into Peter's house, he saw his wife's mother laid, and sick of a fever.
Mat8:15 And he touched her hand, and the fever left her: and she arose, and ministered unto them.
Mat8:16 When the even was come, they brought unto him many that were possessed with devils: and he cast out the spirits with his word, and healed all that were sick:
Mat8:17 That it might be fulfilled which was spoken by Esaias the prophet, saying, Himself took our infirmities, and bare our sicknesses.
Mat8:18 Now when Jesus saw great multitudes about him, he gave commandment to depart unto the other side.
Mat8:19 And a certain scribe came, and said unto him, Master, I will follow thee whithersoever thou goest.
Mat8:20 And Jesus saith unto him, The foxes have holes, and the birds of the air have nests; but the Son of man hath not where to lay his head.
Mat8:21 And another of his disciples said unto him, Lord, suffer me first to go and bury my father.
Mat8:22 But Jesus said unto him, Follow me; and let the dead bury their dead.
Mat8:23 And when he was entered into a ship, his disciples followed him.
Mat8:24 And, behold, there arose a great tempest in the sea, insomuch that the ship was covered with the waves: but he was asleep.
Mat8:25 And his disciples came to him, and awoke him, saying, Lord, save us: we perish.
Mat8:26 And he saith unto them, Why are ye fearful, O ye of little faith? Then he arose, and rebuked the winds and the sea; and there was a great calm.
Mat8:27 But the men marvelled, saying, What manner of man is this, that even the winds and the sea obey him!
Mat8:28 And when he was come to the other side into the country of the Gergesenes, there met him two possessed with devils, coming out of the tombs, exceeding fierce, so that no man might pass by that way.
Mat8:29 And, behold, they cried out, saying, What have we to do with thee, Jesus, thou Son of God? art thou come hither to torment us before the time?
Mat8:30 And there was a good way off from them an herd of many swine feeding.
Mat8:31 So the devils besought him, saying, If thou cast us out, suffer us to go away into the herd of swine.
Mat8:32 And he said unto them, Go. And when they were come out, they went into the herd of swine: and, behold, the whole herd of swine ran violently down a steep place into the sea, and perished in the waters.
Mat8:33 And they that kept them fled, and went their ways into the city, and told every thing, and what was befallen to the possessed of the devils.
Mat8:34 And, behold, the whole city came out to meet Jesus: and when they saw him, they besought him that he would depart out of their coasts.
Mat9:1 And he entered into a ship, and passed over, and came into his own city.
Mat9:2 And, behold, they brought to him a man sick of the palsy, lying on a bed: and Jesus seeing their faith said unto the sick of the palsy; Son, be of good cheer; thy sins be forgiven thee.
Mat9:3 And, behold, certain of the scribes said within themselves, This man blasphemeth.
Mat9:4 And Jesus knowing their thoughts said, Wherefore think ye evil in your hearts?
Mat9:5 For whether is easier, to say, Thy sins be forgiven thee; or to say, Arise, and walk?
Mat9:6 But that ye may know that the Son of man hath power on earth to forgive sins, (then saith he to the sick of the palsy,) Arise, take up thy bed, and go unto thine house.
Mat9:7 And he arose, and departed to his house.
Mat9:8 But when the multitudes saw it, they marvelled, and glorified God, which had given such power unto men.
Mat9:9 And as Jesus passed forth from thence, he saw a man, named Matthew, sitting at the receipt of custom: and he saith unto him, Follow me. And he arose, and followed him.
Mat9:10 And it came to pass, as Jesus sat at meat in the house, behold, many publicans and sinners came and sat down with him and his disciples.
Mat9:11 And when the Pharisees saw it, they said unto his disciples, Why eateth your Master with publicans and sinners?
Mat9:12 But when Jesus heard that, he said unto them, They that be whole need not a physician, but they that are sick.
Mat9:13 But go ye and learn what that meaneth, I will have mercy, and not sacrifice: for I am not come to call the righteous, but sinners to repentance.
Mat9:14 Then came to him the disciples of John, saying, Why do we and the Pharisees fast oft, but thy disciples fast not?
Mat9:15 And Jesus said unto them, Can the children of the bridec bought it.
Mat13:47 Again, the kingdom of heaven is like unto a net, that was cast into the sea, and gathered of every kind:
Mat13:48 Which, when it was full, they drew to shore, and sat down, and gathered the good into vessels, but cast the bad away.
Mat13:49 So shall it be at the end of the world: the angels shall come forth, and sever the wicked from among the just,
Mat13:50 And shall cast them into the furnace of fire: there shall be wailing and gnashing of teeth.
Mat13:51 Jesus saith unto them, Have ye understood all these things? They say unto him, Yea, Lord.
Mat13:52 Then said he unto them, Therefore every scribe which is instructed unto the kingdom of heaven is like unto a man that is an householder, which bringeth forth out of his treasure things new and old.
Mat13:53 And it came to pass, that when Jesus had finished these parables, he departed thence.
Mat13:54 And when he was come into his own country, he taught them in their synagogue, insomuch that they were astonished, and said, Whence hath this man this wisdom, and these mighty works?
Mat13:55 Is not this the carpenter's son? is not his mother called Mary? and his brethren, James, and Joses, and Simon, and Judas?
Mat13:56 And his sisters, are they not all with us? Whence then hath this man all these things?
Mat13:57 And they were offended in him. But Jesus said unto them, A prophet is not without honour, save in his own country, and in his own house.
Mat13:58 And he did not many mighty works there because of their unbelief.
Mat14:1 At that time Herod the tetrarch heard of the fame of Jesus,
Mat14:2 And said unto his servants, This is John the Baptist; he is risen from the dead; and therefore mighty works do shew forth themselves in him.
Mat14:3 For Herod had laid hold on John, and bound him, and put him in prison for Herodias' sake, his brother Philip's wife.
Mat14:4 For John said unto him, It is not lawful for thee to have her.
Mat14:5 And when he would have put him to death, he feared the multitude, because they counted him as a prophet.
Mat14:6 But when Herod's birthday was kept, the daughter of Herodias danced before them, and pleased Herod.
Mat14:7 Whereupon he promised with an oath to give her whatsoever she would ask.
Mat14:8 And she, being before instructed of her mother, said, Give me here John Baptist's head in a charger.
Mat14:9 And the king was sorry: nevertheless for the oath's sake, and them which sat with him at meat, he commanded it to be given her.
Mat14:10 And he sent, and beheaded John in the prison.
Mat14:11 And his head was brought in a charger, and given to the damsel: and she brought it to her mother.
Mat14:12 And his disciples came, and took up the body, and buried it, and went and told Jesus.
Mat14:13 When Jesus heard of it, he departed thence by ship into a desert place apart: and when the people had heard thereof, they followed him on foot out of the cities.
Mat14:14 And Jesus went forth, and saw a great multitude, and was moved with compassion toward them, and he healed their sick.
Mat14:15 And when it was evening, his disciples came to him, saying, This is a desert place, and the time is now past; send the multitude away, that they may go into the villages, and buy themselves victuals.
Mat14:16 But Jesus said unto them, They need not depart; give ye them to eat.
Mat14:17 And they say unto him, We have here but five loaves, and two fishes.
Mat14:18 He said, Bring them hither to me.
Mat14:19 And he commanded the multitude to sit down on the grass, and took the five loaves, and the two fishes, and looking up to heaven, he blessed, and brake, and gave the loaves to his disciples, and the disciples to the multitude.
Mat14:20 And they did all eat, and were filled: and they took up of the fragments that remained twelve baskets full.
Mat14:21 And they that had eaten were about five thousand men, beside women and children.
Mat14:22 And straightway Jesus constrained his disciples to get into a ship, and to go before him unto the other side, while he sent the multitudes away.
Mat14:23 And when he had sent the multitudes away, he went up into a mountain apart to pray: and when the evening was come, he was there alone.
Mat14:24 But the ship was now in the midst of the sea, tossed with waves: for the wind was contrary.
Mat14:25 And in the fourth watch of the night Jesus went unto them, walking on the sea.
Mat14:26 And when the disciples saw him walking on the sea, they were troubled, saying, It is a spirit; and they cried out for fear.
Mat14:27 But straightway Jesus spake unto them, saying, Be of good cheer; it is I; be not afraid.
Mat14:28 And Peter answered him and said, Lord, if it be thou, bid me come unto thee on the water.
Mat14:29 And he said, Come. And when Peter was come down out of the ship, he walked on the water, to go to Jesus.
Mat14:30 But when he saw the wind boisterous, he was afraid; and beginning to sink, he cried, saying, Lord, save me.
Mat14:31 And immediately Jesus stretched forth his hand, and caught him, and said unto him, O thou of little faith, wherefore didst thou doubt?
Mat14:32 And when they were come into the ship, the wind ceased.
Mat14:33 Then they that were in the ship came and worshipped him, saying, Of a truth thou art the Son of God.
Mat14:34 And when they were gone over, they came into the land of Gennesaret.
Mat14:35 And when the men of that place had knowledge of him, they sent out into all that country round about, and brought unto him all that were diseased;
Mat14:36 And besought him that they might only touch the hem of his garment: and as many as touched were made perfectly whole.
Mat15:1 Then came to Jesus scribes and Pharisees, which were of Jerusalem, saying,
Mat15:2 Why do thy disciples transgress the tradition of the elders? for they wash not their hands when they eat bread.
Mat15:3 But he answered and said unto them, Why do ye also transgress the commandment of God by your tradition?
Mat15:4 For God commanded, saying, Honour thy father and mother: and, He that curseth father or mother, let him die the death.
Mat15:5 But ye say, Whosoever shall say to his father or his mother, It is a gift, by whatsoever thou mightest be profited by me;
Mat15:6 And honour not his father or his mother, he shall be free. Thus have ye made the commandment of God of none effect by your tradition.
Mat15:7 Ye hypocrites, well did Esaias prophesy of you, saying,
Mat15:8 This people draweth nigh unto me with their mouth, and honoureth me with their lips; but their heart is far from me.
Mat15:9 But in vain they do worship me, teaching for doctrines the commandments of men.
Mat15:10 And he called the multitude, and said unto them, Hear, and understand:
Mat15:11 Not that which goeth into the mouth defileth a man; but that which cometh out of the mouth, this defileth a man.
Mat15:12 Then came his disciples, and said unto him, Knowest thou that the Pharisees were offended, after they heard this saying?
Mat15:13 But he answered and said, Every plant, which my heavenly Father hath not planted, shall be rooted up.
Mat15:14 Let them alone: they be blind leaders of the blind. And if the blind lead the blind, both shall fall into the ditch.
Mat15:15 Then answered Peter and said unto him, Declare unto us this parable.
Mat15:16 And Jesus said, Are ye also yet without understanding?
Mat15:17 Do not ye yet understand, that whatsoever entereth in at the mouth goeth into the belly, and is cast out into the draught?
Mat15:18 But those things which proceed out of the mouth come forth from the heart; and they defile the man.
Mat15:19 For out of the heart proceed evil thoughts, murders, adulteries, fornications, thefts, false witness, blasphemies:
Mat15:20 These are the things which defile a man: but to eat with unwashen hands defileth not a man.
Mat15:21 Then Jesus went thence, and departed into the coasts of Tyre and Sidon.
Mat15:22 And, behold, a woman of Canaan came out of the same coasts, and cried unto him, saying, Have mercy on me, O Lord, thou son of David; my daughter is grievously vexed with a devil.
Mat15:23 But he answered her not a word. And his disciples came and besought him, saying, Send her away; for she crieth after us.
Mat15:24 But he swered and said, I am not sent but unto the lost sheep of the house of Israel.
Mat15:25 Then came she and worshipped him, saying, Lord, help me.
Mat15:26 But he answered and said, It is not meet to take the children's bread, and to cast it to dogs.
Mat15:27 And she said, Truth, Lord: yet the dogs eat of the crumbs which fall from their masters' table.
Mat15:28 Then Jesus answered and said unto her, O woman, great is thy faith: be it unto thee even as thou wilt. And her daughter was made whole from that very hour.
Mat15:29 And Jesus departed from thence, and came nigh unto the sea of Galilee; and went up into a mountain, and sat down there.
Mat15:30 And great multitudes came unto him, having with them those that were lame, blind, dumb, maimed, and many others, and cast them down at Jesus' feet; and he healed them:
Mat15:31 Insomuch that the multitude wondered, when they saw the dumb to speak, the maimed to be whole, the lame to walk, and the blind to see: and they glorified the God of Israel.
Mat15:32 Then Jesus called his disciples unto him, and said, I have compassion on the multitude, because they continue with me now three days, and have nothing to eat: and I will not send them away fasting, lest they faint in the way.
Mat15:33 And his disciples say unto him, Whence should we have so much bread in the wilderness, as to fill so great a multitude?
Mat15:34 And Jesus saith unto them, How many loaves have ye? And they said, Seven, and a few little fishes.
Mat15:35 And he commanded the multitude to sit down on the ground.
Mat15:36 And he took the seven loaves and the fishes, and gave thanks, and brake them, and gave to his disciples, and the disciples to the multitude.
Mat15:37 And they did all eat, and were filled: and they took up of the broken meat that was left seven baskets full.
Mat15:38 And they that did eat were four thousand men, beside women and children.
Mat15:39 And he sent away the multitude, and took ship, and came into the coasts of Magdala.
Mat16:1 The Pharisees also with the Sadducees came, and tempting desired him that he would shew them a sign from heaven.
Mat16:2 He answered and said unto them, When it is evening, ye say, It will be fair weather: for the sky is red.
Mat16:3 And in the morning, It will be foul weather to day: for the sky is red and lowring. O ye hypocrites, ye can discern the face of the sky; but can ye not discern the signs of the times?
Mat16:4 A wicked and adulterous generation seeketh after a sign; and there shall no sign be given unto it, but the sign of the prophet Jonas. And he left them, and departed.
Mat16:5 And when his disciples were come to the other side, they had forgotten to take bread.
Mat16:6 Then Jesus said unto them, Take heed and beware of the leaven of the Pharisees and of the Sadducees.
Mat16:7 And they reasoned among themselves, saying, It is because we have taken no bread.
Mat16:8 Which when Jesus perceived, he said unto them, O ye of little faith, why reason ye among yourselves, because ye have brought no bread?
Mat16:9 Do ye not yet understand, neither remember the five loaves of the five thousand, and how many baskets ye took up?
Mat16:10 Neither the seven loaves of the four thousand, and how many baskets ye took up?
Mat16:11 How is it that ye do not understand that I spake it not to you concerning bread, that ye should beware of the leaven of the Pharisees and of the Sadducees?
Mat16:12 Then understood they how that he bade them not beware of the leaven of bread, but of the doctrine of the Pharisees and of the Sadducees.
Mat16:13 When Jesus came into the coasts of Caesarea Philippi, he asked his disciples, saying, Whom do men say that I the Son of man am?
Mat16:14 And they said, Some say that thou art John the Baptist: some, Elias; and others, Jeremias, or one of the prophets.
Mat16:15 He saith unto them, But whom say ye that I am?
Mat16:16 And Simon Peter answered and said, Thou art the Christ, the Son of the living God.
Mat16:17 And Jesus answered and said unto him, Blessed art thou, Simon Barjona: for flesh and blood hath not revealed it unto thee, but my Father which is in heaven.
Mat16:18 And I say also unto thee, That thou art Peter, and upon this rock I will build my church; and the gates of hell shall not prevail against it.
Mat16:19 And I will give unto thee the keys of the kingdom of heaven: and whatsoever thou shalt bind on earth shall be bound in heaven: and whatsoever thou shalt loose on earth shall be loosed in heaven.
Mat16:20 Then charged he his disciples that they should tell no man that he was Jesus the Christ.
Mat16:21 From that time forth began Jesus to shew unto his disciples, how that he must go unto Jerusalem, and suffer many things of the elders and chief priests and scribes, and be killed, and be raised again the third day.
Mat16:22 Then Peter took him, and began to rebuke him, saying, Be it far from thee, Lord: this shall not be unto thee.
Mat16:23 But he turned, and said unto Peter, Get thee behind me, Satan: thou art an offence unto me: for thou savourest not the things that be of God, but those that be of men.
Mat16:24 Then said Jesus unto his disciples, If any man will come after me, let him deny himself, and take up his cross, and follow me.
Mat16:25 For whosoever will save his life shall lose it: and whosoever will lose his life for my sake shall find it.
Mat16:26 For what is a man profited, if he shall gain the whole world, and lose his own soul? or what shall a man give in exchange for his soul?
Mat16:27 For the Son of man shall come in the glory of his Father with his angels; and then he shall reward every man according to his works.
Mat16:28 Verily I say unto you, There be some standing here, which shall not taste of death, till they see the Son of man coming in his kingdom.
Mat17:1 And after six days Jesus taketh Peter, James, and John his brother, and bringeth them up into an high mountain apart,
Mat17:2 And was transfigured before them: and his face did shine as the sun, and his raiment was white as the light.
Mat17:3 And, behold, there appeared unto them Moses and Elias talking with him.
Mat17:4 Then answered Peter, and said unto Jesus, Lord, it is good for us to be here: if thou wilt, let us make here three tabernacles; one for thee, and one for Moses, and one for Elias.
Mat17:5 While he yet spake, behold, a bright cloud overshadowed them: and behold a voice out of the cloud, which said, This is my beloved Son, in whom I am well pleased; hear ye him.
Mat17:6 And when the disciples heard it, they fell on their face, and were sore afraid.
Mat17:7 And Jesus came and touched them, and said, Arise, and be not afraid.
Mat17:8 And when they had lifted up their eyes, they saw no man, save Jesus only.
Mat17:9 And as they came down from the mountain, Jesus charged them, saying, Tell the vision to no man, until the Son of man be risen again from the dead.
Mat17:10 And his disciples asked him, saying, Why then say the scribes that Elias must first come?
Mat17:11 And Jesus answered and said unto them, Elias truly shall first come, and restore all things.
Mat17:12 But I say unto you, That Elias is come already, and they knew him not, but have done unto him whatsoever they listed. Likewise shall also the Son of man suffer of them.
Mat17:13 Then the disciples understood that he spake unto them of John the Baptist.
Mat17:14 And when they were come to the multitude, there came to him a certain man, kneeling down to him, and saying,
Mat17:15 Lord, have mercy on my son: for he is lunatick, and sore vexed: for ofttimes he falleth into the fire, and oft into the water.
Mat17:16 And I brought him to thy disciples, and they could not cure him.
Mat17:17 Then Jesus answered and said, O faithless and perverse generation, how long shall I be with you? how long shall I suffer you? bring him hither to me.
Mat17:18 And Jesus rebuked the devil; and he departed out of him: and the child was cured from that very hour.
Mat17:19 Then came the disciples to Jesus apart, and said, Why could not we cast him out?
Mat17:20 And Jesus said unto them, Because of your unbelief: for verily I say unto you, If ye have faith as a grain of mustard seed, ye shall say unto this mountai Remove hence to yonder place; and it shall remove; and nothing shall be impossible unto you.
Mat17:21 Howbeit this kind goeth not out but by prayer and fasting.
Mat17:22 And while they abode in Galilee, Jesus said unto them, The Son of man shall be betrayed into the hands of men:
Mat17:23 And they shall kill him, and the third day he shall be raised again. And they were exceeding sorry.
Mat17:24 And when they were come to Capernaum, they that received tribute money came to Peter, and said, Doth not your master pay tribute?
Mat17:25 He saith, Yes. And when he was come into the house, Jesus prevented him, saying, What thinkest thou, Simon? of whom do the kings of the earth take custom or tribute? of their own children, or of strangers?
Mat17:26 Peter saith unto him, Of strangers. Jesus saith unto him, Then are the children free.
Mat17:27 Notwithstanding, lest we should offend them, go thou to the sea, and cast an hook, and take up the fish that first cometh up; and when thou hast opened his mouth, thou shalt find a piece of money: that take, and give unto them for me and thee.
Mat18:1 At the same time came the disciples unto Jesus, saying, Who is the greatest in the kingdom of heaven?
Mat18:2 And Jesus called a little child unto him, and set him in the midst of them,
Mat18:3 And said, Verily I say unto you, Except ye be converted, and become as little children, ye shall not enter into the kingdom of heaven.
Mat18:4 Whosoever therefore shall humble himself as this little child, the same is greatest in the kingdom of heaven.
Mat18:5 And whoso shall receive one such little child in my name receiveth me.
Mat18:6 But whoso shall offend one of these little ones which believe in me, it were better for him that a millstone were hanged about his neck, and that he were drowned in the depth of the sea.
Mat18:7 Woe unto the world because of offences! for it must needs be that offences come; but woe to that man by whom the offence cometh!
Mat18:8 Wherefore if thy hand or thy foot offend thee, cut them off, and cast them from thee: it is better for thee to enter into life halt or maimed, rather than having two hands or two feet to be cast into everlasting fire.
Mat18:9 And if thine eye offend thee, pluck it out, and cast it from thee: it is better for thee to enter into life with one eye, rather than having two eyes to be cast into hell fire.
Mat18:10 Take heed that ye despise not one of these little ones; for I say unto you, That in heaven their angels do always behold the face of my Father which is in heaven.
Mat18:11 For the Son of man is come to save that which was lost.
Mat18:12 How think ye? if a man have an hundred sheep, and one of them be gone astray, doth he not leave the ninety and nine, and goeth into the mountains, and seeketh that which is gone astray?
Mat18:13 And if so be that he find it, verily I say unto you, he rejoiceth more of that sheep, than of the ninety and nine which went not astray.
Mat18:14 Even so it is not the will of your Father which is in heaven, that one of these little ones should perish.
Mat18:15 Moreover if thy brother shall trespass against thee, go and tell him his fault between thee and him alone: if he shall hear thee, thou hast gained thy brother.
Mat18:16 But if he will not hear thee, then take with thee one or two more, that in the mouth of two or three witnesses every word may be established.
Mat18:17 And if he shall neglect to hear them, tell it unto the church: but if he neglect to hear the church, let him be unto thee as an heathen man and a publican.
Mat18:18 Verily I say unto you, Whatsoever ye shall bind on earth shall be bound in heaven: and whatsoever ye shall loose on earth shall be loosed in heaven.
Mat18:19 Again I say unto you, That if two of you shall agree on earth as touching any thing that they shall ask, it shall be done for them of my Father which is in heaven.
Mat18:20 For where two or three are gathered together in my name, there am I in the midst of them.
Mat18:21 Then came Peter to him, and said, Lord, how oft shall my brother sin against me, and I forgive him? till seven times?
Mat18:22 Jesus saith unto him, I say not unto thee, Until seven times: but, Until seventy times seven.
Mat18:23 Therefore is the kingdom of heaven likened unto a certain king, which would take account of his servants.
Mat18:24 And when he had begun to reckon, one was brought unto him, which owed him ten thousand talents.
Mat18:25 But forasmuch as he had not to pay, his lord commanded him to be sold, and his wife, and children, and all that he had, and payment to be made.
Mat18:26 The servant therefore fell down, and worshipped him, saying, Lord, have patience with me, and I will pay thee all.
Mat18:27 Then the lord of that servant was moved with compassion, and loosed him, and forgave him the debt.
Mat18:28 But the same servant went out, and found one of his fellowservants, which owed him an hundred pence: and he laid hands on him, and took him by the throat, saying, Pay me that thou owest.
Mat18:29 And his fellowservant fell down at his feet, and besought him, saying, Have patience with me, and I will pay thee all.
Mat18:30 And he would not: but went and cast him into prison, till he should pay the debt.
Mat18:31 So when his fellowservants saw what was done, they were very sorry, and came and told unto their lord all that was done.
Mat18:32 Then his lord, after that he had called him, said unto him, O thou wicked servant, I forgave thee all that debt, because thou desiredst me:
Mat18:33 Shouldest not thou also have had compassion on thy fellowservant, even as I had pity on thee?
Mat18:34 And his lord was wroth, and delivered him to the tormentors, till he should pay all that was due unto him.
Mat18:35 So likewise shall my heavenly Father do also unto you, if ye from your hearts forgive not every one his brother their trespasses.
Mat19:1 And it came to pass, that when Jesus had finished these sayings, he departed from Galilee, and came into the coasts of Judaea beyond Jordan;
Mat19:2 And great multitudes followed him; and he healed them there.
Mat19:3 The Pharisees also came unto him, tempting him, and saying unto him, Is it lawful for a man to put away his wife for every cause?
Mat19:4 And he answered and said unto them, Have ye not read, that he which made them at the beginning made them male and female,
Mat19:5 And said, For this cause shall a man leave father and mother, and shall cleave to his wife: and they twain shall be one flesh?
Mat19:6 Wherefore they are no more twain, but one flesh. What therefore God hath joined together, let not man put asunder.
Mat19:7 They say unto him, Why did Moses then command to give a writing of divorcement, and to put her away?
Mat19:8 He saith unto them, Moses because of the hardness of your hearts suffered you to put away your wives: but from the beginning it was not so.
Mat19:9 And I say unto you, Whosoever shall put away his wife, except it be for fornication, and shall marry another, committeth adultery: and whoso marrieth her which is put away doth commit adultery.
Mat19:10 His disciples say unto him, If the case of the man be so with his wife, it is not good to marry.
Mat19:11 But he said unto them, All men cannot receive this saying, save they to whom it is given.
Mat19:12 For there are some eunuchs, which were so born from their mother's womb: and there are some eunuchs, which were made eunuchs of men: and there be eunuchs, which have made themselves eunuchs for the kingdom of heaven's sake. He that is able to receive it, let him receive it.
Mat19:13 Then were there brought unto him little children, that he should put his hands on them, and pray: and the disciples rebuked them.
Mat19:14 But Jesus said, Suffer little children, and forbid them not, to come unto me: for of such is the kingdom of heaven.
Mat19:15 And he laid his hands on them, and departed thence.
Mat19:16 And, behold, one came and said unto him, Good Master, what good thing shall I do, that I may have eternal life?
Mat19:17 And he said unto him, Why callest thou me good? there is none good but one, that is, God: but if thou wilt enter into life, keep the commandments.
Mat19:18 He saith unto him, Whl be shortened.
Mat24:23 Then if any man shall say unto you, Lo, here is Christ, or there; believe it not.
Mat24:24 For there shall arise false Christs, and false prophets, and shall shew great signs and wonders; insomuch that, if it were possible, they shall deceive the very elect.
Mat24:25 Behold, I have told you before.
Mat24:26 Wherefore if they shall say unto you, Behold, he is in the desert; go not forth: behold, he is in the secret chambers; believe it not.
Mat24:27 For as the lightning cometh out of the east, and shineth even unto the west; so shall also the coming of the Son of man be.
Mat24:28 For wheresoever the carcase is, there will the eagles be gathered together.
Mat24:29 Immediately after the tribulation of those days shall the sun be darkened, and the moon shall not give her light, and the stars shall fall from heaven, and the powers of the heavens shall be shaken:
Mat24:30 And then shall appear the sign of the Son of man in heaven: and then shall all the tribes of the earth mourn, and they shall see the Son of man coming in the clouds of heaven with power and great glory.
Mat24:31 And he shall send his angels with a great sound of a trumpet, and they shall gather together his elect from the four winds, from one end of heaven to the other.
Mat24:32 Now learn a parable of the fig tree; When his branch is yet tender, and putteth forth leaves, ye know that summer is nigh:
Mat24:33 So likewise ye, when ye shall see all these things, know that it is near, even at the doors.
Mat24:34 Verily I say unto you, This generation shall not pass, till all these things be fulfilled.
Mat24:35 Heaven and earth shall pass away, but my words shall not pass away.
Mat24:36 But of that day and hour knoweth no man, no, not the angels of heaven, but my Father only.
Mat24:37 But as the days of Noe were, so shall also the coming of the Son of man be.
Mat24:38 For as in the days that were before the flood they were eating and drinking, marrying and giving in marriage, until the day that Noe entered into the ark,
Mat24:39 And knew not until the flood came, and took them all away; so shall also the coming of the Son of man be.
Mat24:40 Then shall two be in the field; the one shall be taken, and the other left.
Mat24:41 Two women shall be grinding at the mill; the one shall be taken, and the other left.
Mat24:42 Watch therefore: for ye know not what hour your Lord doth come.
Mat24:43 But know this, that if the goodman of the house had known in what watch the thief would come, he would have watched, and would not have suffered his house to be broken up.
Mat24:44 Therefore be ye also ready: for in such an hour as ye think not the Son of man cometh.
Mat24:45 Who then is a faithful and wise servant, whom his lord hath made ruler over his household, to give them meat in due season?
Mat24:46 Blessed is that servant, whom his lord when he cometh shall find so doing.
Mat24:47 Verily I say unto you, That he shall make him ruler over all his goods.
Mat24:48 But and if that evil servant shall say in his heart, My lord delayeth his coming;
Mat24:49 And shall begin to smite his fellowservants, and to eat and drink with the drunken;
Mat24:50 The lord of that servant shall come in a day when he looketh not for him, and in an hour that he is not aware of,
Mat24:51 And shall cut him asunder, and appoint him his portion with the hypocrites: there shall be weeping and gnashing of teeth.
Mat25:1 Then shall the kingdom of heaven be likened unto ten virgins, which took their lamps, and went forth to meet the bridegroom.
Mat25:2 And five of them were wise, and five were foolish.
Mat25:3 They that were foolish took their lamps, and took no oil with them:
Mat25:4 But the wise took oil in their vessels with their lamps.
Mat25:5 While the bridegroom tarried, they all slumbered and slept.
Mat25:6 And at midnight there was a cry made, Behold, the bridegroom cometh; go ye out to meet him.
Mat25:7 Then all those virgins arose, and trimmed their lamps.
Mat25:8 And the foolish said unto the wise, Give us of your oil; for our lamps are gone out.
Mat25:9 But the wise answered, saying, Not so; lest there be not enough for us and you: but go ye rather to them that sell, and buy for yourselves.
Mat25:10 And while they went to buy, the bridegroom came; and they that were ready went in with him to the marriage: and the door was shut.
Mat25:11 Afterward came also the other virgins, saying, Lord, Lord, open to us.
Mat25:12 But he answered and said, Verily I say unto you, I know you not.
Mat25:13 Watch therefore, for ye know neither the day nor the hour wherein the Son of man cometh.
Mat25:14 For the kingdom of heaven is as a man travelling into a far country, who called his own servants, and delivered unto them his goods.
Mat25:15 And unto one he gave five talents, to another two, and to another one; to every man according to his several ability; and straightway took his journey.
Mat25:16 Then he that had received the five talents went and traded with the same, and made them other five talents.
Mat25:17 And likewise he that had received two, he also gained other two.
Mat25:18 But he that had received one went and digged in the earth, and hid his lord's money.
Mat25:19 After a long time the lord of those servants cometh, and reckoneth with them.
Mat25:20 And so he that had received five talents came and brought other five talents, saying, Lord, thou deliveredst unto me five talents: behold, I have gained beside them five talents more.
Mat25:21 His lord said unto him, Well done, thou good and faithful servant: thou hast been faithful over a few things, I will make thee ruler over many things: enter thou into the joy of thy lord.
Mat25:22 He also that had received two talents came and said, Lord, thou deliveredst unto me two talents: behold, I have gained two other talents beside them.
Mat25:23 His lord said unto him, Well done, good and faithful servant; thou hast been faithful over a few things, I will make thee ruler over many things: enter thou into the joy of thy lord.
Mat25:24 Then he which had received the one talent came and said, Lord, I knew thee that thou art an hard man, reaping where thou hast not sown, and gathering where thou hast not strawed:
Mat25:25 And I was afraid, and went and hid thy talent in the earth: lo, there thou hast that is thine.
Mat25:26 His lord answered and said unto him, Thou wicked and slothful servant, thou knewest that I reap where I sowed not, and gather where I have not strawed:
Mat25:27 Thou oughtest therefore to have put my money to the exchangers, and then at my coming I should have received mine own with usury.
Mat25:28 Take therefore the talent from him, and give it unto him which hath ten talents.
Mat25:29 For unto every one that hath shall be given, and he shall have abundance: but from him that hath not shall be taken away even that which he hath.
Mat25:30 And cast ye the unprofitable servant into outer darkness: there shall be weeping and gnashing of teeth.
Mat25:31 When the Son of man shall come in his glory, and all the holy angels with him, then shall he sit upon the throne of his glory:
Mat25:32 And before him shall be gathered all nations: and he shall separate them one from another, as a shepherd divideth his sheep from the goats:
Mat25:33 And he shall set the sheep on his right hand, but the goats on the left.
Mat25:34 Then shall the King say unto them on his right hand, Come, ye blessed of my Father, inherit the kingdom prepared for you from the foundation of the world:
Mat25:35 For I was an hungred, and ye gave me meat: I was thirsty, and ye gave me drink: I was a stranger, and ye took me in:
Mat25:36 Naked, and ye clothed me: I was sick, and ye visited me: I was in prison, and ye came unto me.
Mat25:37 Then shall the righteous answer him, saying, Lord, when saw we thee an hungred, and fed thee? or thirsty, and gave thee drink?
Mat25:38 When saw we thee a stranger, and took thee in? or naked, and clothed thee?
Mat25:39 Or when saw we thee sick, or in prison, and came unto thee?
Mat25:40 And the King shall answer and say unto them, Verily I say unto you, Inasmuch as ye have done it unto one of the least of these my brethren, ye have donit unto me.
Mat25:41 Then shall he say also unto them on the left hand, Depart from me, ye cursed, into everlasting fire, prepared for the devil and his angels:
Mat25:42 For I was an hungred, and ye gave me no meat: I was thirsty, and ye gave me no drink:
Mat25:43 I was a stranger, and ye took me not in: naked, and ye clothed me not: sick, and in prison, and ye visited me not.
Mat25:44 Then shall they also answer him, saying, Lord, when saw we thee an hungred, or athirst, or a stranger, or naked, or sick, or in prison, and did not minister unto thee?
Mat25:45 Then shall he answer them, saying, Verily I say unto you, Inasmuch as ye did it not to one of the least of these, ye did it not to me.
Mat25:46 And these shall go away into everlasting punishment: but the righteous into life eternal.
Mat26:1 And it came to pass, when Jesus had finished all these sayings, he said unto his disciples,
Mat26:2 Ye know that after two days is the feast of the passover, and the Son of man is betrayed to be crucified.
Mat26:3 Then assembled together the chief priests, and the scribes, and the elders of the people, unto the palace of the high priest, who was called Caiaphas,
Mat26:4 And consulted that they might take Jesus by subtilty, and kill him.
Mat26:5 But they said, Not on the feast day, lest there be an uproar among the people.
Mat26:6 Now when Jesus was in Bethany, in the house of Simon the leper,
Mat26:7 There came unto him a woman having an alabaster box of very precious ointment, and poured it on his head, as he sat at meat.
Mat26:8 But when his disciples saw it, they had indignation, saying, To what purpose is this waste?
Mat26:9 For this ointment might have been sold for much, and given to the poor.
Mat26:10 When Jesus understood it, he said unto them, Why trouble ye the woman? for she hath wrought a good work upon me.
Mat26:11 For ye have the poor always with you; but me ye have not always.
Mat26:12 For in that she hath poured this ointment on my body, she did it for my burial.
Mat26:13 Verily I say unto you, Wheresoever this gospel shall be preached in the whole world, there shall also this, that this woman hath done, be told for a memorial of her.
Mat26:14 Then one of the twelve, called Judas Iscariot, went unto the chief priests,
Mat26:15 And said unto them, What will ye give me, and I will deliver him unto you? And they covenanted with him for thirty pieces of silver.
Mat26:16 And from that time he sought opportunity to betray him.
Mat26:17 Now the first day of the feast of unleavened bread the disciples came to Jesus, saying unto him, Where wilt thou that we prepare for thee to eat the passover?
Mat26:18 And he said, Go into the city to such a man, and say unto him, The Master saith, My time is at hand; I will keep the passover at thy house with my disciples.
Mat26:19 And the disciples did as Jesus had appointed them; and they made ready the passover.
Mat26:20 Now when the even was come, he sat down with the twelve.
Mat26:21 And as they did eat, he said, Verily I say unto you, that one of you shall betray me.
Mat26:22 And they were exceeding sorrowful, and began every one of them to say unto him, Lord, is it I?
Mat26:23 And he answered and said, He that dippeth his hand with me in the dish, the same shall betray me.
Mat26:24 The Son of man goeth as it is written of him: but woe unto that man by whom the Son of man is betrayed! it had been good for that man if he had not been born.
Mat26:25 Then Judas, which betrayed him, answered and said, Master, is it I? He said unto him, Thou hast said.
Mat26:26 And as they were eating, Jesus took bread, and blessed it, and brake it, and gave it to the disciples, and said, Take, eat; this is my body.
Mat26:27 And he took the cup, and gave thanks, and gave it to them, saying, Drink ye all of it;
Mat26:28 For this is my blood of the new testament, which is shed for many for the remission of sins.
Mat26:29 But I say unto you, I will not drink henceforth of this fruit of the vine, until that day when I drink it new with you in my Father's kingdom.
Mat26:30 And when they had sung an hymn, they went out into the mount of Olives.
Mat26:31 Then saith Jesus unto them, All ye shall be offended because of me this night: for it is written, I will smite the shepherd, and the sheep of the flock shall be scattered abroad.
Mat26:32 But after I am risen again, I will go before you into Galilee.
Mat26:33 Peter answered and said unto him, Though all men shall be offended because of thee, yet will I never be offended.
Mat26:34 Jesus said unto him, Verily I say unto thee, That this night, before the cock crow, thou shalt deny me thrice.
Mat26:35 Peter said unto him, Though I should die with thee, yet will I not deny thee. Likewise also said all the disciples.
Mat26:36 Then cometh Jesus with them unto a place called Gethsemane, and saith unto the disciples, Sit ye here, while I go and pray yonder.
Mat26:37 And he took with him Peter and the two sons of Zebedee, and began to be sorrowful and very heavy.
Mat26:38 Then saith he unto them, My soul is exceeding sorrowful, even unto death: tarry ye here, and watch with me.
Mat26:39 And he went a little farther, and fell on his face, and prayed, saying, O my Father, if it be possible, let this cup pass from me: nevertheless not as I will, but as thou wilt.
Mat26:40 And he cometh unto the disciples, and findeth them asleep, and saith unto Peter, What, could ye not watch with me one hour?
Mat26:41 Watch and pray, that ye enter not into temptation: the spirit indeed is willing, but the flesh is weak.
Mat26:42 He went away again the second time, and prayed, saying, O my Father, if this cup may not pass away from me, except I drink it, thy will be done.
Mat26:43 And he came and found them asleep again: for their eyes were heavy.
Mat26:44 And he left them, and went away again, and prayed the third time, saying the same words.
Mat26:45 Then cometh he to his disciples, and saith unto them, Sleep on now, and take your rest: behold, the hour is at hand, and the Son of man is betrayed into the hands of sinners.
Mat26:46 Rise, let us be going: behold, he is at hand that doth betray me.
Mat26:47 And while he yet spake, lo, Judas, one of the twelve, came, and with him a great multitude with swords and staves, from the chief priests and elders of the people.
Mat26:48 Now he that betrayed him gave them a sign, saying, Whomsoever I shall kiss, that same is he: hold him fast.
Mat26:49 And forthwith he came to Jesus, and said, Hail, master; and kissed him.
Mat26:50 And Jesus said unto him, Friend, wherefore art thou come? Then came they, and laid hands on Jesus, and took him.
Mat26:51 And, behold, one of them which were with Jesus stretched out his hand, and drew his sword, and struck a servant of the high priest's, and smote off his ear.
Mat26:52 Then said Jesus unto him, Put up again thy sword into his place: for all they that take the sword shall perish with the sword.
Mat26:53 Thinkest thou that I cannot now pray to my Father, and he shall presently give me more than twelve legions of angels?
Mat26:54 But how then shall the scriptures be fulfilled, that thus it must be?
Mat26:55 In that same hour said Jesus to the multitudes, Are ye come out as against a thief with swords and staves for to take me? I sat daily with you teaching in the temple, and ye laid no hold on me.
Mat26:56 But all this was done, that the scriptures of the prophets might be fulfilled. Then all the disciples forsook him, and fled.
Mat26:57 And they that had laid hold on Jesus led him away to Caiaphas the high priest, where the scribes and the elders were assembled.
Mat26:58 But Peter followed him afar off unto the high priest's palace, and went in, and sat with the servants, to see the end.
Mat26:59 Now the chief priests, and elders, and all the council, sought false witness against Jesus, to put him to death;
Mat26:60 But found none: yea, though many false witnesses came, yet found they none. At the last came two false witnesses,
Mat26:61 And said, This fellow said, I am able to destroy the temple of God, and to build it in three days.
Mat26:62 And the high priest arose, and said unto him, Answerest thou nothing? what is iwhich these witness against thee?
Mat26:63 But Jesus held his peace. And the high priest answered and said unto him, I adjure thee by the living God, that thou tell us whether thou be the Christ, the Son of God.
Mat26:64 Jesus saith unto him, Thou hast said: nevertheless I say unto you, Hereafter shall ye see the Son of man sitting on the right hand of power, and coming in the clouds of heaven.
Mat26:65 Then the high priest rent his clothes, saying, He hath spoken blasphemy; what further need have we of witnesses? behold, now ye have heard his blasphemy.
Mat26:66 What think ye? They answered and said, He is guilty of death.
Mat26:67 Then did they spit in his face, and buffeted him; and others smote him with the palms of their hands,
Mat26:68 Saying, Prophesy unto us, thou Christ, Who is he that smote thee?
Mat26:69 Now Peter sat without in the palace: and a damsel came unto him, saying, Thou also wast with Jesus of Galilee.
Mat26:70 But he denied before them all, saying, I know not what thou sayest.
Mat26:71 And when he was gone out into the porch, another maid saw him, and said unto them that were there, This fellow was also with Jesus of Nazareth.
Mat26:72 And again he denied with an oath, I do not know the man.
Mat26:73 And after a while came unto him they that stood by, and said to Peter, Surely thou also art one of them; for thy speech bewrayeth thee.
Mat26:74 Then began he to curse and to swear, saying, I know not the man. And immediately the cock crew.
Mat26:75 And Peter remembered the word of Jesus, which said unto him, Before the cock crow, thou shalt deny me thrice. And he went out, and wept bitterly.
Mat27:1 When the morning was come, all the chief priests and elders of the people took counsel against Jesus to put him to death:
Mat27:2 And when they had bound him, they led him away, and delivered him to Pontius Pilate the governor.
Mat27:3 Then Judas, which had betrayed him, when he saw that he was condemned, repented himself, and brought again the thirty pieces of silver to the chief priests and elders,
Mat27:4 Saying, I have sinned in that I have betrayed the innocent blood. And they said, What is that to us? see thou to that.
Mat27:5 And he cast down the pieces of silver in the temple, and departed, and went and hanged himself.
Mat27:6 And the chief priests took the silver pieces, and said, It is not lawful for to put them into the treasury, because it is the price of blood.
Mat27:7 And they took counsel, and bought with them the potter's field, to bury strangers in.
Mat27:8 Wherefore that field was called, The field of blood, unto this day.
Mat27:9 Then was fulfilled that which was spoken by Jeremy the prophet, saying, And they took the thirty pieces of silver, the price of him that was valued, whom they of the children of Israel did value;
Mat27:10 And gave them for the potter's field, as the Lord appointed me.
Mat27:11 And Jesus stood before the governor: and the governor asked him, saying, Art thou the King of the Jews? And Jesus said unto him, Thou sayest.
Mat27:12 And when he was accused of the chief priests and elders, he answered nothing.
Mat27:13 Then said Pilate unto him, Hearest thou not how many things they witness against thee?
Mat27:14 And he answered him to never a word; insomuch that the governor marvelled greatly.
Mat27:15 Now at that feast the governor was wont to release unto the people a prisoner, whom they would.
Mat27:16 And they had then a notable prisoner, called Barabbas.
Mat27:17 Therefore when they were gathered together, Pilate said unto them, Whom will ye that I release unto you? Barabbas, or Jesus which is called Christ?
Mat27:18 For he knew that for envy they had delivered him.
Mat27:19 When he was set down on the judgment seat, his wife sent unto him, saying, Have thou nothing to do with that just man: for I have suffered many things this day in a dream because of him.
Mat27:20 But the chief priests and elders persuaded the multitude that they should ask Barabbas, and destroy Jesus.
Mat27:21 The governor answered and said unto them, Whether of the twain will ye that I release unto you? They said, Barabbas.
Mat27:22 Pilate saith unto them, What shall I do then with Jesus which is called Christ? They all say unto him, Let him be crucified.
Mat27:23 And the governor said, Why, what evil hath he done? But they cried out the more, saying, Let him be crucified.
Mat27:24 When Pilate saw that he could prevail nothing, but that rather a tumult was made, he took water, and washed his hands before the multitude, saying, I am innocent of the blood of this just person: see ye to it.
Mat27:25 Then answered all the people, and said, His blood be on us, and on our children.
Mat27:26 Then released he Barabbas unto them: and when he had scourged Jesus, he delivered him to be crucified.
Mat27:27 Then the soldiers of the governor took Jesus into the common hall, and gathered unto him the whole band of soldiers.
Mat27:28 And they stripped him, and put on him a scarlet robe.
Mat27:29 And when they had platted a crown of thorns, they put it upon his head, and a reed in his right hand: and they bowed the knee before him, and mocked him, saying, Hail, King of the Jews!
Mat27:30 And they spit upon him, and took the reed, and smote him on the head.
Mat27:31 And after that they had mocked him, they took the robe off from him, and put his own raiment on him, and led him away to crucify him.
Mat27:32 And as they came out, they found a man of Cyrene, Simon by name: him they compelled to bear his cross.
Mat27:33 And when they were come unto a place called Golgotha, that is to say, a place of a skull,
Mat27:34 They gave him vinegar to drink mingled with gall: and when he had tasted thereof, he would not drink.
Mat27:35 And they crucified him, and parted his garments, casting lots: that it might be fulfilled which was spoken by the prophet, They parted my garments among them, and upon my vesture did they cast lots.
Mat27:36 And sitting down they watched him there;
Mat27:37 And set up over his head his accusation written, THIS IS JESUS THE KING OF THE JEWS.
Mat27:38 Then were there two thieves crucified with him, one on the right hand, and another on the left.
Mat27:39 And they that passed by reviled him, wagging their heads,
Mat27:40 And saying, Thou that destroyest the temple, and buildest it in three days, save thyself. If thou be the Son of God, come down from the cross.
Mat27:41 Likewise also the chief priests mocking him, with the scribes and elders, said,
Mat27:42 He saved others; himself he cannot save. If he be the King of Israel, let him now come down from the cross, and we will believe him.
Mat27:43 He trusted in God; let him deliver him now, if he will have him: for he said, I am the Son of God.
Mat27:44 The thieves also, which were crucified with him, cast the same in his teeth.
Mat27:45 Now from the sixth hour there was darkness over all the land unto the ninth hour.
Mat27:46 And about the ninth hour Jesus cried with a loud voice, saying, Eli, Eli, lama sabachthani? that is to say, My God, my God, why hast thou forsaken me?
Mat27:47 Some of them that stood there, when they heard that, said, This man calleth for Elias.
Mat27:48 And straightway one of them ran, and took a spunge, and filled it with vinegar, and put it on a reed, and gave him to drink.
Mat27:49 The rest said, Let be, let us see whether Elias will come to save him.
Mat27:50 Jesus, when he had cried again with a loud voice, yielded up the ghost.
Mat27:51 And, behold, the veil of the temple was rent in twain from the top to the bottom; and the earth did quake, and the rocks rent;
Mat27:52 And the graves were opened; and many bodies of the saints which slept arose,
Mat27:53 And came out of the graves after his resurrection, and went into the holy city, and appeared unto many.
Mat27:54 Now when the centurion, and they that were with him, watching Jesus, saw the earthquake, and those things that were done, they feared greatly, saying, Truly this was the Son of God.
Mat27:55 And many women were there beholding afar off, which followed Jesus from Galilee, ministering unto him:
Mat27:56 Among which was Mary Magdalene, and Mary the mother of James and Jose at his feet,
Mark5:23 And besought him greatly, saying, My little daughter lieth at the point of death: I pray thee, come and lay thy hands on her, that she may be healed; and she shall live.
Mark5:24 And Jesus went with him; and much people followed him, and thronged him.
Mark5:25 And a certain woman, which had an issue of blood twelve years,
Mark5:26 And had suffered many things of many physicians, and had spent all that she had, and was nothing bettered, but rather grew worse,
Mark5:27 When she had heard of Jesus, came in the press behind, and touched his garment.
Mark5:28 For she said, If I may touch but his clothes, I shall be whole.
Mark5:29 And straightway the fountain of her blood was dried up; and she felt in her body that she was healed of that plague.
Mark5:30 And Jesus, immediately knowing in himself that virtue had gone out of him, turned him about in the press, and said, Who touched my clothes?
Mark5:31 And his disciples said unto him, Thou seest the multitude thronging thee, and sayest thou, Who touched me?
Mark5:32 And he looked round about to see her that had done this thing.
Mark5:33 But the woman fearing and trembling, knowing what was done in her, came and fell down before him, and told him all the truth.
Mark5:34 And he said unto her, Daughter, thy faith hath made thee whole; go in peace, and be whole of thy plague.
Mark5:35 While he yet spake, there came from the ruler of the synagogue's house certain which said, Thy daughter is dead: why troublest thou the Master any further?
Mark5:36 As soon as Jesus heard the word that was spoken, he saith unto the ruler of the synagogue, Be not afraid, only believe.
Mark5:37 And he suffered no man to follow him, save Peter, and James, and John the brother of James.
Mark5:38 And he cometh to the house of the ruler of the synagogue, and seeth the tumult, and them that wept and wailed greatly.
Mark5:39 And when he was come in, he saith unto them, Why make ye this ado, and weep? the damsel is not dead, but sleepeth.
Mark5:40 And they laughed him to scorn. But when he had put them all out, he taketh the father and the mother of the damsel, and them that were with him, and entereth in where the damsel was lying.
Mark5:41 And he took the damsel by the hand, and said unto her, Talitha cumi; which is, being interpreted, Damsel, I say unto thee, arise.
Mark5:42 And straightway the damsel arose, and walked; for she was of the age of twelve years. And they were astonished with a great astonishment.
Mark5:43 And he charged them straitly that no man should know it; and commanded that something should be given her to eat.
Mark6:1 And he went out from thence, and came into his own country; and his disciples follow him.
Mark6:2 And when the sabbath day was come, he began to teach in the synagogue: and many hearing him were astonished, saying, From whence hath this man these things? and what wisdom is this which is given unto him, that even such mighty works are wrought by his hands?
Mark6:3 Is not this the carpenter, the son of Mary, the brother of James, and Joses, and of Juda, and Simon? and are not his sisters here with us? And they were offended at him.
Mark6:4 But Jesus said unto them, A prophet is not without honour, but in his own country, and among his own kin, and in his own house.
Mark6:5 And he could there do no mighty work, save that he laid his hands upon a few sick folk, and healed them.
Mark6:6 And he marvelled because of their unbelief. And he went round about the villages, teaching.
Mark6:7 And he called unto him the twelve, and began to send them forth by two and two; and gave them power over unclean spirits;
Mark6:8 And commanded them that they should take nothing for their journey, save a staff only; no scrip, no bread, no money in their purse:
Mark6:9 But be shod with sandals; and not put on two coats.
Mark6:10 And he said unto them, In what place soever ye enter into an house, there abide till ye depart from that place.
Mark6:11 And whosoever shall not receive you, nor hear you, when ye depart thence, shake off the dust under your feet for a testimony against them. Verily I say unto you, It shall be more tolerable for Sodom and Gomorrha in the day of judgment, than for that city.
Mark6:12 And they went out, and preached that men should repent.
Mark6:13 And they cast out many devils, and anointed with oil many that were sick, and healed them.
Mark6:14 And king Herod heard of him; (for his name was spread abroad:) and he said, That John the Baptist was risen from the dead, and therefore mighty works do shew forth themselves in him.
Mark6:15 Others said, That it is Elias. And others said, That it is a prophet, or as one of the prophets.
Mark6:16 But when Herod heard thereof, he said, It is John, whom I beheaded: he is risen from the dead.
Mark6:17 For Herod himself had sent forth and laid hold upon John, and bound him in prison for Herodias' sake, his brother Philip's wife: for he had married her.
Mark6:18 For John had said unto Herod, It is not lawful for thee to have thy brother's wife.
Mark6:19 Therefore Herodias had a quarrel against him, and would have killed him; but she could not:
Mark6:20 For Herod feared John, knowing that he was a just man and an holy, and observed him; and when he heard him, he did many things, and heard him gladly.
Mark6:21 And when a convenient day was come, that Herod on his birthday made a supper to his lords, high captains, and chief estates of Galilee;
Mark6:22 And when the daughter of the said Herodias came in, and danced, and pleased Herod and them that sat with him, the king said unto the damsel, Ask of me whatsoever thou wilt, and I will give it thee.
Mark6:23 And he sware unto her, Whatsoever thou shalt ask of me, I will give it thee, unto the half of my kingdom.
Mark6:24 And she went forth, and said unto her mother, What shall I ask? And she said, The head of John the Baptist.
Mark6:25 And she came in straightway with haste unto the king, and asked, saying, I will that thou give me by and by in a charger the head of John the Baptist.
Mark6:26 And the king was exceeding sorry; yet for his oath's sake, and for their sakes which sat with him, he would not reject her.
Mark6:27 And immediately the king sent an executioner, and commanded his head to be brought: and he went and beheaded him in the prison,
Mark6:28 And brought his head in a charger, and gave it to the damsel: and the damsel gave it to her mother.
Mark6:29 And when his disciples heard of it, they came and took up his corpse, and laid it in a tomb.
Mark6:30 And the apostles gathered themselves together unto Jesus, and told him all things, both what they had done, and what they had taught.
Mark6:31 And he said unto them, Come ye yourselves apart into a desert place, and rest a while: for there were many coming and going, and they had no leisure so much as to eat.
Mark6:32 And they departed into a desert place by ship privately.
Mark6:33 And the people saw them departing, and many knew him, and ran afoot thither out of all cities, and outwent them, and came together unto him.
Mark6:34 And Jesus, when he came out, saw much people, and was moved with compassion toward them, because they were as sheep not having a shepherd: and he began to teach them many things.
Mark6:35 And when the day was now far spent, his disciples came unto him, and said, This is a desert place, and now the time is far passed:
Mark6:36 Send them away, that they may go into the country round about, and into the villages, and buy themselves bread: for they have nothing to eat.
Mark6:37 He answered and said unto them, Give ye them to eat. And they say unto him, Shall we go and buy two hundred pennyworth of bread, and give them to eat?
Mark6:38 He saith unto them, How many loaves have ye? go and see. And when they knew, they say, Five, and two fishes.
Mark6:39 And he commanded them to make all sit down by companies upon the green grass.
Mark6:40 And they sat down in ranks, by hundreds, and by fifties.
Mark6:41 And when he had taken the five loaves and the two fishes, he looked up to heaven, and blessed, and brake the loaves, and gave them to his disciples to set before them; and the two fishes divided he among tm all.
Mark6:42 And they did all eat, and were filled.
Mark6:43 And they took up twelve baskets full of the fragments, and of the fishes.
Mark6:44 And they that did eat of the loaves were about five thousand men.
Mark6:45 And straightway he constrained his disciples to get into the ship, and to go to the other side before unto Bethsaida, while he sent away the people.
Mark6:46 And when he had sent them away, he departed into a mountain to pray.
Mark6:47 And when even was come, the ship was in the midst of the sea, and he alone on the land.
Mark6:48 And he saw them toiling in rowing; for the wind was contrary unto them: and about the fourth watch of the night he cometh unto them, walking upon the sea, and would have passed by them.
Mark6:49 But when they saw him walking upon the sea, they supposed it had been a spirit, and cried out:
Mark6:50 For they all saw him, and were troubled. And immediately he talked with them, and saith unto them, Be of good cheer: it is I; be not afraid.
Mark6:51 And he went up unto them into the ship; and the wind ceased: and they were sore amazed in themselves beyond measure, and wondered.
Mark6:52 For they considered not the miracle of the loaves: for their heart was hardened.
Mark6:53 And when they had passed over, they came into the land of Gennesaret, and drew to the shore.
Mark6:54 And when they were come out of the ship, straightway they knew him,
Mark6:55 And ran through that whole region round about, and began to carry about in beds those that were sick, where they heard he was.
Mark6:56 And whithersoever he entered, into villages, or cities, or country, they laid the sick in the streets, and besought him that they might touch if it were but the border of his garment: and as many as touched him were made whole.
Mark7:1 Then came together unto him the Pharisees, and certain of the scribes, which came from Jerusalem.
Mark7:2 And when they saw some of his disciples eat bread with defiled, that is to say, with unwashen, hands, they found fault.
Mark7:3 For the Pharisees, and all the Jews, except they wash their hands oft, eat not, holding the tradition of the elders.
Mark7:4 And when they come from the market, except they wash, they eat not. And many other things there be, which they have received to hold, as the washing of cups, and pots, brasen vessels, and of tables.
Mark7:5 Then the Pharisees and scribes asked him, Why walk not thy disciples according to the tradition of the elders, but eat bread with unwashen hands?
Mark7:6 He answered and said unto them, Well hath Esaias prophesied of you hypocrites, as it is written, This people honoureth me with their lips, but their heart is far from me.
Mark7:7 Howbeit in vain do they worship me, teaching for doctrines the commandments of men.
Mark7:8 For laying aside the commandment of God, ye hold the tradition of men, as the washing of pots and cups: and many other such like things ye do.
Mark7:9 And he said unto them, Full well ye reject the commandment of God, that ye may keep your own tradition.
Mark7:10 For Moses said, Honour thy father and thy mother; and, Whoso curseth father or mother, let him die the death:
Mark7:11 But ye say, If a man shall say to his father or mother, It is Corban, that is to say, a gift, by whatsoever thou mightest be profited by me; he shall be free.
Mark7:12 And ye suffer him no more to do ought for his father or his mother;
Mark7:13 Making the word of God of none effect through your tradition, which ye have delivered: and many such like things do ye.
Mark7:14 And when he had called all the people unto him, he said unto them, Hearken unto me every one of you, and understand:
Mark7:15 There is nothing from without a man, that entering into him can defile him: but the things which come out of him, those are they that defile the man.
Mark7:16 If any man have ears to hear, let him hear.
Mark7:17 And when he was entered into the house from the people, his disciples asked him concerning the parable.
Mark7:18 And he saith unto them, Are ye so without understanding also? Do ye not perceive, that whatsoever thing from without entereth into the man, it cannot defile him;
Mark7:19 Because it entereth not into his heart, but into the belly, and goeth out into the draught, purging all meats?
Mark7:20 And he said, That which cometh out of the man, that defileth the man.
Mark7:21 For from within, out of the heart of men, proceed evil thoughts, adulteries, fornications, murders,
Mark7:22 Thefts, covetousness, wickedness, deceit, lasciviousness, an evil eye, blasphemy, pride, foolishness:
Mark7:23 All these evil things come from within, and defile the man.
Mark7:24 And from thence he arose, and went into the borders of Tyre and Sidon, and entered into an house, and would have no man know it: but he could not be hid.
Mark7:25 For a certain woman, whose young daughter had an unclean spirit, heard of him, and came and fell at his feet:
Mark7:26 The woman was a Greek, a Syrophenician by nation; and she besought him that he would cast forth the devil out of her daughter.
Mark7:27 But Jesus said unto her, Let the children first be filled: for it is not meet to take the children's bread, and to cast it unto the dogs.
Mark7:28 And she answered and said unto him, Yes, Lord: yet the dogs under the table eat of the children's crumbs.
Mark7:29 And he said unto her, For this saying go thy way; the devil is gone out of thy daughter.
Mark7:30 And when she was come to her house, she found the devil gone out, and her daughter laid upon the bed.
Mark7:31 And again, departing from the coasts of Tyre and Sidon, he came unto the sea of Galilee, through the midst of the coasts of Decapolis.
Mark7:32 And they bring unto him one that was deaf, and had an impediment in his speech; and they beseech him to put his hand upon him.
Mark7:33 And he took him aside from the multitude, and put his fingers into his ears, and he spit, and touched his tongue;
Mark7:34 And looking up to heaven, he sighed, and saith unto him, Ephphatha, that is, Be opened.
Mark7:35 And straightway his ears were opened, and the string of his tongue was loosed, and he spake plain.
Mark7:36 And he charged them that they should tell no man: but the more he charged them, so much the more a great deal they published it;
Mark7:37 And were beyond measure astonished, saying, He hath done all things well: he maketh both the deaf to hear, and the dumb to speak.
Mark8:1 In those days the multitude being very great, and having nothing to eat, Jesus called his disciples unto him, and saith unto them,
Mark8:2 I have compassion on the multitude, because they have now been with me three days, and have nothing to eat:
Mark8:3 And if I send them away fasting to their own houses, they will faint by the way: for divers of them came from far.
Mark8:4 And his disciples answered him, From whence can a man satisfy these men with bread here in the wilderness?
Mark8:5 And he asked them, How many loaves have ye? And they said, Seven.
Mark8:6 And he commanded the people to sit down on the ground: and he took the seven loaves, and gave thanks, and brake, and gave to his disciples to set before them; and they did set them before the people.
Mark8:7 And they had a few small fishes: and he blessed, and commanded to set them also before them.
Mark8:8 So they did eat, and were filled: and they took up of the broken meat that was left seven baskets.
Mark8:9 And they that had eaten were about four thousand: and he sent them away.
Mark8:10 And straightway he entered into a ship with his disciples, and came into the parts of Dalmanutha.
Mark8:11 And the Pharisees came forth, and began to question with him, seeking of him a sign from heaven, tempting him.
Mark8:12 And he sighed deeply in his spirit, and saith, Why doth this generation seek after a sign? verily I say unto you, There shall no sign be given unto this generation.
Mark8:13 And he left them, and entering into the ship again departed to the other side.
Mark8:14 Now the disciples had forgotten to take bread, neither had they in the ship with them more than one loaf.
Mark8:15 And he charged them, saying, Take heed, beware of the leaven of the Pharisees, and of the leaven of HerodMark8:16 And they reasoned among themselves, saying, It is because we have no bread.
Mark8:17 And when Jesus knew it, he saith unto them, Why reason ye, because ye have no bread? perceive ye not yet, neither understand? have ye your heart yet hardened?
Mark8:18 Having eyes, see ye not? and having ears, hear ye not? and do ye not remember?
Mark8:19 When I brake the five loaves among five thousand, how many baskets full of fragments took ye up? They say unto him, Twelve.
Mark8:20 And when the seven among four thousand, how many baskets full of fragments took ye up? And they said, Seven.
Mark8:21 And he said unto them, How is it that ye do not understand?
Mark8:22 And he cometh to Bethsaida; and they bring a blind man unto him, and besought him to touch him.
Mark8:23 And he took the blind man by the hand, and led him out of the town; and when he had spit on his eyes, and put his hands upon him, he asked him if he saw ought.
Mark8:24 And he looked up, and said, I see men as trees, walking.
Mark8:25 After that he put his hands again upon his eyes, and made him look up: and he was restored, and saw every man clearly.
Mark8:26 And he sent him away to his house, saying, Neither go into the town, nor tell it to any in the town.
Mark8:27 And Jesus went out, and his disciples, into the towns of Caesarea Philippi: and by the way he asked his disciples, saying unto them, Whom do men say that I am?
Mark8:28 And they answered, John the Baptist: but some say, Elias; and others, One of the prophets.
Mark8:29 And he saith unto them, But whom say ye that I am? And Peter answereth and saith unto him, Thou art the Christ.
Mark8:30 And he charged them that they should tell no man of him.
Mark8:31 And he began to teach them, that the Son of man must suffer many things, and be rejected of the elders, and of the chief priests, and scribes, and be killed, and after three days rise again.
Mark8:32 And he spake that saying openly. And Peter took him, and began to rebuke him.
Mark8:33 But when he had turned about and looked on his disciples, he rebuked Peter, saying, Get thee behind me, Satan: for thou savourest not the things that be of God, but the things that be of men.
Mark8:34 And when he had called the people unto him with his disciples also, he said unto them, Whosoever will come after me, let him deny himself, and take up his cross, and follow me.
Mark8:35 For whosoever will save his life shall lose it; but whosoever shall lose his life for my sake and the gospel's, the same shall save it.
Mark8:36 For what shall it profit a man, if he shall gain the whole world, and lose his own soul?
Mark8:37 Or what shall a man give in exchange for his soul?
Mark8:38 Whosoever therefore shall be ashamed of me and of my words in this adulterous and sinful generation; of him also shall the Son of man be ashamed, when he cometh in the glory of his Father with the holy angels.
Mark9:1 And he said unto them, Verily I say unto you, That there be some of them that stand here, which shall not taste of death, till they have seen the kingdom of God come with power.
Mark9:2 And after six days Jesus taketh with him Peter, and James, and John, and leadeth them up into an high mountain apart by themselves: and he was transfigured before them.
Mark9:3 And his raiment became shining, exceeding white as snow; so as no fuller on earth can white them.
Mark9:4 And there appeared unto them Elias with Moses: and they were talking with Jesus.
Mark9:5 And Peter answered and said to Jesus, Master, it is good for us to be here: and let us make three tabernacles; one for thee, and one for Moses, and one for Elias.
Mark9:6 For he wist not what to say; for they were sore afraid.
Mark9:7 And there was a cloud that overshadowed them: and a voice came out of the cloud, saying, This is my beloved Son: hear him.
Mark9:8 And suddenly, when they had looked round about, they saw no man any more, save Jesus only with themselves.
Mark9:9 And as they came down from the mountain, he charged them that they should tell no man what things they had seen, till the Son of man were risen from the dead.
Mark9:10 And they kept that saying with themselves, questioning one with another what the rising from the dead should mean.
Mark9:11 And they asked him, saying, Why say the scribes that Elias must first come?
Mark9:12 And he answered and told them, Elias verily cometh first, and restoreth all things; and how it is written of the Son of man, that he must suffer many things, and be set at nought.
Mark9:13 But I say unto you, That Elias is indeed come, and they have done unto him whatsoever they listed, as it is written of him.
Mark9:14 And when he came to his disciples, he saw a great multitude about them, and the scribes questioning with them.
Mark9:15 And straightway all the people, when they beheld him, were greatly amazed, and running to him saluted him.
Mark9:16 And he asked the scribes, What question ye with them?
Mark9:17 And one of the multitude answered and said, Master, I have brought unto thee my son, which hath a dumb spirit;
Mark9:18 And wheresoever he taketh him, he teareth him: and he foameth, and gnasheth with his teeth, and pineth away: and I spake to thy disciples that they should cast him out; and they could not.
Mark9:19 He answereth him, and saith, O faithless generation, how long shall I be with you? how long shall I suffer you? bring him unto me.
Mark9:20 And they brought him unto him: and when he saw him, straightway the spirit tare him; and he fell on the ground, and wallowed foaming.
Mark9:21 And he asked his father, How long is it ago since this came unto him? And he said, Of a child.
Mark9:22 And ofttimes it hath cast him into the fire, and into the waters, to destroy him: but if thou canst do any thing, have compassion on us, and help us.
Mark9:23 Jesus said unto him, If thou canst believe, all things are possible to him that believeth.
Mark9:24 And straightway the father of the child cried out, and said with tears, Lord, I believe; help thou mine unbelief.
Mark9:25 When Jesus saw that the people came running together, he rebuked the foul spirit, saying unto him, Thou dumb and deaf spirit, I charge thee, come out of him, and enter no more into him.
Mark9:26 And the spirit cried, and rent him sore, and came out of him: and he was as one dead; insomuch that many said, He is dead.
Mark9:27 But Jesus took him by the hand, and lifted him up; and he arose.
Mark9:28 And when he was come into the house, his disciples asked him privately, Why could not we cast him out?
Mark9:29 And he said unto them, This kind can come forth by nothing, but by prayer and fasting.
Mark9:30 And they departed thence, and passed through Galilee; and he would not that any man should know it.
Mark9:31 For he taught his disciples, and said unto them, The Son of man is delivered into the hands of men, and they shall kill him; and after that he is killed, he shall rise the third day.
Mark9:32 But they understood not that saying, and were afraid to ask him.
Mark9:33 And he came to Capernaum: and being in the house he asked them, What was it that ye disputed among yourselves by the way?
Mark9:34 But they held their peace: for by the way they had disputed among themselves, who should be the greatest.
Mark9:35 And he sat down, and called the twelve, and saith unto them, If any man desire to be first, the same shall be last of all, and servant of all.
Mark9:36 And he took a child, and set him in the midst of them: and when he had taken him in his arms, he said unto them,
Mark9:37 Whosoever shall receive one of such children in my name, receiveth me: and whosoever shall receive me, receiveth not me, but him that sent me.
Mark9:38 And John answered him, saying, Master, we saw one casting out devils in thy name, and he followeth not us: and we forbad him, because he followeth not us.
Mark9:39 But Jesus said, Forbid him not: for there is no man which shall do a miracle in my name, that can lightly speak evil of me.
Mark9:40 For he that is not against us is on our part.
Mark9:41 For whosoever shall give you a cup of water to drink in my name, because ye belong to Christ, verily I say unto you, he shall not lose his reward.
Mark9:42 Andhis disciples said unto him, Where wilt thou that we go and prepare that thou mayest eat the passover?
Mark14:13 And he sendeth forth two of his disciples, and saith unto them, Go ye into the city, and there shall meet you a man bearing a pitcher of water: follow him.
Mark14:14 And wheresoever he shall go in, say ye to the goodman of the house, The Master saith, Where is the guestchamber, where I shall eat the passover with my disciples?
Mark14:15 And he will shew you a large upper room furnished and prepared: there make ready for us.
Mark14:16 And his disciples went forth, and came into the city, and found as he had said unto them: and they made ready the passover.
Mark14:17 And in the evening he cometh with the twelve.
Mark14:18 And as they sat and did eat, Jesus said, Verily I say unto you, One of you which eateth with me shall betray me.
Mark14:19 And they began to be sorrowful, and to say unto him one by one, Is it I? and another said, Is it I?
Mark14:20 And he answered and said unto them, It is one of the twelve, that dippeth with me in the dish.
Mark14:21 The Son of man indeed goeth, as it is written of him: but woe to that man by whom the Son of man is betrayed! good were it for that man if he had never been born.
Mark14:22 And as they did eat, Jesus took bread, and blessed, and brake it, and gave to them, and said, Take, eat: this is my body.
Mark14:23 And he took the cup, and when he had given thanks, he gave it to them: and they all drank of it.
Mark14:24 And he said unto them, This is my blood of the new testament, which is shed for many.
Mark14:25 Verily I say unto you, I will drink no more of the fruit of the vine, until that day that I drink it new in the kingdom of God.
Mark14:26 And when they had sung an hymn, they went out into the mount of Olives.
Mark14:27 And Jesus saith unto them, All ye shall be offended because of me this night: for it is written, I will smite the shepherd, and the sheep shall be scattered.
Mark14:28 But after that I am risen, I will go before you into Galilee.
Mark14:29 But Peter said unto him, Although all shall be offended, yet will not I.
Mark14:30 And Jesus saith unto him, Verily I say unto thee, That this day, even in this night, before the cock crow twice, thou shalt deny me thrice.
Mark14:31 But he spake the more vehemently, If I should die with thee, I will not deny thee in any wise. Likewise also said they all.
Mark14:32 And they came to a place which was named Gethsemane: and he saith to his disciples, Sit ye here, while I shall pray.
Mark14:33 And he taketh with him Peter and James and John, and began to be sore amazed, and to be very heavy;
Mark14:34 And saith unto them, My soul is exceeding sorrowful unto death: tarry ye here, and watch.
Mark14:35 And he went forward a little, and fell on the ground, and prayed that, if it were possible, the hour might pass from him.
Mark14:36 And he said, Abba, Father, all things are possible unto thee; take away this cup from me: nevertheless not what I will, but what thou wilt.
Mark14:37 And he cometh, and findeth them sleeping, and saith unto Peter, Simon, sleepest thou? couldest not thou watch one hour?
Mark14:38 Watch ye and pray, lest ye enter into temptation. The spirit truly is ready, but the flesh is weak.
Mark14:39 And again he went away, and prayed, and spake the same words.
Mark14:40 And when he returned, he found them asleep again, (for their eyes were heavy,) neither wist they what to answer him.
Mark14:41 And he cometh the third time, and saith unto them, Sleep on now, and take your rest: it is enough, the hour is come; behold, the Son of man is betrayed into the hands of sinners.
Mark14:42 Rise up, let us go; lo, he that betrayeth me is at hand.
Mark14:43 And immediately, while he yet spake, cometh Judas, one of the twelve, and with him a great multitude with swords and staves, from the chief priests and the scribes and the elders.
Mark14:44 And he that betrayed him had given them a token, saying, Whomsoever I shall kiss, that same is he; take him, and lead him away safely.
Mark14:45 And as soon as he was come, he goeth straightway to him, and saith, Master, master; and kissed him.
Mark14:46 And they laid their hands on him, and took him.
Mark14:47 And one of them that stood by drew a sword, and smote a servant of the high priest, and cut off his ear.
Mark14:48 And Jesus answered and said unto them, Are ye come out, as against a thief, with swords and with staves to take me?
Mark14:49 I was daily with you in the temple teaching, and ye took me not: but the scriptures must be fulfilled.
Mark14:50 And they all forsook him, and fled.
Mark14:51 And there followed him a certain young man, having a linen cloth cast about his naked body; and the young men laid hold on him:
Mark14:52 And he left the linen cloth, and fled from them naked.
Mark14:53 And they led Jesus away to the high priest: and with him were assembled all the chief priests and the elders and the scribes.
Mark14:54 And Peter followed him afar off, even into the palace of the high priest: and he sat with the servants, and warmed himself at the fire.
Mark14:55 And the chief priests and all the council sought for witness against Jesus to put him to death; and found none.
Mark14:56 For many bare false witness against him, but their witness agreed not together.
Mark14:57 And there arose certain, and bare false witness against him, saying,
Mark14:58 We heard him say, I will destroy this temple that is made with hands, and within three days I will build another made without hands.
Mark14:59 But neither so did their witness agree together.
Mark14:60 And the high priest stood up in the midst, and asked Jesus, saying, Answerest thou nothing? what is it which these witness against thee?
Mark14:61 But he held his peace, and answered nothing. Again the high priest asked him, and said unto him, Art thou the Christ, the Son of the Blessed?
Mark14:62 And Jesus said, I am: and ye shall see the Son of man sitting on the right hand of power, and coming in the clouds of heaven.
Mark14:63 Then the high priest rent his clothes, and saith, What need we any further witnesses?
Mark14:64 Ye have heard the blasphemy: what think ye? And they all condemned him to be guilty of death.
Mark14:65 And some began to spit on him, and to cover his face, and to buffet him, and to say unto him, Prophesy: and the servants did strike him with the palms of their hands.
Mark14:66 And as Peter was beneath in the palace, there cometh one of the maids of the high priest:
Mark14:67 And when she saw Peter warming himself, she looked upon him, and said, And thou also wast with Jesus of Nazareth.
Mark14:68 But he denied, saying, I know not, neither understand I what thou sayest. And he went out into the porch; and the cock crew.
Mark14:69 And a maid saw him again, and began to say to them that stood by, This is one of them.
Mark14:70 And he denied it again. And a little after, they that stood by said again to Peter, Surely thou art one of them: for thou art a Galilaean, and thy speech agreeth thereto.
Mark14:71 But he began to curse and to swear, saying, I know not this man of whom ye speak.
Mark14:72 And the second time the cock crew. And Peter called to mind the word that Jesus said unto him, Before the cock crow twice, thou shalt deny me thrice. And when he thought thereon, he wept.
Mark15:1 And straightway in the morning the chief priests held a consultation with the elders and scribes and the whole council, and bound Jesus, and carried him away, and delivered him to Pilate.
Mark15:2 And Pilate asked him, Art thou the King of the Jews? And he answering said unto him, Thou sayest it.
Mark15:3 And the chief priests accused him of many things: but he answered nothing.
Mark15:4 And Pilate asked him again, saying, Answerest thou nothing? behold how many things they witness against thee.
Mark15:5 But Jesus yet answered nothing; so that Pilate marvelled.
Mark15:6 Now at that feast he released unto them one prisoner, whomsoever they desired.
Mark15:7 And there was one named Barabbas, which lay bound with them that had made insurrection with him, who had committed murder in the insurrection.
Mark15:8 And the multitude crying aud began to desire him to do as he had ever done unto them.
Mark15:9 But Pilate answered them, saying, Will ye that I release unto you the King of the Jews?
Mark15:10 For he knew that the chief priests had delivered him for envy.
Mark15:11 But the chief priests moved the people, that he should rather release Barabbas unto them.
Mark15:12 And Pilate answered and said again unto them, What will ye then that I shall do unto him whom ye call the King of the Jews?
Mark15:13 And they cried out again, Crucify him.
Mark15:14 Then Pilate said unto them, Why, what evil hath he done? And they cried out the more exceedingly, Crucify him.
Mark15:15 And so Pilate, willing to content the people, released Barabbas unto them, and delivered Jesus, when he had scourged him, to be crucified.
Mark15:16 And the soldiers led him away into the hall, called Praetorium; and they call together the whole band.
Mark15:17 And they clothed him with purple, and platted a crown of thorns, and put it about his head,
Mark15:18 And began to salute him, Hail, King of the Jews!
Mark15:19 And they smote him on the head with a reed, and did spit upon him, and bowing their knees worshipped him.
Mark15:20 And when they had mocked him, they took off the purple from him, and put his own clothes on him, and led him out to crucify him.
Mark15:21 And they compel one Simon a Cyrenian, who passed by, coming out of the country, the father of Alexander and Rufus, to bear his cross.
Mark15:22 And they bring him unto the place Golgotha, which is, being interpreted, The place of a skull.
Mark15:23 And they gave him to drink wine mingled with myrrh: but he received it not.
Mark15:24 And when they had crucified him, they parted his garments, casting lots upon them, what every man should take.
Mark15:25 And it was the third hour, and they crucified him.
Mark15:26 And the superscription of his accusation was written over, THE KING OF THE JEWS.
Mark15:27 And with him they crucify two thieves; the one on his right hand, and the other on his left.
Mark15:28 And the scripture was fulfilled, which saith, And he was numbered with the transgressors.
Mark15:29 And they that passed by railed on him, wagging their heads, and saying, Ah, thou that destroyest the temple, and buildest it in three days,
Mark15:30 Save thyself, and come down from the cross.
Mark15:31 Likewise also the chief priests mocking said among themselves with the scribes, He saved others; himself he cannot save.
Mark15:32 Let Christ the King of Israel descend now from the cross, that we may see and believe. And they that were crucified with him reviled him.
Mark15:33 And when the sixth hour was come, there was darkness over the whole land until the ninth hour.
Mark15:34 And at the ninth hour Jesus cried with a loud voice, saying, Eloi, Eloi, lama sabachthani? which is, being interpreted, My God, my God, why hast thou forsaken me?
Mark15:35 And some of them that stood by, when they heard it, said, Behold, he calleth Elias.
Mark15:36 And one ran and filled a spunge full of vinegar, and put it on a reed, and gave him to drink, saying, Let alone; let us see whether Elias will come to take him down.
Mark15:37 And Jesus cried with a loud voice, and gave up the ghost.
Mark15:38 And the veil of the temple was rent in twain from the top to the bottom.
Mark15:39 And when the centurion, which stood over against him, saw that he so cried out, and gave up the ghost, he said, Truly this man was the Son of God.
Mark15:40 There were also women looking on afar off: among whom was Mary Magdalene, and Mary the mother of James the less and of Joses, and Salome;
Mark15:41 (Who also, when he was in Galilee, followed him, and ministered unto him;) and many other women which came up with him unto Jerusalem.
Mark15:42 And now when the even was come, because it was the preparation, that is, the day before the sabbath,
Mark15:43 Joseph of Arimathaea, an honourable counsellor, which also waited for the kingdom of God, came, and went in boldly unto Pilate, and craved the body of Jesus.
Mark15:44 And Pilate marvelled if he were already dead: and calling unto him the centurion, he asked him whether he had been any while dead.
Mark15:45 And when he knew it of the centurion, he gave the body to Joseph.
Mark15:46 And he bought fine linen, and took him down, and wrapped him in the linen, and laid him in a sepulchre which was hewn out of a rock, and rolled a stone unto the door of the sepulchre.
Mark15:47 And Mary Magdalene and Mary the mother of Joses beheld where he was laid.
Mark16:1 And when the sabbath was past, Mary Magdalene, and Mary the mother of James, and Salome, had bought sweet spices, that they might come and anoint him.
Mark16:2 And very early in the morning the first day of the week, they came unto the sepulchre at the rising of the sun.
Mark16:3 And they said among themselves, Who shall roll us away the stone from the door of the sepulchre?
Mark16:4 And when they looked, they saw that the stone was rolled away: for it was very great.
Mark16:5 And entering into the sepulchre, they saw a young man sitting on the right side, clothed in a long white garment; and they were affrighted.
Mark16:6 And he saith unto them, Be not affrighted: Ye seek Jesus of Nazareth, which was crucified: he is risen; he is not here: behold the place where they laid him.
Mark16:7 But go your way, tell his disciples and Peter that he goeth before you into Galilee: there shall ye see him, as he said unto you.
Mark16:8 And they went out quickly, and fled from the sepulchre; for they trembled and were amazed: neither said they any thing to any man; for they were afraid.
Mark16:9 Now when Jesus was risen early the first day of the week, he appeared first to Mary Magdalene, out of whom he had cast seven devils.
Mark16:10 And she went and told them that had been with him, as they mourned and wept.
Mark16:11 And they, when they had heard that he was alive, and had been seen of her, believed not.
Mark16:12 After that he appeared in another form unto two of them, as they walked, and went into the country.
Mark16:13 And they went and told it unto the residue: neither believed they them.
Mark16:14 Afterward he appeared unto the eleven as they sat at meat, and upbraided them with their unbelief and hardness of heart, because they believed not them which had seen him after he was risen.
Mark16:15 And he said unto them, Go ye into all the world, and preach the gospel to every creature.
Mark16:16 He that believeth and is baptized shall be saved; but he that believeth not shall be damned.
Mark16:17 And these signs shall follow them that believe; In my name shall they cast out devils; they shall speak with new tongues;
Mark16:18 They shall take up serpents; and if they drink any deadly thing, it shall not hurt them; they shall lay hands on the sick, and they shall recover.
Mark16:19 So then after the Lord had spoken unto them, he was received up into heaven, and sat on the right hand of God.
Mark16:20 And they went forth, and preached every where, the Lord working with them, and confirming the word with signs following. Amen.
Luke1:1 Forasmuch as many have taken in hand to set forth in order a declaration of those things which are most surely believed among us,
Luke1:2 Even as they delivered them unto us, which from the beginning were eyewitnesses, and ministers of the word;
Luke1:3 It seemed good to me also, having had perfect understanding of all things from the very first, to write unto thee in order, most excellent Theophilus,
Luke1:4 That thou mightest know the certainty of those things, wherein thou hast been instructed.
Luke1:5 There was in the days of Herod, the king of Judaea, a certain priest named Zacharias, of the course of Abia: and his wife was of the daughters of Aaron, and her name was Elisabeth.
Luke1:6 And they were both righteous before God, walking in all the commandments and ordinances of the Lord blameless.
Luke1:7 And they had no child, because that Elisabeth was barren, and they both were now well stricken in years.
Luke1:8 And it came to pass, that while he executed the priest's office before God in the order of his course,
Luke1:9 According to the custom of the priest's fice, his lot was to burn incense when he went into the temple of the Lord.
Luke1:10 And the whole multitude of the people were praying without at the time of incense.
Luke1:11 And there appeared unto him an angel of the Lord standing on the right side of the altar of incense.
Luke1:12 And when Zacharias saw him, he was troubled, and fear fell upon him.
Luke1:13 But the angel said unto him, Fear not, Zacharias: for thy prayer is heard; and thy wife Elisabeth shall bear thee a son, and thou shalt call his name John.
Luke1:14 And thou shalt have joy and gladness; and many shall rejoice at his birth.
Luke1:15 For he shall be great in the sight of the Lord, and shall drink neither wine nor strong drink; and he shall be filled with the Holy Ghost, even from his mother's womb.
Luke1:16 And many of the children of Israel shall he turn to the Lord their God.
Luke1:17 And he shall go before him in the spirit and power of Elias, to turn the hearts of the fathers to the children, and the disobedient to the wisdom of the just; to make ready a people prepared for the Lord.
Luke1:18 And Zacharias said unto the angel, Whereby shall I know this? for I am an old man, and my wife well stricken in years.
Luke1:19 And the angel answering said unto him, I am Gabriel, that stand in the presence of God; and am sent to speak unto thee, and to shew thee these glad tidings.
Luke1:20 And, behold, thou shalt be dumb, and not able to speak, until the day that these things shall be performed, because thou believest not my words, which shall be fulfilled in their season.
Luke1:21 And the people waited for Zacharias, and marvelled that he tarried so long in the temple.
Luke1:22 And when he came out, he could not speak unto them: and they perceived that he had seen a vision in the temple: for he beckoned unto them, and remained speechless.
Luke1:23 And it came to pass, that, as soon as the days of his ministration were accomplished, he departed to his own house.
Luke1:24 And after those days his wife Elisabeth conceived, and hid herself five months, saying,
Luke1:25 Thus hath the Lord dealt with me in the days wherein he looked on me, to take away my reproach among men.
Luke1:26 And in the sixth month the angel Gabriel was sent from God unto a city of Galilee, named Nazareth,
Luke1:27 To a virgin espoused to a man whose name was Joseph, of the house of David; and the virgin's name was Mary.
Luke1:28 And the angel came in unto her, and said, Hail, thou that art highly favoured, the Lord is with thee: blessed art thou among women.
Luke1:29 And when she saw him, she was troubled at his saying, and cast in her mind what manner of salutation this should be.
Luke1:30 And the angel said unto her, Fear not, Mary: for thou hast found favour with God.
Luke1:31 And, behold, thou shalt conceive in thy womb, and bring forth a son, and shalt call his name JESUS.
Luke1:32 He shall be great, and shall be called the Son of the Highest: and the Lord God shall give unto him the throne of his father David:
Luke1:33 And he shall reign over the house of Jacob for ever; and of his kingdom there shall be no end.
Luke1:34 Then said Mary unto the angel, How shall this be, seeing I know not a man?
Luke1:35 And the angel answered and said unto her, The Holy Ghost shall come upon thee, and the power of the Highest shall overshadow thee: therefore also that holy thing which shall be born of thee shall be called the Son of God.
Luke1:36 And, behold, thy cousin Elisabeth, she hath also conceived a son in her old age: and this is the sixth month with her, who was called barren.
Luke1:37 For with God nothing shall be impossible.
Luke1:38 And Mary said, Behold the handmaid of the Lord; be it unto me according to thy word. And the angel departed from her.
Luke1:39 And Mary arose in those days, and went into the hill country with haste, into a city of Juda;
Luke1:40 And entered into the house of Zacharias, and saluted Elisabeth.
Luke1:41 And it came to pass, that, when Elisabeth heard the salutation of Mary, the babe leaped in her womb; and Elisabeth was filled with the Holy Ghost:
Luke1:42 And she spake out with a loud voice, and said, Blessed art thou among women, and blessed is the fruit of thy womb.
Luke1:43 And whence is this to me, that the mother of my Lord should come to me?
Luke1:44 For, lo, as soon as the voice of thy salutation sounded in mine ears, the babe leaped in my womb for joy.
Luke1:45 And blessed is she that believed: for there shall be a performance of those things which were told her from the Lord.
Luke1:46 And Mary said, My soul doth magnify the Lord,
Luke1:47 And my spirit hath rejoiced in God my Saviour.
Luke1:48 For he hath regarded the low estate of his handmaiden: for, behold, from henceforth all generations shall call me blessed.
Luke1:49 For he that is mighty hath done to me great things; and holy is his name.
Luke1:50 And his mercy is on them that fear him from generation to generation.
Luke1:51 He hath shewed strength with his arm; he hath scattered the proud in the imagination of their hearts.
Luke1:52 He hath put down the mighty from their seats, and exalted them of low degree.
Luke1:53 He hath filled the hungry with good things; and the rich he hath sent empty away.
Luke1:54 He hath holpen his servant Israel, in remembrance of his mercy;
Luke1:55 As he spake to our fathers, to Abraham, and to his seed for ever.
Luke1:56 And Mary abode with her about three months, and returned to her own house.
Luke1:57 Now Elisabeth's full time came that she should be delivered; and she brought forth a son.
Luke1:58 And her neighbours and her cousins heard how the Lord had shewed great mercy upon her; and they rejoiced with her.
Luke1:59 And it came to pass, that on the eighth day they came to circumcise the child; and they called him Zacharias, after the name of his father.
Luke1:60 And his mother answered and said, Not so; but he shall be called John.
Luke1:61 And they said unto her, There is none of thy kindred that is called by this name.
Luke1:62 And they made signs to his father, how he would have him called.
Luke1:63 And he asked for a writing table, and wrote, saying, His name is John. And they marvelled all.
Luke1:64 And his mouth was opened immediately, and his tongue loosed, and he spake, and praised God.
Luke1:65 And fear came on all that dwelt round about them: and all these sayings were noised abroad throughout all the hill country of Judaea.
Luke1:66 And all they that heard them laid them up in their hearts, saying, What manner of child shall this be! And the hand of the Lord was with him.
Luke1:67 And his father Zacharias was filled with the Holy Ghost, and prophesied, saying,
Luke1:68 Blessed be the Lord God of Israel; for he hath visited and redeemed his people,
Luke1:69 And hath raised up an horn of salvation for us in the house of his servant David;
Luke1:70 As he spake by the mouth of his holy prophets, which have been since the world began:
Luke1:71 That we should be saved from our enemies, and from the hand of all that hate us;
Luke1:72 To perform the mercy promised to our fathers, and to remember his holy covenant;
Luke1:73 The oath which he sware to our father Abraham,
Luke1:74 That he would grant unto us, that we being delivered out of the hand of our enemies might serve him without fear,
Luke1:75 In holiness and righteousness before him, all the days of our life.
Luke1:76 And thou, child, shalt be called the prophet of the Highest: for thou shalt go before the face of the Lord to prepare his ways;
Luke1:77 To give knowledge of salvation unto his people by the remission of their sins,
Luke1:78 Through the tender mercy of our God; whereby the dayspring from on high hath visited us,
Luke1:79 To give light to them that sit in darkness and in the shadow of death, to guide our feet into the way of peace.
Luke1:80 And the child grew, and waxed strong in spirit, and was in the deserts till the day of his shewing unto Israel.
Luke2:1 And it came to pass in those days, that there went out a decree from Caesar Augustus, that all the world should be taxed.
Luke2:2 (And this taxing was first made when Cyrenius was governor of Syria.)
Luke2:3 And all went to be taxed, everpany of his disciples, and a great multitude of people out of all Judaea and Jerusalem, and from the sea coast of Tyre and Sidon, which came to hear him, and to be healed of their diseases;
Luke6:18 And they that were vexed with unclean spirits: and they were healed.
Luke6:19 And the whole multitude sought to touch him: for there went virtue out of him, and healed them all.
Luke6:20 And he lifted up his eyes on his disciples, and said, Blessed be ye poor: for yours is the kingdom of God.
Luke6:21 Blessed are ye that hunger now: for ye shall be filled. Blessed are ye that weep now: for ye shall laugh.
Luke6:22 Blessed are ye, when men shall hate you, and when they shall separate you from their company, and shall reproach you, and cast out your name as evil, for the Son of man's sake.
Luke6:23 Rejoice ye in that day, and leap for joy: for, behold, your reward is great in heaven: for in the like manner did their fathers unto the prophets.
Luke6:24 But woe unto you that are rich! for ye have received your consolation.
Luke6:25 Woe unto you that are full! for ye shall hunger. Woe unto you that laugh now! for ye shall mourn and weep.
Luke6:26 Woe unto you, when all men shall speak well of you! for so did their fathers to the false prophets.
Luke6:27 But I say unto you which hear, Love your enemies, do good to them which hate you,
Luke6:28 Bless them that curse you, and pray for them which despitefully use you.
Luke6:29 And unto him that smiteth thee on the one cheek offer also the other; and him that taketh away thy cloak forbid not to take thy coat also.
Luke6:30 Give to every man that asketh of thee; and of him that taketh away thy goods ask them not again.
Luke6:31 And as ye would that men should do to you, do ye also to them likewise.
Luke6:32 For if ye love them which love you, what thank have ye? for sinners also love those that love them.
Luke6:33 And if ye do good to them which do good to you, what thank have ye? for sinners also do even the same.
Luke6:34 And if ye lend to them of whom ye hope to receive, what thank have ye? for sinners also lend to sinners, to receive as much again.
Luke6:35 But love ye your enemies, and do good, and lend, hoping for nothing again; and your reward shall be great, and ye shall be the children of the Highest: for he is kind unto the unthankful and to the evil.
Luke6:36 Be ye therefore merciful, as your Father also is merciful.
Luke6:37 Judge not, and ye shall not be judged: condemn not, and ye shall not be condemned: forgive, and ye shall be forgiven:
Luke6:38 Give, and it shall be given unto you; good measure, pressed down, and shaken together, and running over, shall men give into your bosom. For with the same measure that ye mete withal it shall be measured to you again.
Luke6:39 And he spake a parable unto them, Can the blind lead the blind? shall they not both fall into the ditch?
Luke6:40 The disciple is not above his master: but every one that is perfect shall be as his master.
Luke6:41 And why beholdest thou the mote that is in thy brother's eye, but perceivest not the beam that is in thine own eye?
Luke6:42 Either how canst thou say to thy brother, Brother, let me pull out the mote that is in thine eye, when thou thyself beholdest not the beam that is in thine own eye? Thou hypocrite, cast out first the beam out of thine own eye, and then shalt thou see clearly to pull out the mote that is in thy brother's eye.
Luke6:43 For a good tree bringeth not forth corrupt fruit; neither doth a corrupt tree bring forth good fruit.
Luke6:44 For every tree is known by his own fruit. For of thorns men do not gather figs, nor of a bramble bush gather they grapes.
Luke6:45 A good man out of the good treasure of his heart bringeth forth that which is good; and an evil man out of the evil treasure of his heart bringeth forth that which is evil: for of the abundance of the heart his mouth speaketh.
Luke6:46 And why call ye me, Lord, Lord, and do not the things which I say?
Luke6:47 Whosoever cometh to me, and heareth my sayings, and doeth them, I will shew you to whom he is like:
Luke6:48 He is like a man which built an house, and digged deep, and laid the foundation on a rock: and when the flood arose, the stream beat vehemently upon that house, and could not shake it: for it was founded upon a rock.
Luke6:49 But he that heareth, and doeth not, is like a man that without a foundation built an house upon the earth; against which the stream did beat vehemently, and immediately it fell; and the ruin of that house was great.
Luke7:1 Now when he had ended all his sayings in the audience of the people, he entered into Capernaum.
Luke7:2 And a certain centurion's servant, who was dear unto him, was sick, and ready to die.
Luke7:3 And when he heard of Jesus, he sent unto him the elders of the Jews, beseeching him that he would come and heal his servant.
Luke7:4 And when they came to Jesus, they besought him instantly, saying, That he was worthy for whom he should do this:
Luke7:5 For he loveth our nation, and he hath built us a synagogue.
Luke7:6 Then Jesus went with them. And when he was now not far from the house, the centurion sent friends to him, saying unto him, Lord, trouble not thyself: for I am not worthy that thou shouldest enter under my roof:
Luke7:7 Wherefore neither thought I myself worthy to come unto thee: but say in a word, and my servant shall be healed.
Luke7:8 For I also am a man set under authority, having under me soldiers, and I say unto one, Go, and he goeth; and to another, Come, and he cometh; and to my servant, Do this, and he doeth it.
Luke7:9 When Jesus heard these things, he marvelled at him, and turned him about, and said unto the people that followed him, I say unto you, I have not found so great faith, no, not in Israel.
Luke7:10 And they that were sent, returning to the house, found the servant whole that had been sick.
Luke7:11 And it came to pass the day after, that he went into a city called Nain; and many of his disciples went with him, and much people.
Luke7:12 Now when he came nigh to the gate of the city, behold, there was a dead man carried out, the only son of his mother, and she was a widow: and much people of the city was with her.
Luke7:13 And when the Lord saw her, he had compassion on her, and said unto her, Weep not.
Luke7:14 And he came and touched the bier: and they that bare him stood still. And he said, Young man, I say unto thee, Arise.
Luke7:15 And he that was dead sat up, and began to speak. And he delivered him to his mother.
Luke7:16 And there came a fear on all: and they glorified God, saying, That a great prophet is risen up among us; and, That God hath visited his people.
Luke7:17 And this rumour of him went forth throughout all Judaea, and throughout all the region round about.
Luke7:18 And the disciples of John shewed him of all these things.
Luke7:19 And John calling unto him two of his disciples sent them to Jesus, saying, Art thou he that should come? or look we for another?
Luke7:20 When the men were come unto him, they said, John Baptist hath sent us unto thee, saying, Art thou he that should come? or look we for another?
Luke7:21 And in that same hour he cured many of their infirmities and plagues, and of evil spirits; and unto many that were blind he gave sight.
Luke7:22 Then Jesus answering said unto them, Go your way, and tell John what things ye have seen and heard; how that the blind see, the lame walk, the lepers are cleansed, the deaf hear, the dead are raised, to the poor the gospel is preached.
Luke7:23 And blessed is he, whosoever shall not be offended in me.
Luke7:24 And when the messengers of John were departed, he began to speak unto the people concerning John, What went ye out into the wilderness for to see? A reed shaken with the wind?
Luke7:25 But what went ye out for to see? A man clothed in soft raiment? Behold, they which are gorgeously apparelled, and live delicately, are in kings' courts.
Luke7:26 But what went ye out for to see? A prophet? Yea, I say unto you, and much more than a prophet.
Luke7:27 This is he, of whom it is written, Behold, I send my messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee.
Luke7:28 F I say unto you, Among those that are born of women there is not a greater prophet than John the Baptist: but he that is least in the kingdom of God is greater than he.
Luke7:29 And all the people that heard him, and the publicans, justified God, being baptized with the baptism of John.
Luke7:30 But the Pharisees and lawyers rejected the counsel of God against themselves, being not baptized of him.
Luke7:31 And the Lord said, Whereunto then shall I liken the men of this generation? and to what are they like?
Luke7:32 They are like unto children sitting in the marketplace, and calling one to another, and saying, We have piped unto you, and ye have not danced; we have mourned to you, and ye have not wept.
Luke7:33 For John the Baptist came neither eating bread nor drinking wine; and ye say, He hath a devil.
Luke7:34 The Son of man is come eating and drinking; and ye say, Behold a gluttonous man, and a winebibber, a friend of publicans and sinners!
Luke7:35 But wisdom is justified of all her children.
Luke7:36 And one of the Pharisees desired him that he would eat with him. And he went into the Pharisee's house, and sat down to meat.
Luke7:37 And, behold, a woman in the city, which was a sinner, when she knew that Jesus sat at meat in the Pharisee's house, brought an alabaster box of ointment,
Luke7:38 And stood at his feet behind him weeping, and began to wash his feet with tears, and did wipe them with the hairs of her head, and kissed his feet, and anointed them with the ointment.
Luke7:39 Now when the Pharisee which had bidden him saw it, he spake within himself, saying, This man, if he were a prophet, would have known who and what manner of woman this is that toucheth him: for she is a sinner.
Luke7:40 And Jesus answering said unto him, Simon, I have somewhat to say unto thee. And he saith, Master, say on.
Luke7:41 There was a certain creditor which had two debtors: the one owed five hundred pence, and the other fifty.
Luke7:42 And when they had nothing to pay, he frankly forgave them both. Tell me therefore, which of them will love him most?
Luke7:43 Simon answered and said, I suppose that he, to whom he forgave most. And he said unto him, Thou hast rightly judged.
Luke7:44 And he turned to the woman, and said unto Simon, Seest thou this woman? I entered into thine house, thou gavest me no water for my feet: but she hath washed my feet with tears, and wiped them with the hairs of her head.
Luke7:45 Thou gavest me no kiss: but this woman since the time I came in hath not ceased to kiss my feet.
Luke7:46 My head with oil thou didst not anoint: but this woman hath anointed my feet with ointment.
Luke7:47 Wherefore I say unto thee, Her sins, which are many, are forgiven; for she loved much: but to whom little is forgiven, the same loveth little.
Luke7:48 And he said unto her, Thy sins are forgiven.
Luke7:49 And they that sat at meat with him began to say within themselves, Who is this that forgiveth sins also?
Luke7:50 And he said to the woman, Thy faith hath saved thee; go in peace.
Luke8:1 And it came to pass afterward, that he went throughout every city and village, preaching and shewing the glad tidings of the kingdom of God: and the twelve were with him,
Luke8:2 And certain women, which had been healed of evil spirits and infirmities, Mary called Magdalene, out of whom went seven devils,
Luke8:3 And Joanna the wife of Chuza Herod's steward, and Susanna, and many others, which ministered unto him of their substance.
Luke8:4 And when much people were gathered together, and were come to him out of every city, he spake by a parable:
Luke8:5 A sower went out to sow his seed: and as he sowed, some fell by the way side; and it was trodden down, and the fowls of the air devoured it.
Luke8:6 And some fell upon a rock; and as soon as it was sprung up, it withered away, because it lacked moisture.
Luke8:7 And some fell among thorns; and the thorns sprang up with it, and choked it.
Luke8:8 And other fell on good ground, and sprang up, and bare fruit an hundredfold. And when he had said these things, he cried, He that hath ears to hear, let him hear.
Luke8:9 And his disciples asked him, saying, What might this parable be?
Luke8:10 And he said, Unto you it is given to know the mysteries of the kingdom of God: but to others in parables; that seeing they might not see, and hearing they might not understand.
Luke8:11 Now the parable is this: The seed is the word of God.
Luke8:12 Those by the way side are they that hear; then cometh the devil, and taketh away the word out of their hearts, lest they should believe and be saved.
Luke8:13 They on the rock are they, which, when they hear, receive the word with joy; and these have no root, which for a while believe, and in time of temptation fall away.
Luke8:14 And that which fell among thorns are they, which, when they have heard, go forth, and are choked with cares and riches and pleasures of this life, and bring no fruit to perfection.
Luke8:15 But that on the good ground are they, which in an honest and good heart, having heard the word, keep it, and bring forth fruit with patience.
Luke8:16 No man, when he hath lighted a candle, covereth it with a vessel, or putteth it under a bed; but setteth it on a candlestick, that they which enter in may see the light.
Luke8:17 For nothing is secret, that shall not be made manifest; neither any thing hid, that shall not be known and come abroad.
Luke8:18 Take heed therefore how ye hear: for whosoever hath, to him shall be given; and whosoever hath not, from him shall be taken even that which he seemeth to have.
Luke8:19 Then came to him his mother and his brethren, and could not come at him for the press.
Luke8:20 And it was told him by certain which said, Thy mother and thy brethren stand without, desiring to see thee.
Luke8:21 And he answered and said unto them, My mother and my brethren are these which hear the word of God, and do it.
Luke8:22 Now it came to pass on a certain day, that he went into a ship with his disciples: and he said unto them, Let us go over unto the other side of the lake. And they launched forth.
Luke8:23 But as they sailed he fell asleep: and there came down a storm of wind on the lake; and they were filled with water, and were in jeopardy.
Luke8:24 And they came to him, and awoke him, saying, Master, master, we perish. Then he arose, and rebuked the wind and the raging of the water: and they ceased, and there was a calm.
Luke8:25 And he said unto them, Where is your faith? And they being afraid wondered, saying one to another, What manner of man is this! for he commandeth even the winds and water, and they obey him.
Luke8:26 And they arrived at the country of the Gadarenes, which is over against Galilee.
Luke8:27 And when he went forth to land, there met him out of the city a certain man, which had devils long time, and ware no clothes, neither abode in any house, but in the tombs.
Luke8:28 When he saw Jesus, he cried out, and fell down before him, and with a loud voice said, What have I to do with thee, Jesus, thou Son of God most high? I beseech thee, torment me not.
Luke8:29 (For he had commanded the unclean spirit to come out of the man. For oftentimes it had caught him: and he was kept bound with chains and in fetters; and he brake the bands, and was driven of the devil into the wilderness.)
Luke8:30 And Jesus asked him, saying, What is thy name? And he said, Legion: because many devils were entered into him.
Luke8:31 And they besought him that he would not command them to go out into the deep.
Luke8:32 And there was there an herd of many swine feeding on the mountain: and they besought him that he would suffer them to enter into them. And he suffered them.
Luke8:33 Then went the devils out of the man, and entered into the swine: and the herd ran violently down a steep place into the lake, and were choked.
Luke8:34 When they that fed them saw what was done, they fled, and went and told it in the city and in the country.
Luke8:35 Then they went out to see what was done; and came to Jesus, and found the man, out of whom the devils were departed, sitting at the feet of Jesus, clothed, and in his right mind: and they were afraid.
Le8:36 They also which saw it told them by what means he that was possessed of the devils was healed.
Luke8:37 Then the whole multitude of the country of the Gadarenes round about besought him to depart from them; for they were taken with great fear: and he went up into the ship, and returned back again.
Luke8:38 Now the man out of whom the devils were departed besought him that he might be with him: but Jesus sent him away, saying,
Luke8:39 Return to thine own house, and shew how great things God hath done unto thee. And he went his way, and published throughout the whole city how great things Jesus had done unto him.
Luke8:40 And it came to pass, that, when Jesus was returned, the people gladly received him: for they were all waiting for him.
Luke8:41 And, behold, there came a man named Jairus, and he was a ruler of the synagogue: and he fell down at Jesus' feet, and besought him that he would come into his house:
Luke8:42 For he had one only daughter, about twelve years of age, and she lay a dying. But as he went the people thronged him.
Luke8:43 And a woman having an issue of blood twelve years, which had spent all her living upon physicians, neither could be healed of any,
Luke8:44 Came behind him, and touched the border of his garment: and immediately her issue of blood stanched.
Luke8:45 And Jesus said, Who touched me? When all denied, Peter and they that were with him said, Master, the multitude throng thee and press thee, and sayest thou, Who touched me?
Luke8:46 And Jesus said, Somebody hath touched me: for I perceive that virtue is gone out of me.
Luke8:47 And when the woman saw that she was not hid, she came trembling, and falling down before him, she declared unto him before all the people for what cause she had touched him, and how she was healed immediately.
Luke8:48 And he said unto her, Daughter, be of good comfort: thy faith hath made thee whole; go in peace.
Luke8:49 While he yet spake, there cometh one from the ruler of the synagogue's house, saying to him, Thy daughter is dead; trouble not the Master.
Luke8:50 But when Jesus heard it, he answered him, saying, Fear not: believe only, and she shall be made whole.
Luke8:51 And when he came into the house, he suffered no man to go in, save Peter, and James, and John, and the father and the mother of the maiden.
Luke8:52 And all wept, and bewailed her: but he said, Weep not; she is not dead, but sleepeth.
Luke8:53 And they laughed him to scorn, knowing that she was dead.
Luke8:54 And he put them all out, and took her by the hand, and called, saying, Maid, arise.
Luke8:55 And her spirit came again, and she arose straightway: and he commanded to give her meat.
Luke8:56 And her parents were astonished: but he charged them that they should tell no man what was done.
Luke9:1 Then he called his twelve disciples together, and gave them power and authority over all devils, and to cure diseases.
Luke9:2 And he sent them to preach the kingdom of God, and to heal the sick.
Luke9:3 And he said unto them, Take nothing for your journey, neither staves, nor scrip, neither bread, neither money; neither have two coats apiece.
Luke9:4 And whatsoever house ye enter into, there abide, and thence depart.
Luke9:5 And whosoever will not receive you, when ye go out of that city, shake off the very dust from your feet for a testimony against them.
Luke9:6 And they departed, and went through the towns, preaching the gospel, and healing every where.
Luke9:7 Now Herod the tetrarch heard of all that was done by him: and he was perplexed, because that it was said of some, that John was risen from the dead;
Luke9:8 And of some, that Elias had appeared; and of others, that one of the old prophets was risen again.
Luke9:9 And Herod said, John have I beheaded: but who is this, of whom I hear such things? And he desired to see him.
Luke9:10 And the apostles, when they were returned, told him all that they had done. And he took them, and went aside privately into a desert place belonging to the city called Bethsaida.
Luke9:11 And the people, when they knew it, followed him: and he received them, and spake unto them of the kingdom of God, and healed them that had need of healing.
Luke9:12 And when the day began to wear away, then came the twelve, and said unto him, Send the multitude away, that they may go into the towns and country round about, and lodge, and get victuals: for we are here in a desert place.
Luke9:13 But he said unto them, Give ye them to eat. And they said, We have no more but five loaves and two fishes; except we should go and buy meat for all this people.
Luke9:14 For they were about five thousand men. And he said to his disciples, Make them sit down by fifties in a company.
Luke9:15 And they did so, and made them all sit down.
Luke9:16 Then he took the five loaves and the two fishes, and looking up to heaven, he blessed them, and brake, and gave to the disciples to set before the multitude.
Luke9:17 And they did eat, and were all filled: and there was taken up of fragments that remained to them twelve baskets.
Luke9:18 And it came to pass, as he was alone praying, his disciples were with him: and he asked them, saying, Whom say the people that I am?
Luke9:19 They answering said, John the Baptist; but some say, Elias; and others say, that one of the old prophets is risen again.
Luke9:20 He said unto them, But whom say ye that I am? Peter answering said, The Christ of God.
Luke9:21 And he straitly charged them, and commanded them to tell no man that thing;
Luke9:22 Saying, The Son of man must suffer many things, and be rejected of the elders and chief priests and scribes, and be slain, and be raised the third day.
Luke9:23 And he said to them all, If any man will come after me, let him deny himself, and take up his cross daily, and follow me.
Luke9:24 For whosoever will save his life shall lose it: but whosoever will lose his life for my sake, the same shall save it.
Luke9:25 For what is a man advantaged, if he gain the whole world, and lose himself, or be cast away?
Luke9:26 For whosoever shall be ashamed of me and of my words, of him shall the Son of man be ashamed, when he shall come in his own glory, and in his Father's, and of the holy angels.
Luke9:27 But I tell you of a truth, there be some standing here, which shall not taste of death, till they see the kingdom of God.
Luke9:28 And it came to pass about an eight days after these sayings, he took Peter and John and James, and went up into a mountain to pray.
Luke9:29 And as he prayed, the fashion of his countenance was altered, and his raiment was white and glistering.
Luke9:30 And, behold, there talked with him two men, which were Moses and Elias:
Luke9:31 Who appeared in glory, and spake of his decease which he should accomplish at Jerusalem.
Luke9:32 But Peter and they that were with him were heavy with sleep: and when they were awake, they saw his glory, and the two men that stood with him.
Luke9:33 And it came to pass, as they departed from him, Peter said unto Jesus, Master, it is good for us to be here: and let us make three tabernacles; one for thee, and one for Moses, and one for Elias: not knowing what he said.
Luke9:34 While he thus spake, there came a cloud, and overshadowed them: and they feared as they entered into the cloud.
Luke9:35 And there came a voice out of the cloud, saying, This is my beloved Son: hear him.
Luke9:36 And when the voice was past, Jesus was found alone. And they kept it close, and told no man in those days any of those things which they had seen.
Luke9:37 And it came to pass, that on the next day, when they were come down from the hill, much people met him.
Luke9:38 And, behold, a man of the company cried out, saying, Master, I beseech thee, look upon my son: for he is mine only child.
Luke9:39 And, lo, a spirit taketh him, and he suddenly crieth out; and it teareth him that he foameth again, and bruising him hardly departeth from him.
Luke9:40 And I besought thy disciples to cast him out; and they could not.
Luke9:41 And Jesus answering said, O faithless and perverse generation, how long shall I be with you, and suffer you? Bring thy son hither.
Luke9:42 And as he was yet a coming, the devil tcut it down.
Luke13:10 And he was teaching in one of the synagogues on the sabbath.
Luke13:11 And, behold, there was a woman which had a spirit of infirmity eighteen years, and was bowed together, and could in no wise lift up herself.
Luke13:12 And when Jesus saw her, he called her to him, and said unto her, Woman, thou art loosed from thine infirmity.
Luke13:13 And he laid his hands on her: and immediately she was made straight, and glorified God.
Luke13:14 And the ruler of the synagogue answered with indignation, because that Jesus had healed on the sabbath day, and said unto the people, There are six days in which men ought to work: in them therefore come and be healed, and not on the sabbath day.
Luke13:15 The Lord then answered him, and said, Thou hypocrite, doth not each one of you on the sabbath loose his ox or his ass from the stall, and lead him away to watering?
Luke13:16 And ought not this woman, being a daughter of Abraham, whom Satan hath bound, lo, these eighteen years, be loosed from this bond on the sabbath day?
Luke13:17 And when he had said these things, all his adversaries were ashamed: and all the people rejoiced for all the glorious things that were done by him.
Luke13:18 Then said he, Unto what is the kingdom of God like? and whereunto shall I resemble it?
Luke13:19 It is like a grain of mustard seed, which a man took, and cast into his garden; and it grew, and waxed a great tree; and the fowls of the air lodged in the branches of it.
Luke13:20 And again he said, Whereunto shall I liken the kingdom of God?
Luke13:21 It is like leaven, which a woman took and hid in three measures of meal, till the whole was leavened.
Luke13:22 And he went through the cities and villages, teaching, and journeying toward Jerusalem.
Luke13:23 Then said one unto him, Lord, are there few that be saved? And he said unto them,
Luke13:24 Strive to enter in at the strait gate: for many, I say unto you, will seek to enter in, and shall not be able.
Luke13:25 When once the master of the house is risen up, and hath shut to the door, and ye begin to stand without, and to knock at the door, saying, Lord, Lord, open unto us; and he shall answer and say unto you, I know you not whence ye are:
Luke13:26 Then shall ye begin to say, We have eaten and drunk in thy presence, and thou hast taught in our streets.
Luke13:27 But he shall say, I tell you, I know you not whence ye are; depart from me, all ye workers of iniquity.
Luke13:28 There shall be weeping and gnashing of teeth, when ye shall see Abraham, and Isaac, and Jacob, and all the prophets, in the kingdom of God, and you yourselves thrust out.
Luke13:29 And they shall come from the east, and from the west, and from the north, and from the south, and shall sit down in the kingdom of God.
Luke13:30 And, behold, there are last which shall be first, and there are first which shall be last.
Luke13:31 The same day there came certain of the Pharisees, saying unto him, Get thee out, and depart hence: for Herod will kill thee.
Luke13:32 And he said unto them, Go ye, and tell that fox, Behold, I cast out devils, and I do cures to day and to morrow, and the third day I shall be perfected.
Luke13:33 Nevertheless I must walk to day, and to morrow, and the day following: for it cannot be that a prophet perish out of Jerusalem.
Luke13:34 O Jerusalem, Jerusalem, which killest the prophets, and stonest them that are sent unto thee; how often would I have gathered thy children together, as a hen doth gather her brood under her wings, and ye would not!
Luke13:35 Behold, your house is left unto you desolate: and verily I say unto you, Ye shall not see me, until the time come when ye shall say, Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the Lord.
Luke14:1 And it came to pass, as he went into the house of one of the chief Pharisees to eat bread on the sabbath day, that they watched him.
Luke14:2 And, behold, there was a certain man before him which had the dropsy.
Luke14:3 And Jesus answering spake unto the lawyers and Pharisees, saying, Is it lawful to heal on the sabbath day?
Luke14:4 And they held their peace. And he took him, and healed him, and let him go;
Luke14:5 And answered them, saying, Which of you shall have an ass or an ox fallen into a pit, and will not straightway pull him out on the sabbath day?
Luke14:6 And they could not answer him again to these things.
Luke14:7 And he put forth a parable to those which were bidden, when he marked how they chose out the chief rooms; saying unto them,
Luke14:8 When thou art bidden of any man to a wedding, sit not down in the highest room; lest a more honourable man than thou be bidden of him;
Luke14:9 And he that bade thee and him come and say to thee, Give this man place; and thou begin with shame to take the lowest room.
Luke14:10 But when thou art bidden, go and sit down in the lowest room; that when he that bade thee cometh, he may say unto thee, Friend, go up higher: then shalt thou have worship in the presence of them that sit at meat with thee.
Luke14:11 For whosoever exalteth himself shall be abased; and he that humbleth himself shall be exalted.
Luke14:12 Then said he also to him that bade him, When thou makest a dinner or a supper, call not thy friends, nor thy brethren, neither thy kinsmen, nor thy rich neighbours; lest they also bid thee again, and a recompence be made thee.
Luke14:13 But when thou makest a feast, call the poor, the maimed, the lame, the blind:
Luke14:14 And thou shalt be blessed; for they cannot recompense thee: for thou shalt be recompensed at the resurrection of the just.
Luke14:15 And when one of them that sat at meat with him heard these things, he said unto him, Blessed is he that shall eat bread in the kingdom of God.
Luke14:16 Then said he unto him, A certain man made a great supper, and bade many:
Luke14:17 And sent his servant at supper time to say to them that were bidden, Come; for all things are now ready.
Luke14:18 And they all with one consent began to make excuse. The first said unto him, I have bought a piece of ground, and I must needs go and see it: I pray thee have me excused.
Luke14:19 And another said, I have bought five yoke of oxen, and I go to prove them: I pray thee have me excused.
Luke14:20 And another said, I have married a wife, and therefore I cannot come.
Luke14:21 So that servant came, and shewed his lord these things. Then the master of the house being angry said to his servant, Go out quickly into the streets and lanes of the city, and bring in hither the poor, and the maimed, and the halt, and the blind.
Luke14:22 And the servant said, Lord, it is done as thou hast commanded, and yet there is room.
Luke14:23 And the lord said unto the servant, Go out into the highways and hedges, and compel them to come in, that my house may be filled.
Luke14:24 For I say unto you, That none of those men which were bidden shall taste of my supper.
Luke14:25 And there went great multitudes with him: and he turned, and said unto them,
Luke14:26 If any man come to me, and hate not his father, and mother, and wife, and children, and brethren, and sisters, yea, and his own life also, he cannot be my disciple.
Luke14:27 And whosoever doth not bear his cross, and come after me, cannot be my disciple.
Luke14:28 For which of you, intending to build a tower, sitteth not down first, and counteth the cost, whether he have sufficient to finish it?
Luke14:29 Lest haply, after he hath laid the foundation, and is not able to finish it, all that behold it begin to mock him,
Luke14:30 Saying, This man began to build, and was not able to finish.
Luke14:31 Or what king, going to make war against another king, sitteth not down first, and consulteth whether he be able with ten thousand to meet him that cometh against him with twenty thousand?
Luke14:32 Or else, while the other is yet a great way off, he sendeth an ambassage, and desireth conditions of peace.
Luke14:33 So likewise, whosoever he be of you that forsaketh not all that he hath, he cannot be my disciple.
Luke14:34 Salt is good: but if the salt have lost his savour, wherewith shall it be seasoned?
Luke14:35 It is neither fit for the land, nor yet for the dunghill; but men cast it o. He that hath ears to hear, let him hear.
Luke15:1 Then drew near unto him all the publicans and sinners for to hear him.
Luke15:2 And the Pharisees and scribes murmured, saying, This man receiveth sinners, and eateth with them.
Luke15:3 And he spake this parable unto them, saying,
Luke15:4 What man of you, having an hundred sheep, if he lose one of them, doth not leave the ninety and nine in the wilderness, and go after that which is lost, until he find it?
Luke15:5 And when he hath found it, he layeth it on his shoulders, rejoicing.
Luke15:6 And when he cometh home, he calleth together his friends and neighbours, saying unto them, Rejoice with me; for I have found my sheep which was lost.
Luke15:7 I say unto you, that likewise joy shall be in heaven over one sinner that repenteth, more than over ninety and nine just persons, which need no repentance.
Luke15:8 Either what woman having ten pieces of silver, if she lose one piece, doth not light a candle, and sweep the house, and seek diligently till she find it?
Luke15:9 And when she hath found it, she calleth her friends and her neighbours together, saying, Rejoice with me; for I have found the piece which I had lost.
Luke15:10 Likewise, I say unto you, there is joy in the presence of the angels of God over one sinner that repenteth.
Luke15:11 And he said, A certain man had two sons:
Luke15:12 And the younger of them said to his father, Father, give me the portion of goods that falleth to me. And he divided unto them his living.
Luke15:13 And not many days after the younger son gathered all together, and took his journey into a far country, and there wasted his substance with riotous living.
Luke15:14 And when he had spent all, there arose a mighty famine in that land; and he began to be in want.
Luke15:15 And he went and joined himself to a citizen of that country; and he sent him into his fields to feed swine.
Luke15:16 And he would fain have filled his belly with the husks that the swine did eat: and no man gave unto him.
Luke15:17 And when he came to himself, he said, How many hired servants of my father's have bread enough and to spare, and I perish with hunger!
Luke15:18 I will arise and go to my father, and will say unto him, Father, I have sinned against heaven, and before thee,
Luke15:19 And am no more worthy to be called thy son: make me as one of thy hired servants.
Luke15:20 And he arose, and came to his father. But when he was yet a great way off, his father saw him, and had compassion, and ran, and fell on his neck, and kissed him.
Luke15:21 And the son said unto him, Father, I have sinned against heaven, and in thy sight, and am no more worthy to be called thy son.
Luke15:22 But the father said to his servants, Bring forth the best robe, and put it on him; and put a ring on his hand, and shoes on his feet:
Luke15:23 And bring hither the fatted calf, and kill it; and let us eat, and be merry:
Luke15:24 For this my son was dead, and is alive again; he was lost, and is found. And they began to be merry.
Luke15:25 Now his elder son was in the field: and as he came and drew nigh to the house, he heard musick and dancing.
Luke15:26 And he called one of the servants, and asked what these things meant.
Luke15:27 And he said unto him, Thy brother is come; and thy father hath killed the fatted calf, because he hath received him safe and sound.
Luke15:28 And he was angry, and would not go in: therefore came his father out, and intreated him.
Luke15:29 And he answering said to his father, Lo, these many years do I serve thee, neither transgressed I at any time thy commandment: and yet thou never gavest me a kid, that I might make merry with my friends:
Luke15:30 But as soon as this thy son was come, which hath devoured thy living with harlots, thou hast killed for him the fatted calf.
Luke15:31 And he said unto him, Son, thou art ever with me, and all that I have is thine.
Luke15:32 It was meet that we should make merry, and be glad: for this thy brother was dead, and is alive again; and was lost, and is found.
Luke16:1 And he said also unto his disciples, There was a certain rich man, which had a steward; and the same was accused unto him that he had wasted his goods.
Luke16:2 And he called him, and said unto him, How is it that I hear this of thee? give an account of thy stewardship; for thou mayest be no longer steward.
Luke16:3 Then the steward said within himself, What shall I do? for my lord taketh away from me the stewardship: I cannot dig; to beg I am ashamed.
Luke16:4 I am resolved what to do, that, when I am put out of the stewardship, they may receive me into their houses.
Luke16:5 So he called every one of his lord's debtors unto him, and said unto the first, How much owest thou unto my lord?
Luke16:6 And he said, An hundred measures of oil. And he said unto him, Take thy bill, and sit down quickly, and write fifty.
Luke16:7 Then said he to another, And how much owest thou? And he said, An hundred measures of wheat. And he said unto him, Take thy bill, and write fourscore.
Luke16:8 And the lord commended the unjust steward, because he had done wisely: for the children of this world are in their generation wiser than the children of light.
Luke16:9 And I say unto you, Make to yourselves friends of the mammon of unrighteousness; that, when ye fail, they may receive you into everlasting habitations.
Luke16:10 He that is faithful in that which is least is faithful also in much: and he that is unjust in the least is unjust also in much.
Luke16:11 If therefore ye have not been faithful in the unrighteous mammon, who will commit to your trust the true riches?
Luke16:12 And if ye have not been faithful in that which is another man's, who shall give you that which is your own?
Luke16:13 No servant can serve two masters: for either he will hate the one, and love the other; or else he will hold to the one, and despise the other. Ye cannot serve God and mammon.
Luke16:14 And the Pharisees also, who were covetous, heard all these things: and they derided him.
Luke16:15 And he said unto them, Ye are they which justify yourselves before men; but God knoweth your hearts: for that which is highly esteemed among men is abomination in the sight of God.
Luke16:16 The law and the prophets were until John: since that time the kingdom of God is preached, and every man presseth into it.
Luke16:17 And it is easier for heaven and earth to pass, than one tittle of the law to fail.
Luke16:18 Whosoever putteth away his wife, and marrieth another, committeth adultery: and whosoever marrieth her that is put away from her husband committeth adultery.
Luke16:19 There was a certain rich man, which was clothed in purple and fine linen, and fared sumptuously every day:
Luke16:20 And there was a certain beggar named Lazarus, which was laid at his gate, full of sores,
Luke16:21 And desiring to be fed with the crumbs which fell from the rich man's table: moreover the dogs came and licked his sores.
Luke16:22 And it came to pass, that the beggar died, and was carried by the angels into Abraham's bosom: the rich man also died, and was buried;
Luke16:23 And in hell he lift up his eyes, being in torments, and seeth Abraham afar off, and Lazarus in his bosom.
Luke16:24 And he cried and said, Father Abraham, have mercy on me, and send Lazarus, that he may dip the tip of his finger in water, and cool my tongue; for I am tormented in this flame.
Luke16:25 But Abraham said, Son, remember that thou in thy lifetime receivedst thy good things, and likewise Lazarus evil things: but now he is comforted, and thou art tormented.
Luke16:26 And beside all this, between us and you there is a great gulf fixed: so that they which would pass from hence to you cannot; neither can they pass to us, that would come from thence.
Luke16:27 Then he said, I pray thee therefore, father, that thou wouldest send him to my father's house:
Luke16:28 For I have five brethren; that he may testify unto them, lest they also come into this place of torment.
Luke16:29 Abraham saith unto him, They have Moses and the prophets; let them hear them.
Luke16:30 And he said, Nay, father Abraham: but if one went unto them from the dead, they will repent.
ke16:31 And he said unto him, If they hear not Moses and the prophets, neither will they be persuaded, though one rose from the dead.
Luke17:1 Then said he unto the disciples, It is impossible but that offences will come: but woe unto him, through whom they come!
Luke17:2 It were better for him that a millstone were hanged about his neck, and he cast into the sea, than that he should offend one of these little ones.
Luke17:3 Take heed to yourselves: If thy brother trespass against thee, rebuke him; and if he repent, forgive him.
Luke17:4 And if he trespass against thee seven times in a day, and seven times in a day turn again to thee, saying, I repent; thou shalt forgive him.
Luke17:5 And the apostles said unto the Lord, Increase our faith.
Luke17:6 And the Lord said, If ye had faith as a grain of mustard seed, ye might say unto this sycamine tree, Be thou plucked up by the root, and be thou planted in the sea; and it should obey you.
Luke17:7 But which of you, having a servant plowing or feeding cattle, will say unto him by and by, when he is come from the field, Go and sit down to meat?
Luke17:8 And will not rather say unto him, Make ready wherewith I may sup, and gird thyself, and serve me, till I have eaten and drunken; and afterward thou shalt eat and drink?
Luke17:9 Doth he thank that servant because he did the things that were commanded him? I trow not.
Luke17:10 So likewise ye, when ye shall have done all those things which are commanded you, say, We are unprofitable servants: we have done that which was our duty to do.
Luke17:11 And it came to pass, as he went to Jerusalem, that he passed through the midst of Samaria and Galilee.
Luke17:12 And as he entered into a certain village, there met him ten men that were lepers, which stood afar off:
Luke17:13 And they lifted up their voices, and said, Jesus, Master, have mercy on us.
Luke17:14 And when he saw them, he said unto them, Go shew yourselves unto the priests. And it came to pass, that, as they went, they were cleansed.
Luke17:15 And one of them, when he saw that he was healed, turned back, and with a loud voice glorified God,
Luke17:16 And fell down on his face at his feet, giving him thanks: and he was a Samaritan.
Luke17:17 And Jesus answering said, Were there not ten cleansed? but where are the nine?
Luke17:18 There are not found that returned to give glory to God, save this stranger.
Luke17:19 And he said unto him, Arise, go thy way: thy faith hath made thee whole.
Luke17:20 And when he was demanded of the Pharisees, when the kingdom of God should come, he answered them and said, The kingdom of God cometh not with observation:
Luke17:21 Neither shall they say, Lo here! or, lo there! for, behold, the kingdom of God is within you.
Luke17:22 And he said unto the disciples, The days will come, when ye shall desire to see one of the days of the Son of man, and ye shall not see it.
Luke17:23 And they shall say to you, See here; or, see there: go not after them, nor follow them.
Luke17:24 For as the lightning, that lighteneth out of the one part under heaven, shineth unto the other part under heaven; so shall also the Son of man be in his day.
Luke17:25 But first must he suffer many things, and be rejected of this generation.
Luke17:26 And as it was in the days of Noe, so shall it be also in the days of the Son of man.
Luke17:27 They did eat, they drank, they married wives, they were given in marriage, until the day that Noe entered into the ark, and the flood came, and destroyed them all.
Luke17:28 Likewise also as it was in the days of Lot; they did eat, they drank, they bought, they sold, they planted, they builded;
Luke17:29 But the same day that Lot went out of Sodom it rained fire and brimstone from heaven, and destroyed them all.
Luke17:30 Even thus shall it be in the day when the Son of man is revealed.
Luke17:31 In that day, he which shall be upon the housetop, and his stuff in the house, let him not come down to take it away: and he that is in the field, let him likewise not return back.
Luke17:32 Remember Lot's wife.
Luke17:33 Whosoever shall seek to save his life shall lose it; and whosoever shall lose his life shall preserve it.
Luke17:34 I tell you, in that night there shall be two men in one bed; the one shall be taken, and the other shall be left.
Luke17:35 Two women shall be grinding together; the one shall be taken, and the other left.
Luke17:36 Two men shall be in the field; the one shall be taken, and the other left.
Luke17:37 And they answered and said unto him, Where, Lord? And he said unto them, Wheresoever the body is, thither will the eagles be gathered together.
Luke18:1 And he spake a parable unto them to this end, that men ought always to pray, and not to faint;
Luke18:2 Saying, There was in a city a judge, which feared not God, neither regarded man:
Luke18:3 And there was a widow in that city; and she came unto him, saying, Avenge me of mine adversary.
Luke18:4 And he would not for a while: but afterward he said within himself, Though I fear not God, nor regard man;
Luke18:5 Yet because this widow troubleth me, I will avenge her, lest by her continual coming she weary me.
Luke18:6 And the Lord said, Hear what the unjust judge saith.
Luke18:7 And shall not God avenge his own elect, which cry day and night unto him, though he bear long with them?
Luke18:8 I tell you that he will avenge them speedily. Nevertheless when the Son of man cometh, shall he find faith on the earth?
Luke18:9 And he spake this parable unto certain which trusted in themselves that they were righteous, and despised others:
Luke18:10 Two men went up into the temple to pray; the one a Pharisee, and the other a publican.
Luke18:11 The Pharisee stood and prayed thus with himself, God, I thank thee, that I am not as other men are, extortioners, unjust, adulterers, or even as this publican.
Luke18:12 I fast twice in the week, I give tithes of all that I possess.
Luke18:13 And the publican, standing afar off, would not lift up so much as his eyes unto heaven, but smote upon his breast, saying, God be merciful to me a sinner.
Luke18:14 I tell you, this man went down to his house justified rather than the other: for every one that exalteth himself shall be abased; and he that humbleth himself shall be exalted.
Luke18:15 And they brought unto him also infants, that he would touch them: but when his disciples saw it, they rebuked them.
Luke18:16 But Jesus called them unto him, and said, Suffer little children to come unto me, and forbid them not: for of such is the kingdom of God.
Luke18:17 Verily I say unto you, Whosoever shall not receive the kingdom of God as a little child shall in no wise enter therein.
Luke18:18 And a certain ruler asked him, saying, Good Master, what shall I do to inherit eternal life?
Luke18:19 And Jesus said unto him, Why callest thou me good? none is good, save one, that is, God.
Luke18:20 Thou knowest the commandments, Do not commit adultery, Do not kill, Do not steal, Do not bear false witness, Honour thy father and thy mother.
Luke18:21 And he said, All these have I kept from my youth up.
Luke18:22 Now when Jesus heard these things, he said unto him, Yet lackest thou one thing: sell all that thou hast, and distribute unto the poor, and thou shalt have treasure in heaven: and come, follow me.
Luke18:23 And when he heard this, he was very sorrowful: for he was very rich.
Luke18:24 And when Jesus saw that he was very sorrowful, he said, How hardly shall they that have riches enter into the kingdom of God!
Luke18:25 For it is easier for a camel to go through a needle's eye, than for a rich man to enter into the kingdom of God.
Luke18:26 And they that heard it said, Who then can be saved?
Luke18:27 And he said, The things which are impossible with men are possible with God.
Luke18:28 Then Peter said, Lo, we have left all, and followed thee.
Luke18:29 And he said unto them, Verily I say unto you, There is no man that hath left house, or parents, or brethren, or wife, or children, for the kingdom of God's sake,
Luke18:30 Who shall not receive manifold more in this present time, and in the world to come life everlasting.
Luke18:31 Then he took unto him the twelve, aning, Prophesy, who is it that smote thee?
Luke22:65 And many other things blasphemously spake they against him.
Luke22:66 And as soon as it was day, the elders of the people and the chief priests and the scribes came together, and led him into their council, saying,
Luke22:67 Art thou the Christ? tell us. And he said unto them, If I tell you, ye will not believe:
Luke22:68 And if I also ask you, ye will not answer me, nor let me go.
Luke22:69 Hereafter shall the Son of man sit on the right hand of the power of God.
Luke22:70 Then said they all, Art thou then the Son of God? And he said unto them, Ye say that I am.
Luke22:71 And they said, What need we any further witness? for we ourselves have heard of his own mouth.
Luke23:1 And the whole multitude of them arose, and led him unto Pilate.
Luke23:2 And they began to accuse him, saying, We found this fellow perverting the nation, and forbidding to give tribute to Caesar, saying that he himself is Christ a King.
Luke23:3 And Pilate asked him, saying, Art thou the King of the Jews? And he answered him and said, Thou sayest it.
Luke23:4 Then said Pilate to the chief priests and to the people, I find no fault in this man.
Luke23:5 And they were the more fierce, saying, He stirreth up the people, teaching throughout all Jewry, beginning from Galilee to this place.
Luke23:6 When Pilate heard of Galilee, he asked whether the man were a Galilaean.
Luke23:7 And as soon as he knew that he belonged unto Herod's jurisdiction, he sent him to Herod, who himself also was at Jerusalem at that time.
Luke23:8 And when Herod saw Jesus, he was exceeding glad: for he was desirous to see him of a long season, because he had heard many things of him; and he hoped to have seen some miracle done by him.
Luke23:9 Then he questioned with him in many words; but he answered him nothing.
Luke23:10 And the chief priests and scribes stood and vehemently accused him.
Luke23:11 And Herod with his men of war set him at nought, and mocked him, and arrayed him in a gorgeous robe, and sent him again to Pilate.
Luke23:12 And the same day Pilate and Herod were made friends together: for before they were at enmity between themselves.
Luke23:13 And Pilate, when he had called together the chief priests and the rulers and the people,
Luke23:14 Said unto them, Ye have brought this man unto me, as one that perverteth the people: and, behold, I, having examined him before you, have found no fault in this man touching those things whereof ye accuse him:
Luke23:15 No, nor yet Herod: for I sent you to him; and, lo, nothing worthy of death is done unto him.
Luke23:16 I will therefore chastise him, and release him.
Luke23:17 (For of necessity he must release one unto them at the feast.)
Luke23:18 And they cried out all at once, saying, Away with this man, and release unto us Barabbas:
Luke23:19 (Who for a certain sedition made in the city, and for murder, was cast into prison.)
Luke23:20 Pilate therefore, willing to release Jesus, spake again to them.
Luke23:21 But they cried, saying, Crucify him, crucify him.
Luke23:22 And he said unto them the third time, Why, what evil hath he done? I have found no cause of death in him: I will therefore chastise him, and let him go.
Luke23:23 And they were instant with loud voices, requiring that he might be crucified. And the voices of them and of the chief priests prevailed.
Luke23:24 And Pilate gave sentence that it should be as they required.
Luke23:25 And he released unto them him that for sedition and murder was cast into prison, whom they had desired; but he delivered Jesus to their will.
Luke23:26 And as they led him away, they laid hold upon one Simon, a Cyrenian, coming out of the country, and on him they laid the cross, that he might bear it after Jesus.
Luke23:27 And there followed him a great company of people, and of women, which also bewailed and lamented him.
Luke23:28 But Jesus turning unto them said, Daughters of Jerusalem, weep not for me, but weep for yourselves, and for your children.
Luke23:29 For, behold, the days are coming, in the which they shall say, Blessed are the barren, and the wombs that never bare, and the paps which never gave suck.
Luke23:30 Then shall they begin to say to the mountains, Fall on us; and to the hills, Cover us.
Luke23:31 For if they do these things in a green tree, what shall be done in the dry?
Luke23:32 And there were also two other, malefactors, led with him to be put to death.
Luke23:33 And when they were come to the place, which is called Calvary, there they crucified him, and the malefactors, one on the right hand, and the other on the left.
Luke23:34 Then said Jesus, Father, forgive them; for they know not what they do. And they parted his raiment, and cast lots.
Luke23:35 And the people stood beholding. And the rulers also with them derided him, saying, He saved others; let him save himself, if he be Christ, the chosen of God.
Luke23:36 And the soldiers also mocked him, coming to him, and offering him vinegar,
Luke23:37 And saying, If thou be the king of the Jews, save thyself.
Luke23:38 And a superscription also was written over him in letters of Greek, and Latin, and Hebrew, THIS IS THE KING OF THE JEWS.
Luke23:39 And one of the malefactors which were hanged railed on him, saying, If thou be Christ, save thyself and us.
Luke23:40 But the other answering rebuked him, saying, Dost not thou fear God, seeing thou art in the same condemnation?
Luke23:41 And we indeed justly; for we receive the due reward of our deeds: but this man hath done nothing amiss.
Luke23:42 And he said unto Jesus, Lord, remember me when thou comest into thy kingdom.
Luke23:43 And Jesus said unto him, Verily I say unto thee, To day shalt thou be with me in paradise.
Luke23:44 And it was about the sixth hour, and there was a darkness over all the earth until the ninth hour.
Luke23:45 And the sun was darkened, and the veil of the temple was rent in the midst.
Luke23:46 And when Jesus had cried with a loud voice, he said, Father, into thy hands I commend my spirit: and having said thus, he gave up the ghost.
Luke23:47 Now when the centurion saw what was done, he glorified God, saying, Certainly this was a righteous man.
Luke23:48 And all the people that came together to that sight, beholding the things which were done, smote their breasts, and returned.
Luke23:49 And all his acquaintance, and the women that followed him from Galilee, stood afar off, beholding these things.
Luke23:50 And, behold, there was a man named Joseph, a counsellor; and he was a good man, and a just:
Luke23:51 (The same had not consented to the counsel and deed of them;) he was of Arimathaea, a city of the Jews: who also himself waited for the kingdom of God.
Luke23:52 This man went unto Pilate, and begged the body of Jesus.
Luke23:53 And he took it down, and wrapped it in linen, and laid it in a sepulchre that was hewn in stone, wherein never man before was laid.
Luke23:54 And that day was the preparation, and the sabbath drew on.
Luke23:55 And the women also, which came with him from Galilee, followed after, and beheld the sepulchre, and how his body was laid.
Luke23:56 And they returned, and prepared spices and ointments; and rested the sabbath day according to the commandment.
Luke24:1 Now upon the first day of the week, very early in the morning, they came unto the sepulchre, bringing the spices which they had prepared, and certain others with them.
Luke24:2 And they found the stone rolled away from the sepulchre.
Luke24:3 And they entered in, and found not the body of the Lord Jesus.
Luke24:4 And it came to pass, as they were much perplexed thereabout, behold, two men stood by them in shining garments:
Luke24:5 And as they were afraid, and bowed down their faces to the earth, they said unto them, Why seek ye the living among the dead?
Luke24:6 He is not here, but is risen: remember how he spake unto you when he was yet in Galilee,
Luke24:7 Saying, The Son of man must be delivered into the hands of sinful men, and be crucified, and the third day rise again.
Luke24:8 And they remembered his words,
Luke24:9 And returned from the sepulchre, and told all these things unto the eleven, and to all the re.
Luke24:10 It was Mary Magdalene, and Joanna, and Mary the mother of James, and other women that were with them, which told these things unto the apostles.
Luke24:11 And their words seemed to them as idle tales, and they believed them not.
Luke24:12 Then arose Peter, and ran unto the sepulchre; and stooping down, he beheld the linen clothes laid by themselves, and departed, wondering in himself at that which was come to pass.
Luke24:13 And, behold, two of them went that same day to a village called Emmaus, which was from Jerusalem about threescore furlongs.
Luke24:14 And they talked together of all these things which had happened.
Luke24:15 And it came to pass, that, while they communed together and reasoned, Jesus himself drew near, and went with them.
Luke24:16 But their eyes were holden that they should not know him.
Luke24:17 And he said unto them, What manner of communications are these that ye have one to another, as ye walk, and are sad?
Luke24:18 And the one of them, whose name was Cleopas, answering said unto him, Art thou only a stranger in Jerusalem, and hast not known the things which are come to pass there in these days?
Luke24:19 And he said unto them, What things? And they said unto him, Concerning Jesus of Nazareth, which was a prophet mighty in deed and word before God and all the people:
Luke24:20 And how the chief priests and our rulers delivered him to be condemned to death, and have crucified him.
Luke24:21 But we trusted that it had been he which should have redeemed Israel: and beside all this, to day is the third day since these things were done.
Luke24:22 Yea, and certain women also of our company made us astonished, which were early at the sepulchre;
Luke24:23 And when they found not his body, they came, saying, that they had also seen a vision of angels, which said that he was alive.
Luke24:24 And certain of them which were with us went to the sepulchre, and found it even so as the women had said: but him they saw not.
Luke24:25 Then he said unto them, O fools, and slow of heart to believe all that the prophets have spoken:
Luke24:26 Ought not Christ to have suffered these things, and to enter into his glory?
Luke24:27 And beginning at Moses and all the prophets, he expounded unto them in all the scriptures the things concerning himself.
Luke24:28 And they drew nigh unto the village, whither they went: and he made as though he would have gone further.
Luke24:29 But they constrained him, saying, Abide with us: for it is toward evening, and the day is far spent. And he went in to tarry with them.
Luke24:30 And it came to pass, as he sat at meat with them, he took bread, and blessed it, and brake, and gave to them.
Luke24:31 And their eyes were opened, and they knew him; and he vanished out of their sight.
Luke24:32 And they said one to another, Did not our heart burn within us, while he talked with us by the way, and while he opened to us the scriptures?
Luke24:33 And they rose up the same hour, and returned to Jerusalem, and found the eleven gathered together, and them that were with them,
Luke24:34 Saying, The Lord is risen indeed, and hath appeared to Simon.
Luke24:35 And they told what things were done in the way, and how he was known of them in breaking of bread.
Luke24:36 And as they thus spake, Jesus himself stood in the midst of them, and saith unto them, Peace be unto you.
Luke24:37 But they were terrified and affrighted, and supposed that they had seen a spirit.
Luke24:38 And he said unto them, Why are ye troubled? and why do thoughts arise in your hearts?
Luke24:39 Behold my hands and my feet, that it is I myself: handle me, and see; for a spirit hath not flesh and bones, as ye see me have.
Luke24:40 And when he had thus spoken, he shewed them his hands and his feet.
Luke24:41 And while they yet believed not for joy, and wondered, he said unto them, Have ye here any meat?
Luke24:42 And they gave him a piece of a broiled fish, and of an honeycomb.
Luke24:43 And he took it, and did eat before them.
Luke24:44 And he said unto them, These are the words which I spake unto you, while I was yet with you, that all things must be fulfilled, which were written in the law of Moses, and in the prophets, and in the psalms, concerning me.
Luke24:45 Then opened he their understanding, that they might understand the scriptures,
Luke24:46 And said unto them, Thus it is written, and thus it behoved Christ to suffer, and to rise from the dead the third day:
Luke24:47 And that repentance and remission of sins should be preached in his name among all nations, beginning at Jerusalem.
Luke24:48 And ye are witnesses of these things.
Luke24:49 And, behold, I send the promise of my Father upon you: but tarry ye in the city of Jerusalem, until ye be endued with power from on high.
Luke24:50 And he led them out as far as to Bethany, and he lifted up his hands, and blessed them.
Luke24:51 And it came to pass, while he blessed them, he was parted from them, and carried up into heaven.
Luke24:52 And they worshipped him, and returned to Jerusalem with great joy:
Luke24:53 And were continually in the temple, praising and blessing God. Amen.
John1:1 In the beginning was the Word, and the Word was with God, and the Word was God.
John1:2 The same was in the beginning with God.
John1:3 All things were made by him; and without him was not any thing made that was made.
John1:4 In him was life; and the life was the light of men.
John1:5 And the light shineth in darkness; and the darkness comprehended it not.
John1:6 There was a man sent from God, whose name was John.
John1:7 The same came for a witness, to bear witness of the Light, that all men through him might believe.
John1:8 He was not that Light, but was sent to bear witness of that Light.
John1:9 That was the true Light, which lighteth every man that cometh into the world.
John1:10 He was in the world, and the world was made by him, and the world knew him not.
John1:11 He came unto his own, and his own received him not.
John1:12 But as many as received him, to them gave he power to become the sons of God, even to them that believe on his name:
John1:13 Which were born, not of blood, nor of the will of the flesh, nor of the will of man, but of God.
John1:14 And the Word was made flesh, and dwelt among us, (and we beheld his glory, the glory as of the only begotten of the Father,) full of grace and truth.
John1:15 John bare witness of him, and cried, saying, This was he of whom I spake, He that cometh after me is preferred before me: for he was before me.
John1:16 And of his fulness have all we received, and grace for grace.
John1:17 For the law was given by Moses, but grace and truth came by Jesus Christ.
John1:18 No man hath seen God at any time; the only begotten Son, which is in the bosom of the Father, he hath declared him.
John1:19 And this is the record of John, when the Jews sent priests and Levites from Jerusalem to ask him, Who art thou?
John1:20 And he confessed, and denied not; but confessed, I am not the Christ.
John1:21 And they asked him, What then? Art thou Elias? And he saith, I am not. Art thou that prophet? And he answered, No.
John1:22 Then said they unto him, Who art thou? that we may give an answer to them that sent us. What sayest thou of thyself?
John1:23 He said, I am the voice of one crying in the wilderness, Make straight the way of the Lord, as said the prophet Esaias.
John1:24 And they which were sent were of the Pharisees.
John1:25 And they asked him, and said unto him, Why baptizest thou then, if thou be not that Christ, nor Elias, neither that prophet?
John1:26 John answered them, saying, I baptize with water: but there standeth one among you, whom ye know not;
John1:27 He it is, who coming after me is preferred before me, whose shoe's latchet I am not worthy to unloose.
John1:28 These things were done in Bethabara beyond Jordan, where John was baptizing.
John1:29 The next day John seeth Jesus coming unto him, and saith, Behold the Lamb of God, which taketh away the sin of the world.
John1:30 This is he of whom I said, After me cometh a man which is preferred before me: for he was before me.
John1:31 And I knew him not: but that he should be made manist to Israel, therefore am I come baptizing with water.
John1:32 And John bare record, saying, I saw the Spirit descending from heaven like a dove, and it abode upon him.
John1:33 And I knew him not: but he that sent me to baptize with water, the same said unto me, Upon whom thou shalt see the Spirit descending, and remaining on him, the same is he which baptizeth with the Holy Ghost.
John1:34 And I saw, and bare record that this is the Son of God.
John1:35 Again the next day after John stood, and two of his disciples;
John1:36 And looking upon Jesus as he walked, he saith, Behold the Lamb of God!
John1:37 And the two disciples heard him speak, and they followed Jesus.
John1:38 Then Jesus turned, and saw them following, and saith unto them, What seek ye? They said unto him, Rabbi, (which is to say, being interpreted, Master,) where dwellest thou?
John1:39 He saith unto them, Come and see. They came and saw where he dwelt, and abode with him that day: for it was about the tenth hour.
John1:40 One of the two which heard John speak, and followed him, was Andrew, Simon Peter's brother.
John1:41 He first findeth his own brother Simon, and saith unto him, We have found the Messias, which is, being interpreted, the Christ.
John1:42 And he brought him to Jesus. And when Jesus beheld him, he said, Thou art Simon the son of Jona: thou shalt be called Cephas, which is by interpretation, A stone.
John1:43 The day following Jesus would go forth into Galilee, and findeth Philip, and saith unto him, Follow me.
John1:44 Now Philip was of Bethsaida, the city of Andrew and Peter.
John1:45 Philip findeth Nathanael, and saith unto him, We have found him, of whom Moses in the law, and the prophets, did write, Jesus of Nazareth, the son of Joseph.
John1:46 And Nathanael said unto him, Can there any good thing come out of Nazareth? Philip saith unto him, Come and see.
John1:47 Jesus saw Nathanael coming to him, and saith of him, Behold an Israelite indeed, in whom is no guile!
John1:48 Nathanael saith unto him, Whence knowest thou me? Jesus answered and said unto him, Before that Philip called thee, when thou wast under the fig tree, I saw thee.
John1:49 Nathanael answered and saith unto him, Rabbi, thou art the Son of God; thou art the King of Israel.
John1:50 Jesus answered and said unto him, Because I said unto thee, I saw thee under the fig tree, believest thou? thou shalt see greater things than these.
John1:51 And he saith unto him, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Hereafter ye shall see heaven open, and the angels of God ascending and descending upon the Son of man.
John2:1 And the third day there was a marriage in Cana of Galilee; and the mother of Jesus was there:
John2:2 And both Jesus was called, and his disciples, to the marriage.
John2:3 And when they wanted wine, the mother of Jesus saith unto him, They have no wine.
John2:4 Jesus saith unto her, Woman, what have I to do with thee? mine hour is not yet come.
John2:5 His mother saith unto the servants, Whatsoever he saith unto you, do it.
John2:6 And there were set there six waterpots of stone, after the manner of the purifying of the Jews, containing two or three firkins apiece.
John2:7 Jesus saith unto them, Fill the waterpots with water. And they filled them up to the brim.
John2:8 And he saith unto them, Draw out now, and bear unto the governor of the feast. And they bare it.
John2:9 When the ruler of the feast had tasted the water that was made wine, and knew not whence it was: (but the servants which drew the water knew;) the governor of the feast called the bridegroom,
John2:10 And saith unto him, Every man at the beginning doth set forth good wine; and when men have well drunk, then that which is worse: but thou hast kept the good wine until now.
John2:11 This beginning of miracles did Jesus in Cana of Galilee, and manifested forth his glory; and his disciples believed on him.
John2:12 After this he went down to Capernaum, he, and his mother, and his brethren, and his disciples: and they continued there not many days.
John2:13 And the Jews' passover was at hand, and Jesus went up to Jerusalem,
John2:14 And found in the temple those that sold oxen and sheep and doves, and the changers of money sitting:
John2:15 And when he had made a scourge of small cords, he drove them all out of the temple, and the sheep, and the oxen; and poured out the changers' money, and overthrew the tables;
John2:16 And said unto them that sold doves, Take these things hence; make not my Father's house an house of merchandise.
John2:17 And his disciples remembered that it was written, The zeal of thine house hath eaten me up.
John2:18 Then answered the Jews and said unto him, What sign shewest thou unto us, seeing that thou doest these things?
John2:19 Jesus answered and said unto them, Destroy this temple, and in three days I will raise it up.
John2:20 Then said the Jews, Forty and six years was this temple in building, and wilt thou rear it up in three days?
John2:21 But he spake of the temple of his body.
John2:22 When therefore he was risen from the dead, his disciples remembered that he had said this unto them; and they believed the scripture, and the word which Jesus had said.
John2:23 Now when he was in Jerusalem at the passover, in the feast day, many believed in his name, when they saw the miracles which he did.
John2:24 But Jesus did not commit himself unto them, because he knew all men,
John2:25 And needed not that any should testify of man: for he knew what was in man.
John3:1 There was a man of the Pharisees, named Nicodemus, a ruler of the Jews:
John3:2 The same came to Jesus by night, and said unto him, Rabbi, we know that thou art a teacher come from God: for no man can do these miracles that thou doest, except God be with him.
John3:3 Jesus answered and said unto him, Verily, verily, I say unto thee, Except a man be born again, he cannot see the kingdom of God.
John3:4 Nicodemus saith unto him, How can a man be born when he is old? can he enter the second time into his mother's womb, and be born?
John3:5 Jesus answered, Verily, verily, I say unto thee, Except a man be born of water and of the Spirit, he cannot enter into the kingdom of God.
John3:6 That which is born of the flesh is flesh; and that which is born of the Spirit is spirit.
John3:7 Marvel not that I said unto thee, Ye must be born again.
John3:8 The wind bloweth where it listeth, and thou hearest the sound thereof, but canst not tell whence it cometh, and whither it goeth: so is every one that is born of the Spirit.
John3:9 Nicodemus answered and said unto him, How can these things be?
John3:10 Jesus answered and said unto him, Art thou a master of Israel, and knowest not these things?
John3:11 Verily, verily, I say unto thee, We speak that we do know, and testify that we have seen; and ye receive not our witness.
John3:12 If I have told you earthly things, and ye believe not, how shall ye believe, if I tell you of heavenly things?
John3:13 And no man hath ascended up to heaven, but he that came down from heaven, even the Son of man which is in heaven.
John3:14 And as Moses lifted up the serpent in the wilderness, even so must the Son of man be lifted up:
John3:15 That whosoever believeth in him should not perish, but have eternal life.
John3:16 For God so loved the world, that he gave his only begotten Son, that whosoever believeth in him should not perish, but have everlasting life.
John3:17 For God sent not his Son into the world to condemn the world; but that the world through him might be saved.
John3:18 He that believeth on him is not condemned: but he that believeth not is condemned already, because he hath not believed in the name of the only begotten Son of God.
John3:19 And this is the condemnation, that light is come into the world, and men loved darkness rather than light, because their deeds were evil.
John3:20 For every one that doeth evil hateth the light, neither cometh to the light, lest his deeds should be reproved.
John3:21 But he that doeth truth cometh to the light, that his deeds may be made manifest, that they are wrought in God.
John3:22 After these things came Jesus and his disciples into the land of Judaea; knoweth whence he is.
John7:28 Then cried Jesus in the temple as he taught, saying, Ye both know me, and ye know whence I am: and I am not come of myself, but he that sent me is true, whom ye know not.
John7:29 But I know him: for I am from him, and he hath sent me.
John7:30 Then they sought to take him: but no man laid hands on him, because his hour was not yet come.
John7:31 And many of the people believed on him, and said, When Christ cometh, will he do more miracles than these which this man hath done?
John7:32 The Pharisees heard that the people murmured such things concerning him; and the Pharisees and the chief priests sent officers to take him.
John7:33 Then said Jesus unto them, Yet a little while am I with you, and then I go unto him that sent me.
John7:34 Ye shall seek me, and shall not find me: and where I am, thither ye cannot come.
John7:35 Then said the Jews among themselves, Whither will he go, that we shall not find him? will he go unto the dispersed among the Gentiles, and teach the Gentiles?
John7:36 What manner of saying is this that he said, Ye shall seek me, and shall not find me: and where I am, thither ye cannot come?
John7:37 In the last day, that great day of the feast, Jesus stood and cried, saying, If any man thirst, let him come unto me, and drink.
John7:38 He that believeth on me, as the scripture hath said, out of his belly shall flow rivers of living water.
John7:39 (But this spake he of the Spirit, which they that believe on him should receive: for the Holy Ghost was not yet given; because that Jesus was not yet glorified.)
John7:40 Many of the people therefore, when they heard this saying, said, Of a truth this is the Prophet.
John7:41 Others said, This is the Christ. But some said, Shall Christ come out of Galilee?
John7:42 Hath not the scripture said, That Christ cometh of the seed of David, and out of the town of Bethlehem, where David was?
John7:43 So there was a division among the people because of him.
John7:44 And some of them would have taken him; but no man laid hands on him.
John7:45 Then came the officers to the chief priests and Pharisees; and they said unto them, Why have ye not brought him?
John7:46 The officers answered, Never man spake like this man.
John7:47 Then answered them the Pharisees, Are ye also deceived?
John7:48 Have any of the rulers or of the Pharisees believed on him?
John7:49 But this people who knoweth not the law are cursed.
John7:50 Nicodemus saith unto them, (he that came to Jesus by night, being one of them,)
John7:51 Doth our law judge any man, before it hear him, and know what he doeth?
John7:52 They answered and said unto him, Art thou also of Galilee? Search, and look: for out of Galilee ariseth no prophet.
John7:53 And every man went unto his own house.
John8:1 Jesus went unto the mount of Olives.
John8:2 And early in the morning he came again into the temple, and all the people came unto him; and he sat down, and taught them.
John8:3 And the scribes and Pharisees brought unto him a woman taken in adultery; and when they had set her in the midst,
John8:4 They say unto him, Master, this woman was taken in adultery, in the very act.
John8:5 Now Moses in the law commanded us, that such should be stoned: but what sayest thou?
John8:6 This they said, tempting him, that they might have to accuse him. But Jesus stooped down, and with his finger wrote on the ground, as though he heard them not.
John8:7 So when they continued asking him, he lifted up himself, and said unto them, He that is without sin among you, let him first cast a stone at her.
John8:8 And again he stooped down, and wrote on the ground.
John8:9 And they which heard it, being convicted by their own conscience, went out one by one, beginning at the eldest, even unto the last: and Jesus was left alone, and the woman standing in the midst.
John8:10 When Jesus had lifted up himself, and saw none but the woman, he said unto her, Woman, where are those thine accusers? hath no man condemned thee?
John8:11 She said, No man, Lord. And Jesus said unto her, Neither do I condemn thee: go, and sin no more.
John8:12 Then spake Jesus again unto them, saying, I am the light of the world: he that followeth me shall not walk in darkness, but shall have the light of life.
John8:13 The Pharisees therefore said unto him, Thou bearest record of thyself; thy record is not true.
John8:14 Jesus answered and said unto them, Though I bear record of myself, yet my record is true: for I know whence I came, and whither I go; but ye cannot tell whence I come, and whither I go.
John8:15 Ye judge after the flesh; I judge no man.
John8:16 And yet if I judge, my judgment is true: for I am not alone, but I and the Father that sent me.
John8:17 It is also written in your law, that the testimony of two men is true.
John8:18 I am one that bear witness of myself, and the Father that sent me beareth witness of me.
John8:19 Then said they unto him, Where is thy Father? Jesus answered, Ye neither know me, nor my Father: if ye had known me, ye should have known my Father also.
John8:20 These words spake Jesus in the treasury, as he taught in the temple: and no man laid hands on him; for his hour was not yet come.
John8:21 Then said Jesus again unto them, I go my way, and ye shall seek me, and shall die in your sins: whither I go, ye cannot come.
John8:22 Then said the Jews, Will he kill himself? because he saith, Whither I go, ye cannot come.
John8:23 And he said unto them, Ye are from beneath; I am from above: ye are of this world; I am not of this world.
John8:24 I said therefore unto you, that ye shall die in your sins: for if ye believe not that I am he, ye shall die in your sins.
John8:25 Then said they unto him, Who art thou? And Jesus saith unto them, Even the same that I said unto you from the beginning.
John8:26 I have many things to say and to judge of you: but he that sent me is true; and I speak to the world those things which I have heard of him.
John8:27 They understood not that he spake to them of the Father.
John8:28 Then said Jesus unto them, When ye have lifted up the Son of man, then shall ye know that I am he, and that I do nothing of myself; but as my Father hath taught me, I speak these things.
John8:29 And he that sent me is with me: the Father hath not left me alone; for I do always those things that please him.
John8:30 As he spake these words, many believed on him.
John8:31 Then said Jesus to those Jews which believed on him, If ye continue in my word, then are ye my disciples indeed;
John8:32 And ye shall know the truth, and the truth shall make you free.
John8:33 They answered him, We be Abraham's seed, and were never in bondage to any man: how sayest thou, Ye shall be made free?
John8:34 Jesus answered them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Whosoever committeth sin is the servant of sin.
John8:35 And the servant abideth not in the house for ever: but the Son abideth ever.
John8:36 If the Son therefore shall make you free, ye shall be free indeed.
John8:37 I know that ye are Abraham's seed; but ye seek to kill me, because my word hath no place in you.
John8:38 I speak that which I have seen with my Father: and ye do that which ye have seen with your father.
John8:39 They answered and said unto him, Abraham is our father. Jesus saith unto them, If ye were Abraham's children, ye would do the works of Abraham.
John8:40 But now ye seek to kill me, a man that hath told you the truth, which I have heard of God: this did not Abraham.
John8:41 Ye do the deeds of your father. Then said they to him, We be not born of fornication; we have one Father, even God.
John8:42 Jesus said unto them, If God were your Father, ye would love me: for I proceeded forth and came from God; neither came I of myself, but he sent me.
John8:43 Why do ye not understand my speech? even because ye cannot hear my word.
John8:44 Ye are of your father the devil, and the lusts of your father ye will do. He was a murderer from the beginning, and abode not in the truth, because there is no truth in him. When he speaketh a lie, he speaketh of his own: for he is a liar, and the father of it.
John8:45 And because I tell you the truth, ye believe me not.
John8:46hich of you convinceth me of sin? And if I say the truth, why do ye not believe me?
John8:47 He that is of God heareth God's words: ye therefore hear them not, because ye are not of God.
John8:48 Then answered the Jews, and said unto him, Say we not well that thou art a Samaritan, and hast a devil?
John8:49 Jesus answered, I have not a devil; but I honour my Father, and ye do dishonour me.
John8:50 And I seek not mine own glory: there is one that seeketh and judgeth.
John8:51 Verily, verily, I say unto you, If a man keep my saying, he shall never see death.
John8:52 Then said the Jews unto him, Now we know that thou hast a devil. Abraham is dead, and the prophets; and thou sayest, If a man keep my saying, he shall never taste of death.
John8:53 Art thou greater than our father Abraham, which is dead? and the prophets are dead: whom makest thou thyself?
John8:54 Jesus answered, If I honour myself, my honour is nothing: it is my Father that honoureth me; of whom ye say, that he is your God:
John8:55 Yet ye have not known him; but I know him: and if I should say, I know him not, I shall be a liar like unto you: but I know him, and keep his saying.
John8:56 Your father Abraham rejoiced to see my day: and he saw it, and was glad.
John8:57 Then said the Jews unto him, Thou art not yet fifty years old, and hast thou seen Abraham?
John8:58 Jesus said unto them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Before Abraham was, I am.
John8:59 Then took they up stones to cast at him: but Jesus hid himself, and went out of the temple, going through the midst of them, and so passed by.
John9:1 And as Jesus passed by, he saw a man which was blind from his birth.
John9:2 And his disciples asked him, saying, Master, who did sin, this man, or his parents, that he was born blind?
John9:3 Jesus answered, Neither hath this man sinned, nor his parents: but that the works of God should be made manifest in him.
John9:4 I must work the works of him that sent me, while it is day: the night cometh, when no man can work.
John9:5 As long as I am in the world, I am the light of the world.
John9:6 When he had thus spoken, he spat on the ground, and made clay of the spittle, and he anointed the eyes of the blind man with the clay,
John9:7 And said unto him, Go, wash in the pool of Siloam, (which is by interpretation, Sent.) He went his way therefore, and washed, and came seeing.
John9:8 The neighbours therefore, and they which before had seen him that he was blind, said, Is not this he that sat and begged?
John9:9 Some said, This is he: others said, He is like him: but he said, I am he.
John9:10 Therefore said they unto him, How were thine eyes opened?
John9:11 He answered and said, A man that is called Jesus made clay, and anointed mine eyes, and said unto me, Go to the pool of Siloam, and wash: and I went and washed, and I received sight.
John9:12 Then said they unto him, Where is he? He said, I know not.
John9:13 They brought to the Pharisees him that aforetime was blind.
John9:14 And it was the sabbath day when Jesus made the clay, and opened his eyes.
John9:15 Then again the Pharisees also asked him how he had received his sight. He said unto them, He put clay upon mine eyes, and I washed, and do see.
John9:16 Therefore said some of the Pharisees, This man is not of God, because he keepeth not the sabbath day. Others said, How can a man that is a sinner do such miracles? And there was a division among them.
John9:17 They say unto the blind man again, What sayest thou of him, that he hath opened thine eyes? He said, He is a prophet.
John9:18 But the Jews did not believe concerning him, that he had been blind, and received his sight, until they called the parents of him that had received his sight.
John9:19 And they asked them, saying, Is this your son, who ye say was born blind? how then doth he now see?
John9:20 His parents answered them and said, We know that this is our son, and that he was born blind:
John9:21 But by what means he now seeth, we know not; or who hath opened his eyes, we know not: he is of age; ask him: he shall speak for himself.
John9:22 These words spake his parents, because they feared the Jews: for the Jews had agreed already, that if any man did confess that he was Christ, he should be put out of the synagogue.
John9:23 Therefore said his parents, He is of age; ask him.
John9:24 Then again called they the man that was blind, and said unto him, Give God the praise: we know that this man is a sinner.
John9:25 He answered and said, Whether he be a sinner or no, I know not: one thing I know, that, whereas I was blind, now I see.
John9:26 Then said they to him again, What did he to thee? how opened he thine eyes?
John9:27 He answered them, I have told you already, and ye did not hear: wherefore would ye hear it again? will ye also be his disciples?
John9:28 Then they reviled him, and said, Thou art his disciple; but we are Moses' disciples.
John9:29 We know that God spake unto Moses: as for this fellow, we know not from whence he is.
John9:30 The man answered and said unto them, Why herein is a marvellous thing, that ye know not from whence he is, and yet he hath opened mine eyes.
John9:31 Now we know that God heareth not sinners: but if any man be a worshipper of God, and doeth his will, him he heareth.
John9:32 Since the world began was it not heard that any man opened the eyes of one that was born blind.
John9:33 If this man were not of God, he could do nothing.
John9:34 They answered and said unto him, Thou wast altogether born in sins, and dost thou teach us? And they cast him out.
John9:35 Jesus heard that they had cast him out; and when he had found him, he said unto him, Dost thou believe on the Son of God?
John9:36 He answered and said, Who is he, Lord, that I might believe on him?
John9:37 And Jesus said unto him, Thou hast both seen him, and it is he that talketh with thee.
John9:38 And he said, Lord, I believe. And he worshipped him.
John9:39 And Jesus said, For judgment I am come into this world, that they which see not might see; and that they which see might be made blind.
John9:40 And some of the Pharisees which were with him heard these words, and said unto him, Are we blind also?
John9:41 Jesus said unto them, If ye were blind, ye should have no sin: but now ye say, We see; therefore your sin remaineth.
John10:1 Verily, verily, I say unto you, He that entereth not by the door into the sheepfold, but climbeth up some other way, the same is a thief and a robber.
John10:2 But he that entereth in by the door is the shepherd of the sheep.
John10:3 To him the porter openeth; and the sheep hear his voice: and he calleth his own sheep by name, and leadeth them out.
John10:4 And when he putteth forth his own sheep, he goeth before them, and the sheep follow him: for they know his voice.
John10:5 And a stranger will they not follow, but will flee from him: for they know not the voice of strangers.
John10:6 This parable spake Jesus unto them: but they understood not what things they were which he spake unto them.
John10:7 Then said Jesus unto them again, Verily, verily, I say unto you, I am the door of the sheep.
John10:8 All that ever came before me are thieves and robbers: but the sheep did not hear them.
John10:9 I am the door: by me if any man enter in, he shall be saved, and shall go in and out, and find pasture.
John10:10 The thief cometh not, but for to steal, and to kill, and to destroy: I am come that they might have life, and that they might have it more abundantly.
John10:11 I am the good shepherd: the good shepherd giveth his life for the sheep.
John10:12 But he that is an hireling, and not the shepherd, whose own the sheep are not, seeth the wolf coming, and leaveth the sheep, and fleeth: and the wolf catcheth them, and scattereth the sheep.
John10:13 The hireling fleeth, because he is an hireling, and careth not for the sheep.
John10:14 I am the good shepherd, and know my sheep, and am known of mine.
John10:15 As the Father knoweth me, even so know I the Father: and I lay down my life for the sheep.
John10:16 And other sheep I have, which are not of this fold: them also I must bring, and they shall hear my voice; and there shall be onfold, and one shepherd.
John10:17 Therefore doth my Father love me, because I lay down my life, that I might take it again.
John10:18 No man taketh it from me, but I lay it down of myself. I have power to lay it down, and I have power to take it again. This commandment have I received of my Father.
John10:19 There was a division therefore again among the Jews for these sayings.
John10:20 And many of them said, He hath a devil, and is mad; why hear ye him?
John10:21 Others said, These are not the words of him that hath a devil. Can a devil open the eyes of the blind?
John10:22 And it was at Jerusalem the feast of the dedication, and it was winter.
John10:23 And Jesus walked in the temple in Solomon's porch.
John10:24 Then came the Jews round about him, and said unto him, How long dost thou make us to doubt? If thou be the Christ, tell us plainly.
John10:25 Jesus answered them, I told you, and ye believed not: the works that I do in my Father's name, they bear witness of me.
John10:26 But ye believe not, because ye are not of my sheep, as I said unto you.
John10:27 My sheep hear my voice, and I know them, and they follow me:
John10:28 And I give unto them eternal life; and they shall never perish, neither shall any man pluck them out of my hand.
John10:29 My Father, which gave them me, is greater than all; and no man is able to pluck them out of my Father's hand.
John10:30 I and my Father are one.
John10:31 Then the Jews took up stones again to stone him.
John10:32 Jesus answered them, Many good works have I shewed you from my Father; for which of those works do ye stone me?
John10:33 The Jews answered him, saying, For a good work we stone thee not; but for blasphemy; and because that thou, being a man, makest thyself God.
John10:34 Jesus answered them, Is it not written in your law, I said, Ye are gods?
John10:35 If he called them gods, unto whom the word of God came, and the scripture cannot be broken;
John10:36 Say ye of him, whom the Father hath sanctified, and sent into the world, Thou blasphemest; because I said, I am the Son of God?
John10:37 If I do not the works of my Father, believe me not.
John10:38 But if I do, though ye believe not me, believe the works: that ye may know, and believe, that the Father is in me, and I in him.
John10:39 Therefore they sought again to take him: but he escaped out of their hand,
John10:40 And went away again beyond Jordan into the place where John at first baptized; and there he abode.
John10:41 And many resorted unto him, and said, John did no miracle: but all things that John spake of this man were true.
John10:42 And many believed on him there.
John11:1 Now a certain man was sick, named Lazarus, of Bethany, the town of Mary and her sister Martha.
John11:2 (It was that Mary which anointed the Lord with ointment, and wiped his feet with her hair, whose brother Lazarus was sick.)
John11:3 Therefore his sisters sent unto him, saying, Lord, behold, he whom thou lovest is sick.
John11:4 When Jesus heard that, he said, This sickness is not unto death, but for the glory of God, that the Son of God might be glorified thereby.
John11:5 Now Jesus loved Martha, and her sister, and Lazarus.
John11:6 When he had heard therefore that he was sick, he abode two days still in the same place where he was.
John11:7 Then after that saith he to his disciples, Let us go into Judaea again.
John11:8 His disciples say unto him, Master, the Jews of late sought to stone thee; and goest thou thither again?
John11:9 Jesus answered, Are there not twelve hours in the day? If any man walk in the day, he stumbleth not, because he seeth the light of this world.
John11:10 But if a man walk in the night, he stumbleth, because there is no light in him.
John11:11 These things said he: and after that he saith unto them, Our friend Lazarus sleepeth; but I go, that I may awake him out of sleep.
John11:12 Then said his disciples, Lord, if he sleep, he shall do well.
John11:13 Howbeit Jesus spake of his death: but they thought that he had spoken of taking of rest in sleep.
John11:14 Then said Jesus unto them plainly, Lazarus is dead.
John11:15 And I am glad for your sakes that I was not there, to the intent ye may believe; nevertheless let us go unto him.
John11:16 Then said Thomas, which is called Didymus, unto his fellowdisciples, Let us also go, that we may die with him.
John11:17 Then when Jesus came, he found that he had lain in the grave four days already.
John11:18 Now Bethany was nigh unto Jerusalem, about fifteen furlongs off:
John11:19 And many of the Jews came to Martha and Mary, to comfort them concerning their brother.
John11:20 Then Martha, as soon as she heard that Jesus was coming, went and met him: but Mary sat still in the house.
John11:21 Then said Martha unto Jesus, Lord, if thou hadst been here, my brother had not died.
John11:22 But I know, that even now, whatsoever thou wilt ask of God, God will give it thee.
John11:23 Jesus saith unto her, Thy brother shall rise again.
John11:24 Martha saith unto him, I know that he shall rise again in the resurrection at the last day.
John11:25 Jesus said unto her, I am the resurrection, and the life: he that believeth in me, though he were dead, yet shall he live:
John11:26 And whosoever liveth and believeth in me shall never die. Believest thou this?
John11:27 She saith unto him, Yea, Lord: I believe that thou art the Christ, the Son of God, which should come into the world.
John11:28 And when she had so said, she went her way, and called Mary her sister secretly, saying, The Master is come, and calleth for thee.
John11:29 As soon as she heard that, she arose quickly, and came unto him.
John11:30 Now Jesus was not yet come into the town, but was in that place where Martha met him.
John11:31 The Jews then which were with her in the house, and comforted her, when they saw Mary, that she rose up hastily and went out, followed her, saying, She goeth unto the grave to weep there.
John11:32 Then when Mary was come where Jesus was, and saw him, she fell down at his feet, saying unto him, Lord, if thou hadst been here, my brother had not died.
John11:33 When Jesus therefore saw her weeping, and the Jews also weeping which came with her, he groaned in the spirit, and was troubled,
John11:34 And said, Where have ye laid him? They said unto him, Lord, come and see.
John11:35 Jesus wept.
John11:36 Then said the Jews, Behold how he loved him!
John11:37 And some of them said, Could not this man, which opened the eyes of the blind, have caused that even this man should not have died?
John11:38 Jesus therefore again groaning in himself cometh to the grave. It was a cave, and a stone lay upon it.
John11:39 Jesus said, Take ye away the stone. Martha, the sister of him that was dead, saith unto him, Lord, by this time he stinketh: for he hath been dead four days.
John11:40 Jesus saith unto her, Said I not unto thee, that, if thou wouldest believe, thou shouldest see the glory of God?
John11:41 Then they took away the stone from the place where the dead was laid. And Jesus lifted up his eyes, and said, Father, I thank thee that thou hast heard me.
John11:42 And I knew that thou hearest me always: but because of the people which stand by I said it, that they may believe that thou hast sent me.
John11:43 And when he thus had spoken, he cried with a loud voice, Lazarus, come forth.
John11:44 And he that was dead came forth, bound hand and foot with graveclothes: and his face was bound about with a napkin. Jesus saith unto them, Loose him, and let him go.
John11:45 Then many of the Jews which came to Mary, and had seen the things which Jesus did, believed on him.
John11:46 But some of them went their ways to the Pharisees, and told them what things Jesus had done.
John11:47 Then gathered the chief priests and the Pharisees a council, and said, What do we? for this man doeth many miracles.
John11:48 If we let him thus alone, all men will believe on him: and the Romans shall come and take away both our place and nation.
John11:49 And one of them, named Caiaphas, being the high priest that same year, said unto them, Ye know nothing at all,
John11:50 Nor consider that it is expedient for us, that one mam in thy name: those that thou gavest me I have kept, and none of them is lost, but the son of perdition; that the scripture might be fulfilled.
John17:13 And now come I to thee; and these things I speak in the world, that they might have my joy fulfilled in themselves.
John17:14 I have given them thy word; and the world hath hated them, because they are not of the world, even as I am not of the world.
John17:15 I pray not that thou shouldest take them out of the world, but that thou shouldest keep them from the evil.
John17:16 They are not of the world, even as I am not of the world.
John17:17 Sanctify them through thy truth: thy word is truth.
John17:18 As thou hast sent me into the world, even so have I also sent them into the world.
John17:19 And for their sakes I sanctify myself, that they also might be sanctified through the truth.
John17:20 Neither pray I for these alone, but for them also which shall believe on me through their word;
John17:21 That they all may be one; as thou, Father, art in me, and I in thee, that they also may be one in us: that the world may believe that thou hast sent me.
John17:22 And the glory which thou gavest me I have given them; that they may be one, even as we are one:
John17:23 I in them, and thou in me, that they may be made perfect in one; and that the world may know that thou hast sent me, and hast loved them, as thou hast loved me.
John17:24 Father, I will that they also, whom thou hast given me, be with me where I am; that they may behold my glory, which thou hast given me: for thou lovedst me before the foundation of the world.
John17:25 O righteous Father, the world hath not known thee: but I have known thee, and these have known that thou hast sent me.
John17:26 And I have declared unto them thy name, and will declare it: that the love wherewith thou hast loved me may be in them, and I in them.
John18:1 When Jesus had spoken these words, he went forth with his disciples over the brook Cedron, where was a garden, into the which he entered, and his disciples.
John18:2 And Judas also, which betrayed him, knew the place: for Jesus ofttimes resorted thither with his disciples.
John18:3 Judas then, having received a band of men and officers from the chief priests and Pharisees, cometh thither with lanterns and torches and weapons.
John18:4 Jesus therefore, knowing all things that should come upon him, went forth, and said unto them, Whom seek ye?
John18:5 They answered him, Jesus of Nazareth. Jesus saith unto them, I am he. And Judas also, which betrayed him, stood with them.
John18:6 As soon then as he had said unto them, I am he, they went backward, and fell to the ground.
John18:7 Then asked he them again, Whom seek ye? And they said, Jesus of Nazareth.
John18:8 Jesus answered, I have told you that I am he: if therefore ye seek me, let these go their way:
John18:9 That the saying might be fulfilled, which he spake, Of them which thou gavest me have I lost none.
John18:10 Then Simon Peter having a sword drew it, and smote the high priest's servant, and cut off his right ear. The servant's name was Malchus.
John18:11 Then said Jesus unto Peter, Put up thy sword into the sheath: the cup which my Father hath given me, shall I not drink it?
John18:12 Then the band and the captain and officers of the Jews took Jesus, and bound him,
John18:13 And led him away to Annas first; for he was father in law to Caiaphas, which was the high priest that same year.
John18:14 Now Caiaphas was he, which gave counsel to the Jews, that it was expedient that one man should die for the people.
John18:15 And Simon Peter followed Jesus, and so did another disciple: that disciple was known unto the high priest, and went in with Jesus into the palace of the high priest.
John18:16 But Peter stood at the door without. Then went out that other disciple, which was known unto the high priest, and spake unto her that kept the door, and brought in Peter.
John18:17 Then saith the damsel that kept the door unto Peter, Art not thou also one of this man's disciples? He saith, I am not.
John18:18 And the servants and officers stood there, who had made a fire of coals; for it was cold: and they warmed themselves: and Peter stood with them, and warmed himself.
John18:19 The high priest then asked Jesus of his disciples, and of his doctrine.
John18:20 Jesus answered him, I spake openly to the world; I ever taught in the synagogue, and in the temple, whither the Jews always resort; and in secret have I said nothing.
John18:21 Why askest thou me? ask them which heard me, what I have said unto them: behold, they know what I said.
John18:22 And when he had thus spoken, one of the officers which stood by struck Jesus with the palm of his hand, saying, Answerest thou the high priest so?
John18:23 Jesus answered him, If I have spoken evil, bear witness of the evil: but if well, why smitest thou me?
John18:24 Now Annas had sent him bound unto Caiaphas the high priest.
John18:25 And Simon Peter stood and warmed himself. They said therefore unto him, Art not thou also one of his disciples? He denied it, and said, I am not.
John18:26 One of the servants of the high priest, being his kinsman whose ear Peter cut off, saith, Did not I see thee in the garden with him?
John18:27 Peter then denied again: and immediately the cock crew.
John18:28 Then led they Jesus from Caiaphas unto the hall of judgment: and it was early; and they themselves went not into the judgment hall, lest they should be defiled; but that they might eat the passover.
John18:29 Pilate then went out unto them, and said, What accusation bring ye against this man?
John18:30 They answered and said unto him, If he were not a malefactor, we would not have delivered him up unto thee.
John18:31 Then said Pilate unto them, Take ye him, and judge him according to your law. The Jews therefore said unto him, It is not lawful for us to put any man to death:
John18:32 That the saying of Jesus might be fulfilled, which he spake, signifying what death he should die.
John18:33 Then Pilate entered into the judgment hall again, and called Jesus, and said unto him, Art thou the King of the Jews?
John18:34 Jesus answered him, Sayest thou this thing of thyself, or did others tell it thee of me?
John18:35 Pilate answered, Am I a Jew? Thine own nation and the chief priests have delivered thee unto me: what hast thou done?
John18:36 Jesus answered, My kingdom is not of this world: if my kingdom were of this world, then would my servants fight, that I should not be delivered to the Jews: but now is my kingdom not from hence.
John18:37 Pilate therefore said unto him, Art thou a king then? Jesus answered, Thou sayest that I am a king. To this end was I born, and for this cause came I into the world, that I should bear witness unto the truth. Every one that is of the truth heareth my voice.
John18:38 Pilate saith unto him, What is truth? And when he had said this, he went out again unto the Jews, and saith unto them, I find in him no fault at all.
John18:39 But ye have a custom, that I should release unto you one at the passover: will ye therefore that I release unto you the King of the Jews?
John18:40 Then cried they all again, saying, Not this man, but Barabbas. Now Barabbas was a robber.
John19:1 Then Pilate therefore took Jesus, and scourged him.
John19:2 And the soldiers platted a crown of thorns, and put it on his head, and they put on him a purple robe,
John19:3 And said, Hail, King of the Jews! and they smote him with their hands.
John19:4 Pilate therefore went forth again, and saith unto them, Behold, I bring him forth to you, that ye may know that I find no fault in him.
John19:5 Then came Jesus forth, wearing the crown of thorns, and the purple robe. And Pilate saith unto them, Behold the man!
John19:6 When the chief priests therefore and officers saw him, they cried out, saying, Crucify him, crucify him. Pilate saith unto them, Take ye him, and crucify him: for I find no fault in him.
John19:7 The Jews answered him, We have a law, and by our law he ought to die, because he made himself the Son of God.
John19:8 When Pilate therefore heard that saying, he was the more afraid;
John19:9 And went againnto the judgment hall, and saith unto Jesus, Whence art thou? But Jesus gave him no answer.
John19:10 Then saith Pilate unto him, Speakest thou not unto me? knowest thou not that I have power to crucify thee, and have power to release thee?
John19:11 Jesus answered, Thou couldest have no power at all against me, except it were given thee from above: therefore he that delivered me unto thee hath the greater sin.
John19:12 And from thenceforth Pilate sought to release him: but the Jews cried out, saying, If thou let this man go, thou art not Caesar's friend: whosoever maketh himself a king speaketh against Caesar.
John19:13 When Pilate therefore heard that saying, he brought Jesus forth, and sat down in the judgment seat in a place that is called the Pavement, but in the Hebrew, Gabbatha.
John19:14 And it was the preparation of the passover, and about the sixth hour: and he saith unto the Jews, Behold your King!
John19:15 But they cried out, Away with him, away with him, crucify him. Pilate saith unto them, Shall I crucify your King? The chief priests answered, We have no king but Caesar.
John19:16 Then delivered he him therefore unto them to be crucified. And they took Jesus, and led him away.
John19:17 And he bearing his cross went forth into a place called the place of a skull, which is called in the Hebrew Golgotha:
John19:18 Where they crucified him, and two other with him, on either side one, and Jesus in the midst.
John19:19 And Pilate wrote a title, and put it on the cross. And the writing was, JESUS OF NAZARETH THE KING OF THE JEWS.
John19:20 This title then read many of the Jews: for the place where Jesus was crucified was nigh to the city: and it was written in Hebrew, and Greek, and Latin.
John19:21 Then said the chief priests of the Jews to Pilate, Write not, The King of the Jews; but that he said, I am King of the Jews.
John19:22 Pilate answered, What I have written I have written.
John19:23 Then the soldiers, when they had crucified Jesus, took his garments, and made four parts, to every soldier a part; and also his coat: now the coat was without seam, woven from the top throughout.
John19:24 They said therefore among themselves, Let us not rend it, but cast lots for it, whose it shall be: that the scripture might be fulfilled, which saith, They parted my raiment among them, and for my vesture they did cast lots. These things therefore the soldiers did.
John19:25 Now there stood by the cross of Jesus his mother, and his mother's sister, Mary the wife of Cleophas, and Mary Magdalene.
John19:26 When Jesus therefore saw his mother, and the disciple standing by, whom he loved, he saith unto his mother, Woman, behold thy son!
John19:27 Then saith he to the disciple, Behold thy mother! And from that hour that disciple took her unto his own home.
John19:28 After this, Jesus knowing that all things were now accomplished, that the scripture might be fulfilled, saith, I thirst.
John19:29 Now there was set a vessel full of vinegar: and they filled a spunge with vinegar, and put it upon hyssop, and put it to his mouth.
John19:30 When Jesus therefore had received the vinegar, he said, It is finished: and he bowed his head, and gave up the ghost.
John19:31 The Jews therefore, because it was the preparation, that the bodies should not remain upon the cross on the sabbath day, (for that sabbath day was an high day,) besought Pilate that their legs might be broken, and that they might be taken away.
John19:32 Then came the soldiers, and brake the legs of the first, and of the other which was crucified with him.
John19:33 But when they came to Jesus, and saw that he was dead already, they brake not his legs:
John19:34 But one of the soldiers with a spear pierced his side, and forthwith came there out blood and water.
John19:35 And he that saw it bare record, and his record is true: and he knoweth that he saith true, that ye might believe.
John19:36 For these things were done, that the scripture should be fulfilled, A bone of him shall not be broken.
John19:37 And again another scripture saith, They shall look on him whom they pierced.
John19:38 And after this Joseph of Arimathaea, being a disciple of Jesus, but secretly for fear of the Jews, besought Pilate that he might take away the body of Jesus: and Pilate gave him leave. He came therefore, and took the body of Jesus.
John19:39 And there came also Nicodemus, which at the first came to Jesus by night, and brought a mixture of myrrh and aloes, about an hundred pound weight.
John19:40 Then took they the body of Jesus, and wound it in linen clothes with the spices, as the manner of the Jews is to bury.
John19:41 Now in the place where he was crucified there was a garden; and in the garden a new sepulchre, wherein was never man yet laid.
John19:42 There laid they Jesus therefore because of the Jews' preparation day; for the sepulchre was nigh at hand.
John20:1 The first day of the week cometh Mary Magdalene early, when it was yet dark, unto the sepulchre, and seeth the stone taken away from the sepulchre.
John20:2 Then she runneth, and cometh to Simon Peter, and to the other disciple, whom Jesus loved, and saith unto them, They have taken away the LORD out of the sepulchre, and we know not where they have laid him.
John20:3 Peter therefore went forth, and that other disciple, and came to the sepulchre.
John20:4 So they ran both together: and the other disciple did outrun Peter, and came first to the sepulchre.
John20:5 And he stooping down, and looking in, saw the linen clothes lying; yet went he not in.
John20:6 Then cometh Simon Peter following him, and went into the sepulchre, and seeth the linen clothes lie,
John20:7 And the napkin, that was about his head, not lying with the linen clothes, but wrapped together in a place by itself.
John20:8 Then went in also that other disciple, which came first to the sepulchre, and he saw, and believed.
John20:9 For as yet they knew not the scripture, that he must rise again from the dead.
John20:10 Then the disciples went away again unto their own home.
John20:11 But Mary stood without at the sepulchre weeping: and as she wept, she stooped down, and looked into the sepulchre,
John20:12 And seeth two angels in white sitting, the one at the head, and the other at the feet, where the body of Jesus had lain.
John20:13 And they say unto her, Woman, why weepest thou? She saith unto them, Because they have taken away my LORD, and I know not where they have laid him.
John20:14 And when she had thus said, she turned herself back, and saw Jesus standing, and knew not that it was Jesus.
John20:15 Jesus saith unto her, Woman, why weepest thou? whom seekest thou? She, supposing him to be the gardener, saith unto him, Sir, if thou have borne him hence, tell me where thou hast laid him, and I will take him away.
John20:16 Jesus saith unto her, Mary. She turned herself, and saith unto him, Rabboni; which is to say, Master.
John20:17 Jesus saith unto her, Touch me not; for I am not yet ascended to my Father: but go to my brethren, and say unto them, I ascend unto my Father, and your Father; and to my God, and your God.
John20:18 Mary Magdalene came and told the disciples that she had seen the LORD, and that he had spoken these things unto her.
John20:19 Then the same day at evening, being the first day of the week, when the doors were shut where the disciples were assembled for fear of the Jews, came Jesus and stood in the midst, and saith unto them, Peace be unto you.
John20:20 And when he had so said, he shewed unto them his hands and his side. Then were the disciples glad, when they saw the LORD.
John20:21 Then said Jesus to them again, Peace be unto you: as my Father hath sent me, even so send I you.
John20:22 And when he had said this, he breathed on them, and saith unto them, Receive ye the Holy Ghost:
John20:23 Whose soever sins ye remit, they are remitted unto them; and whose soever sins ye retain, they are retained.
John20:24 But Thomas, one of the twelve, called Didymus, was not with them when Jesus came.
John20:25 The other disciples therefore said unto him, We have seen the LORD. But he said unto them, Except I shall see in his hands the print of the nai, and put my finger into the print of the nails, and thrust my hand into his side, I will not believe.
John20:26 And after eight days again his disciples were within, and Thomas with them: then came Jesus, the doors being shut, and stood in the midst, and said, Peace be unto you.
John20:27 Then saith he to Thomas, Reach hither thy finger, and behold my hands; and reach hither thy hand, and thrust it into my side: and be not faithless, but believing.
John20:28 And Thomas answered and said unto him, My LORD and my God.
John20:29 Jesus saith unto him, Thomas, because thou hast seen me, thou hast believed: blessed are they that have not seen, and yet have believed.
John20:30 And many other signs truly did Jesus in the presence of his disciples, which are not written in this book:
John20:31 But these are written, that ye might believe that Jesus is the Christ, the Son of God; and that believing ye might have life through his name.
John21:1 After these things Jesus shewed himself again to the disciples at the sea of Tiberias; and on this wise shewed he himself.
John21:2 There were together Simon Peter, and Thomas called Didymus, and Nathanael of Cana in Galilee, and the sons of Zebedee, and two other of his disciples.
John21:3 Simon Peter saith unto them, I go a fishing. They say unto him, We also go with thee. They went forth, and entered into a ship immediately; and that night they caught nothing.
John21:4 But when the morning was now come, Jesus stood on the shore: but the disciples knew not that it was Jesus.
John21:5 Then Jesus saith unto them, Children, have ye any meat? They answered him, No.
John21:6 And he said unto them, Cast the net on the right side of the ship, and ye shall find. They cast therefore, and now they were not able to draw it for the multitude of fishes.
John21:7 Therefore that disciple whom Jesus loved saith unto Peter, It is the Lord. Now when Simon Peter heard that it was the Lord, he girt his fisher's coat unto him, (for he was naked,) and did cast himself into the sea.
John21:8 And the other disciples came in a little ship; (for they were not far from land, but as it were two hundred cubits,) dragging the net with fishes.
John21:9 As soon then as they were come to land, they saw a fire of coals there, and fish laid thereon, and bread.
John21:10 Jesus saith unto them, Bring of the fish which ye have now caught.
John21:11 Simon Peter went up, and drew the net to land full of great fishes, an hundred and fifty and three: and for all there were so many, yet was not the net broken.
John21:12 Jesus saith unto them, Come and dine. And none of the disciples durst ask him, Who art thou? knowing that it was the Lord.
John21:13 Jesus then cometh, and taketh bread, and giveth them, and fish likewise.
John21:14 This is now the third time that Jesus shewed himself to his disciples, after that he was risen from the dead.
John21:15 So when they had dined, Jesus saith to Simon Peter, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me more than these? He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my lambs.
John21:16 He saith to him again the second time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me? He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my sheep.
John21:17 He saith unto him the third time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me? Peter was grieved because he said unto him the third time, Lovest thou me? And he said unto him, Lord, thou knowest all things; thou knowest that I love thee. Jesus saith unto him, Feed my sheep.
John21:18 Verily, verily, I say unto thee, When thou wast young, thou girdedst thyself, and walkedst whither thou wouldest: but when thou shalt be old, thou shalt stretch forth thy hands, and another shall gird thee, and carry thee whither thou wouldest not.
John21:19 This spake he, signifying by what death he should glorify God. And when he had spoken this, he saith unto him, Follow me.
John21:20 Then Peter, turning about, seeth the disciple whom Jesus loved following; which also leaned on his breast at supper, and said, Lord, which is he that betrayeth thee?
John21:21 Peter seeing him saith to Jesus, Lord, and what shall this man do?
John21:22 Jesus saith unto him, If I will that he tarry till I come, what is that to thee? follow thou me.
John21:23 Then went this saying abroad among the brethren, that that disciple should not die: yet Jesus said not unto him, He shall not die; but, If I will that he tarry till I come, what is that to thee?
John21:24 This is the disciple which testifieth of these things, and wrote these things: and we know that his testimony is true.
John21:25 And there are also many other things which Jesus did, the which, if they should be written every one, I suppose that even the world itself could not contain the books that should be written. Amen.
Acts1:1 The former treatise have I made, O Theophilus, of all that Jesus began both to do and teach,
Acts1:2 Until the day in which he was taken up, after that he through the Holy Ghost had given commandments unto the apostles whom he had chosen:
Acts1:3 To whom also he shewed himself alive after his passion by many infallible proofs, being seen of them forty days, and speaking of the things pertaining to the kingdom of God:
Acts1:4 And, being assembled together with them, commanded them that they should not depart from Jerusalem, but wait for the promise of the Father, which, saith he, ye have heard of me.
Acts1:5 For John truly baptized with water; but ye shall be baptized with the Holy Ghost not many days hence.
Acts1:6 When they therefore were come together, they asked of him, saying, Lord, wilt thou at this time restore again the kingdom to Israel?
Acts1:7 And he said unto them, It is not for you to know the times or the seasons, which the Father hath put in his own power.
Acts1:8 But ye shall receive power, after that the Holy Ghost is come upon you: and ye shall be witnesses unto me both in Jerusalem, and in all Judaea, and in Samaria, and unto the uttermost part of the earth.
Acts1:9 And when he had spoken these things, while they beheld, he was taken up; and a cloud received him out of their sight.
Acts1:10 And while they looked stedfastly toward heaven as he went up, behold, two men stood by them in white apparel;
Acts1:11 Which also said, Ye men of Galilee, why stand ye gazing up into heaven? this same Jesus, which is taken up from you into heaven, shall so come in like manner as ye have seen him go into heaven.
Acts1:12 Then returned they unto Jerusalem from the mount called Olivet, which is from Jerusalem a sabbath day's journey.
Acts1:13 And when they were come in, they went up into an upper room, where abode both Peter, and James, and John, and Andrew, Philip, and Thomas, Bartholomew, and Matthew, James the son of Alphaeus, and Simon Zelotes, and Judas the brother of James.
Acts1:14 These all continued with one accord in prayer and supplication, with the women, and Mary the mother of Jesus, and with his brethren.
Acts1:15 And in those days Peter stood up in the midst of the disciples, and said, (the number of names together were about an hundred and twenty,)
Acts1:16 Men and brethren, this scripture must needs have been fulfilled, which the Holy Ghost by the mouth of David spake before concerning Judas, which was guide to them that took Jesus.
Acts1:17 For he was numbered with us, and had obtained part of this ministry.
Acts1:18 Now this man purchased a field with the reward of iniquity; and falling headlong, he burst asunder in the midst, and all his bowels gushed out.
Acts1:19 And it was known unto all the dwellers at Jerusalem; insomuch as that field is called in their proper tongue, Aceldama, that is to say, The field of blood.
Acts1:20 For it is written in the book of Psalms, Let his habitation be desolate, and let no man dwell therein: and his bishoprick let another take.
Acts1:21 Wherefore of these men which have companied with us all the time that the Lord Jesus went in and out among us,
Acts1:22 Beginning from the baptism of John, unto that same day that he was taken up from us, must one be ordained to be a witness with us of his resurrection.
Acts1:23 And they apJoseph, and called his father Jacob to him, and all his kindred, threescore and fifteen souls.
Acts7:15 So Jacob went down into Egypt, and died, he, and our fathers,
Acts7:16 And were carried over into Sychem, and laid in the sepulchre that Abraham bought for a sum of money of the sons of Emmor the father of Sychem.
Acts7:17 But when the time of the promise drew nigh, which God had sworn to Abraham, the people grew and multiplied in Egypt,
Acts7:18 Till another king arose, which knew not Joseph.
Acts7:19 The same dealt subtilly with our kindred, and evil entreated our fathers, so that they cast out their young children, to the end they might not live.
Acts7:20 In which time Moses was born, and was exceeding fair, and nourished up in his father's house three months:
Acts7:21 And when he was cast out, Pharaoh's daughter took him up, and nourished him for her own son.
Acts7:22 And Moses was learned in all the wisdom of the Egyptians, and was mighty in words and in deeds.
Acts7:23 And when he was full forty years old, it came into his heart to visit his brethren the children of Israel.
Acts7:24 And seeing one of them suffer wrong, he defended him, and avenged him that was oppressed, and smote the Egyptian:
Acts7:25 For he supposed his brethren would have understood how that God by his hand would deliver them: but they understood not.
Acts7:26 And the next day he shewed himself unto them as they strove, and would have set them at one again, saying, Sirs, ye are brethren; why do ye wrong one to another?
Acts7:27 But he that did his neighbour wrong thrust him away, saying, Who made thee a ruler and a judge over us?
Acts7:28 Wilt thou kill me, as thou diddest the Egyptian yesterday?
Acts7:29 Then fled Moses at this saying, and was a stranger in the land of Madian, where he begat two sons.
Acts7:30 And when forty years were expired, there appeared to him in the wilderness of mount Sina an angel of the Lord in a flame of fire in a bush.
Acts7:31 When Moses saw it, he wondered at the sight: and as he drew near to behold it, the voice of the LORD came unto him,
Acts7:32 Saying, I am the God of thy fathers, the God of Abraham, and the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob. Then Moses trembled, and durst not behold.
Acts7:33 Then said the Lord to him, Put off thy shoes from thy feet: for the place where thou standest is holy ground.
Acts7:34 I have seen, I have seen the affliction of my people which is in Egypt, and I have heard their groaning, and am come down to deliver them. And now come, I will send thee into Egypt.
Acts7:35 This Moses whom they refused, saying, Who made thee a ruler and a judge? the same did God send to be a ruler and a deliverer by the hand of the angel which appeared to him in the bush.
Acts7:36 He brought them out, after that he had shewed wonders and signs in the land of Egypt, and in the Red sea, and in the wilderness forty years.
Acts7:37 This is that Moses, which said unto the children of Israel, A prophet shall the Lord your God raise up unto you of your brethren, like unto me; him shall ye hear.
Acts7:38 This is he, that was in the church in the wilderness with the angel which spake to him in the mount Sina, and with our fathers: who received the lively oracles to give unto us:
Acts7:39 To whom our fathers would not obey, but thrust him from them, and in their hearts turned back again into Egypt,
Acts7:40 Saying unto Aaron, Make us gods to go before us: for as for this Moses, which brought us out of the land of Egypt, we wot not what is become of him.
Acts7:41 And they made a calf in those days, and offered sacrifice unto the idol, and rejoiced in the works of their own hands.
Acts7:42 Then God turned, and gave them up to worship the host of heaven; as it is written in the book of the prophets, O ye house of Israel, have ye offered to me slain beasts and sacrifices by the space of forty years in the wilderness?
Acts7:43 Yea, ye took up the tabernacle of Moloch, and the star of your god Remphan, figures which ye made to worship them: and I will carry you away beyond Babylon.
Acts7:44 Our fathers had the tabernacle of witness in the wilderness, as he had appointed, speaking unto Moses, that he should make it according to the fashion that he had seen.
Acts7:45 Which also our fathers that came after brought in with Jesus into the possession of the Gentiles, whom God drave out before the face of our fathers, unto the days of David;
Acts7:46 Who found favour before God, and desired to find a tabernacle for the God of Jacob.
Acts7:47 But Solomon built him an house.
Acts7:48 Howbeit the most High dwelleth not in temples made with hands; as saith the prophet,
Acts7:49 Heaven is my throne, and earth is my footstool: what house will ye build me? saith the Lord: or what is the place of my rest?
Acts7:50 Hath not my hand made all these things?
Acts7:51 Ye stiffnecked and uncircumcised in heart and ears, ye do always resist the Holy Ghost: as your fathers did, so do ye.
Acts7:52 Which of the prophets have not your fathers persecuted? and they have slain them which shewed before of the coming of the Just One; of whom ye have been now the betrayers and murderers:
Acts7:53 Who have received the law by the disposition of angels, and have not kept it.
Acts7:54 When they heard these things, they were cut to the heart, and they gnashed on him with their teeth.
Acts7:55 But he, being full of the Holy Ghost, looked up stedfastly into heaven, and saw the glory of God, and Jesus standing on the right hand of God,
Acts7:56 And said, Behold, I see the heavens opened, and the Son of man standing on the right hand of God.
Acts7:57 Then they cried out with a loud voice, and stopped their ears, and ran upon him with one accord,
Acts7:58 And cast him out of the city, and stoned him: and the witnesses laid down their clothes at a young man's feet, whose name was Saul.
Acts7:59 And they stoned Stephen, calling upon God, and saying, Lord Jesus, receive my spirit.
Acts7:60 And he kneeled down, and cried with a loud voice, Lord, lay not this sin to their charge. And when he had said this, he fell asleep.
Acts8:1 And Saul was consenting unto his death. And at that time there was a great persecution against the church which was at Jerusalem; and they were all scattered abroad throughout the regions of Judaea and Samaria, except the apostles.
Acts8:2 And devout men carried Stephen to his burial, and made great lamentation over him.
Acts8:3 As for Saul, he made havock of the church, entering into every house, and haling men and women committed them to prison.
Acts8:4 Therefore they that were scattered abroad went every where preaching the word.
Acts8:5 Then Philip went down to the city of Samaria, and preached Christ unto them.
Acts8:6 And the people with one accord gave heed unto those things which Philip spake, hearing and seeing the miracles which he did.
Acts8:7 For unclean spirits, crying with loud voice, came out of many that were possessed with them: and many taken with palsies, and that were lame, were healed.
Acts8:8 And there was great joy in that city.
Acts8:9 But there was a certain man, called Simon, which beforetime in the same city used sorcery, and bewitched the people of Samaria, giving out that himself was some great one:
Acts8:10 To whom they all gave heed, from the least to the greatest, saying, This man is the great power of God.
Acts8:11 And to him they had regard, because that of long time he had bewitched them with sorceries.
Acts8:12 But when they believed Philip preaching the things concerning the kingdom of God, and the name of Jesus Christ, they were baptized, both men and women.
Acts8:13 Then Simon himself believed also: and when he was baptized, he continued with Philip, and wondered, beholding the miracles and signs which were done.
Acts8:14 Now when the apostles which were at Jerusalem heard that Samaria had received the word of God, they sent unto them Peter and John:
Acts8:15 Who, when they were come down, prayed for them, that they might receive the Holy Ghost:
Acts8:16 (For as yet he was fallen upon none of them: only they were baptized in the name of the Lord Jesus.)
Acts8:17 Then laid they their hands on them, and they receed the Holy Ghost.
Acts8:18 And when Simon saw that through laying on of the apostles' hands the Holy Ghost was given, he offered them money,
Acts8:19 Saying, Give me also this power, that on whomsoever I lay hands, he may receive the Holy Ghost.
Acts8:20 But Peter said unto him, Thy money perish with thee, because thou hast thought that the gift of God may be purchased with money.
Acts8:21 Thou hast neither part nor lot in this matter: for thy heart is not right in the sight of God.
Acts8:22 Repent therefore of this thy wickedness, and pray God, if perhaps the thought of thine heart may be forgiven thee.
Acts8:23 For I perceive that thou art in the gall of bitterness, and in the bond of iniquity.
Acts8:24 Then answered Simon, and said, Pray ye to the LORD for me, that none of these things which ye have spoken come upon me.
Acts8:25 And they, when they had testified and preached the word of the Lord, returned to Jerusalem, and preached the gospel in many villages of the Samaritans.
Acts8:26 And the angel of the Lord spake unto Philip, saying, Arise, and go toward the south unto the way that goeth down from Jerusalem unto Gaza, which is desert.
Acts8:27 And he arose and went: and, behold, a man of Ethiopia, an eunuch of great authority under Candace queen of the Ethiopians, who had the charge of all her treasure, and had come to Jerusalem for to worship,
Acts8:28 Was returning, and sitting in his chariot read Esaias the prophet.
Acts8:29 Then the Spirit said unto Philip, Go near, and join thyself to this chariot.
Acts8:30 And Philip ran thither to him, and heard him read the prophet Esaias, and said, Understandest thou what thou readest?
Acts8:31 And he said, How can I, except some man should guide me? And he desired Philip that he would come up and sit with him.
Acts8:32 The place of the scripture which he read was this, He was led as a sheep to the slaughter; and like a lamb dumb before his shearer, so opened he not his mouth:
Acts8:33 In his humiliation his judgment was taken away: and who shall declare his generation? for his life is taken from the earth.
Acts8:34 And the eunuch answered Philip, and said, I pray thee, of whom speaketh the prophet this? of himself, or of some other man?
Acts8:35 Then Philip opened his mouth, and began at the same scripture, and preached unto him Jesus.
Acts8:36 And as they went on their way, they came unto a certain water: and the eunuch said, See, here is water; what doth hinder me to be baptized?
Acts8:37 And Philip said, If thou believest with all thine heart, thou mayest. And he answered and said, I believe that Jesus Christ is the Son of God.
Acts8:38 And he commanded the chariot to stand still: and they went down both into the water, both Philip and the eunuch; and he baptized him.
Acts8:39 And when they were come up out of the water, the Spirit of the Lord caught away Philip, that the eunuch saw him no more: and he went on his way rejoicing.
Acts8:40 But Philip was found at Azotus: and passing through he preached in all the cities, till he came to Caesarea.
Acts9:1 And Saul, yet breathing out threatenings and slaughter against the disciples of the Lord, went unto the high priest,
Acts9:2 And desired of him letters to Damascus to the synagogues, that if he found any of this way, whether they were men or women, he might bring them bound unto Jerusalem.
Acts9:3 And as he journeyed, he came near Damascus: and suddenly there shined round about him a light from heaven:
Acts9:4 And he fell to the earth, and heard a voice saying unto him, Saul, Saul, why persecutest thou me?
Acts9:5 And he said, Who art thou, Lord? And the Lord said, I am Jesus whom thou persecutest: it is hard for thee to kick against the pricks.
Acts9:6 And he trembling and astonished said, Lord, what wilt thou have me to do? And the Lord said unto him, Arise, and go into the city, and it shall be told thee what thou must do.
Acts9:7 And the men which journeyed with him stood speechless, hearing a voice, but seeing no man.
Acts9:8 And Saul arose from the earth; and when his eyes were opened, he saw no man: but they led him by the hand, and brought him into Damascus.
Acts9:9 And he was three days without sight, and neither did eat nor drink.
Acts9:10 And there was a certain disciple at Damascus, named Ananias; and to him said the Lord in a vision, Ananias. And he said, Behold, I am here, Lord.
Acts9:11 And the Lord said unto him, Arise, and go into the street which is called Straight, and enquire in the house of Judas for one called Saul, of Tarsus: for, behold, he prayeth,
Acts9:12 And hath seen in a vision a man named Ananias coming in, and putting his hand on him, that he might receive his sight.
Acts9:13 Then Ananias answered, Lord, I have heard by many of this man, how much evil he hath done to thy saints at Jerusalem:
Acts9:14 And here he hath authority from the chief priests to bind all that call on thy name.
Acts9:15 But the Lord said unto him, Go thy way: for he is a chosen vessel unto me, to bear my name before the Gentiles, and kings, and the children of Israel:
Acts9:16 For I will shew him how great things he must suffer for my name's sake.
Acts9:17 And Ananias went his way, and entered into the house; and putting his hands on him said, Brother Saul, the Lord, even Jesus, that appeared unto thee in the way as thou camest, hath sent me, that thou mightest receive thy sight, and be filled with the Holy Ghost.
Acts9:18 And immediately there fell from his eyes as it had been scales: and he received sight forthwith, and arose, and was baptized.
Acts9:19 And when he had received meat, he was strengthened. Then was Saul certain days with the disciples which were at Damascus.
Acts9:20 And straightway he preached Christ in the synagogues, that he is the Son of God.
Acts9:21 But all that heard him were amazed, and said; Is not this he that destroyed them which called on this name in Jerusalem, and came hither for that intent, that he might bring them bound unto the chief priests?
Acts9:22 But Saul increased the more in strength, and confounded the Jews which dwelt at Damascus, proving that this is very Christ.
Acts9:23 And after that many days were fulfilled, the Jews took counsel to kill him:
Acts9:24 But their laying await was known of Saul. And they watched the gates day and night to kill him.
Acts9:25 Then the disciples took him by night, and let him down by the wall in a basket.
Acts9:26 And when Saul was come to Jerusalem, he assayed to join himself to the disciples: but they were all afraid of him, and believed not that he was a disciple.
Acts9:27 But Barnabas took him, and brought him to the apostles, and declared unto them how he had seen the Lord in the way, and that he had spoken to him, and how he had preached boldly at Damascus in the name of Jesus.
Acts9:28 And he was with them coming in and going out at Jerusalem.
Acts9:29 And he spake boldly in the name of the Lord Jesus, and disputed against the Grecians: but they went about to slay him.
Acts9:30 Which when the brethren knew, they brought him down to Caesarea, and sent him forth to Tarsus.
Acts9:31 Then had the churches rest throughout all Judaea and Galilee and Samaria, and were edified; and walking in the fear of the Lord, and in the comfort of the Holy Ghost, were multiplied.
Acts9:32 And it came to pass, as Peter passed throughout all quarters, he came down also to the saints which dwelt at Lydda.
Acts9:33 And there he found a certain man named Aeneas, which had kept his bed eight years, and was sick of the palsy.
Acts9:34 And Peter said unto him, Aeneas, Jesus Christ maketh thee whole: arise, and make thy bed. And he arose immediately.
Acts9:35 And all that dwelt at Lydda and Saron saw him, and turned to the Lord.
Acts9:36 Now there was at Joppa a certain disciple named Tabitha, which by interpretation is called Dorcas: this woman was full of good works and almsdeeds which she did.
Acts9:37 And it came to pass in those days, that she was sick, and died: whom when they had washed, they laid her in an upper chamber.
Acts9:38 And forasmuch as Lydda was nigh to Joppa, and the disciples had heard that Peter was there, they sent unto him two men, desiring him that  would not delay to come to them.
Acts9:39 Then Peter arose and went with them. When he was come, they brought him into the upper chamber: and all the widows stood by him weeping, and shewing the coats and garments which Dorcas made, while she was with them.
Acts9:40 But Peter put them all forth, and kneeled down, and prayed; and turning him to the body said, Tabitha, arise. And she opened her eyes: and when she saw Peter, she sat up.
Acts9:41 And he gave her his hand, and lifted her up, and when he had called the saints and widows, presented her alive.
Acts9:42 And it was known throughout all Joppa; and many believed in the Lord.
Acts9:43 And it came to pass, that he tarried many days in Joppa with one Simon a tanner.
Acts10:1 There was a certain man in Caesarea called Cornelius, a centurion of the band called the Italian band,
Acts10:2 A devout man, and one that feared God with all his house, which gave much alms to the people, and prayed to God alway.
Acts10:3 He saw in a vision evidently about the ninth hour of the day an angel of God coming in to him, and saying unto him, Cornelius.
Acts10:4 And when he looked on him, he was afraid, and said, What is it, Lord? And he said unto him, Thy prayers and thine alms are come up for a memorial before God.
Acts10:5 And now send men to Joppa, and call for one Simon, whose surname is Peter:
Acts10:6 He lodgeth with one Simon a tanner, whose house is by the sea side: he shall tell thee what thou oughtest to do.
Acts10:7 And when the angel which spake unto Cornelius was departed, he called two of his household servants, and a devout soldier of them that waited on him continually;
Acts10:8 And when he had declared all these things unto them, he sent them to Joppa.
Acts10:9 On the morrow, as they went on their journey, and drew nigh unto the city, Peter went up upon the housetop to pray about the sixth hour:
Acts10:10 And he became very hungry, and would have eaten: but while they made ready, he fell into a trance,
Acts10:11 And saw heaven opened, and a certain vessel descending unto him, as it had been a great sheet knit at the four corners, and let down to the earth:
Acts10:12 Wherein were all manner of fourfooted beasts of the earth, and wild beasts, and creeping things, and fowls of the air.
Acts10:13 And there came a voice to him, Rise, Peter; kill, and eat.
Acts10:14 But Peter said, Not so, Lord; for I have never eaten any thing that is common or unclean.
Acts10:15 And the voice spake unto him again the second time, What God hath cleansed, that call not thou common.
Acts10:16 This was done thrice: and the vessel was received up again into heaven.
Acts10:17 Now while Peter doubted in himself what this vision which he had seen should mean, behold, the men which were sent from Cornelius had made enquiry for Simon's house, and stood before the gate,
Acts10:18 And called, and asked whether Simon, which was surnamed Peter, were lodged there.
Acts10:19 While Peter thought on the vision, the Spirit said unto him, Behold, three men seek thee.
Acts10:20 Arise therefore, and get thee down, and go with them, doubting nothing: for I have sent them.
Acts10:21 Then Peter went down to the men which were sent unto him from Cornelius; and said, Behold, I am he whom ye seek: what is the cause wherefore ye are come?
Acts10:22 And they said, Cornelius the centurion, a just man, and one that feareth God, and of good report among all the nation of the Jews, was warned from God by an holy angel to send for thee into his house, and to hear words of thee.
Acts10:23 Then called he them in, and lodged them. And on the morrow Peter went away with them, and certain brethren from Joppa accompanied him.
Acts10:24 And the morrow after they entered into Caesarea. And Cornelius waited for them, and had called together his kinsmen and near friends.
Acts10:25 And as Peter was coming in, Cornelius met him, and fell down at his feet, and worshipped him.
Acts10:26 But Peter took him up, saying, Stand up; I myself also am a man.
Acts10:27 And as he talked with him, he went in, and found many that were come together.
Acts10:28 And he said unto them, Ye know how that it is an unlawful thing for a man that is a Jew to keep company, or come unto one of another nation; but God hath shewed me that I should not call any man common or unclean.
Acts10:29 Therefore came I unto you without gainsaying, as soon as I was sent for: I ask therefore for what intent ye have sent for me?
Acts10:30 And Cornelius said, Four days ago I was fasting until this hour; and at the ninth hour I prayed in my house, and, behold, a man stood before me in bright clothing,
Acts10:31 And said, Cornelius, thy prayer is heard, and thine alms are had in remembrance in the sight of God.
Acts10:32 Send therefore to Joppa, and call hither Simon, whose surname is Peter; he is lodged in the house of one Simon a tanner by the sea side: who, when he cometh, shall speak unto thee.
Acts10:33 Immediately therefore I sent to thee; and thou hast well done that thou art come. Now therefore are we all here present before God, to hear all things that are commanded thee of God.
Acts10:34 Then Peter opened his mouth, and said, Of a truth I perceive that God is no respecter of persons:
Acts10:35 But in every nation he that feareth him, and worketh righteousness, is accepted with him.
Acts10:36 The word which God sent unto the children of Israel, preaching peace by Jesus Christ: (he is Lord of all:)
Acts10:37 That word, I say, ye know, which was published throughout all Judaea, and began from Galilee, after the baptism which John preached;
Acts10:38 How God anointed Jesus of Nazareth with the Holy Ghost and with power: who went about doing good, and healing all that were oppressed of the devil; for God was with him.
Acts10:39 And we are witnesses of all things which he did both in the land of the Jews, and in Jerusalem; whom they slew and hanged on a tree:
Acts10:40 Him God raised up the third day, and shewed him openly;
Acts10:41 Not to all the people, but unto witnesses chosen before of God, even to us, who did eat and drink with him after he rose from the dead.
Acts10:42 And he commanded us to preach unto the people, and to testify that it is he which was ordained of God to be the Judge of quick and dead.
Acts10:43 To him give all the prophets witness, that through his name whosoever believeth in him shall receive remission of sins.
Acts10:44 While Peter yet spake these words, the Holy Ghost fell on all them which heard the word.
Acts10:45 And they of the circumcision which believed were astonished, as many as came with Peter, because that on the Gentiles also was poured out the gift of the Holy Ghost.
Acts10:46 For they heard them speak with tongues, and magnify God. Then answered Peter,
Acts10:47 Can any man forbid water, that these should not be baptized, which have received the Holy Ghost as well as we?
Acts10:48 And he commanded them to be baptized in the name of the Lord. Then prayed they him to tarry certain days.
Acts11:1 And the apostles and brethren that were in Judaea heard that the Gentiles had also received the word of God.
Acts11:2 And when Peter was come up to Jerusalem, they that were of the circumcision contended with him,
Acts11:3 Saying, Thou wentest in to men uncircumcised, and didst eat with them.
Acts11:4 But Peter rehearsed the matter from the beginning, and expounded it by order unto them, saying,
Acts11:5 I was in the city of Joppa praying: and in a trance I saw a vision, A certain vessel descend, as it had been a great sheet, let down from heaven by four corners; and it came even to me:
Acts11:6 Upon the which when I had fastened mine eyes, I considered, and saw fourfooted beasts of the earth, and wild beasts, and creeping things, and fowls of the air.
Acts11:7 And I heard a voice saying unto me, Arise, Peter; slay and eat.
Acts11:8 But I said, Not so, Lord: for nothing common or unclean hath at any time entered into my mouth.
Acts11:9 But the voice answered me again from heaven, What God hath cleansed, that call not thou common.
Acts11:10 And this was done three times: and all were drawn up again into heaven.
Acts11:11 And, behold, immediately there were t
Acts16:13 And on the sabbath we went out of the city by a river side, where prayer was wont to be made; and we sat down, and spake unto the women which resorted thither.
Acts16:14 And a certain woman named Lydia, a seller of purple, of the city of Thyatira, which worshipped God, heard us: whose heart the Lord opened, that she attended unto the things which were spoken of Paul.
Acts16:15 And when she was baptized, and her household, she besought us, saying, If ye have judged me to be faithful to the Lord, come into my house, and abide there. And she constrained us.
Acts16:16 And it came to pass, as we went to prayer, a certain damsel possessed with a spirit of divination met us, which brought her masters much gain by soothsaying:
Acts16:17 The same followed Paul and us, and cried, saying, These men are the servants of the most high God, which shew unto us the way of salvation.
Acts16:18 And this did she many days. But Paul, being grieved, turned and said to the spirit, I command thee in the name of Jesus Christ to come out of her. And he came out the same hour.
Acts16:19 And when her masters saw that the hope of their gains was gone, they caught Paul and Silas, and drew them into the marketplace unto the rulers,
Acts16:20 And brought them to the magistrates, saying, These men, being Jews, do exceedingly trouble our city,
Acts16:21 And teach customs, which are not lawful for us to receive, neither to observe, being Romans.
Acts16:22 And the multitude rose up together against them: and the magistrates rent off their clothes, and commanded to beat them.
Acts16:23 And when they had laid many stripes upon them, they cast them into prison, charging the jailor to keep them safely:
Acts16:24 Who, having received such a charge, thrust them into the inner prison, and made their feet fast in the stocks.
Acts16:25 And at midnight Paul and Silas prayed, and sang praises unto God: and the prisoners heard them.
Acts16:26 And suddenly there was a great earthquake, so that the foundations of the prison were shaken: and immediately all the doors were opened, and every one's bands were loosed.
Acts16:27 And the keeper of the prison awaking out of his sleep, and seeing the prison doors open, he drew out his sword, and would have killed himself, supposing that the prisoners had been fled.
Acts16:28 But Paul cried with a loud voice, saying, Do thyself no harm: for we are all here.
Acts16:29 Then he called for a light, and sprang in, and came trembling, and fell down before Paul and Silas,
Acts16:30 And brought them out, and said, Sirs, what must I do to be saved?
Acts16:31 And they said, Believe on the Lord Jesus Christ, and thou shalt be saved, and thy house.
Acts16:32 And they spake unto him the word of the Lord, and to all that were in his house.
Acts16:33 And he took them the same hour of the night, and washed their stripes; and was baptized, he and all his, straightway.
Acts16:34 And when he had brought them into his house, he set meat before them, and rejoiced, believing in God with all his house.
Acts16:35 And when it was day, the magistrates sent the serjeants, saying, Let those men go.
Acts16:36 And the keeper of the prison told this saying to Paul, The magistrates have sent to let you go: now therefore depart, and go in peace.
Acts16:37 But Paul said unto them, They have beaten us openly uncondemned, being Romans, and have cast us into prison; and now do they thrust us out privily? nay verily; but let them come themselves and fetch us out.
Acts16:38 And the serjeants told these words unto the magistrates: and they feared, when they heard that they were Romans.
Acts16:39 And they came and besought them, and brought them out, and desired them to depart out of the city.
Acts16:40 And they went out of the prison, and entered into the house of Lydia: and when they had seen the brethren, they comforted them, and departed.
Acts17:1 Now when they had passed through Amphipolis and Apollonia, they came to Thessalonica, where was a synagogue of the Jews:
Acts17:2 And Paul, as his manner was, went in unto them, and three sabbath days reasoned with them out of the scriptures,
Acts17:3 Opening and alleging, that Christ must needs have suffered, and risen again from the dead; and that this Jesus, whom I preach unto you, is Christ.
Acts17:4 And some of them believed, and consorted with Paul and Silas; and of the devout Greeks a great multitude, and of the chief women not a few.
Acts17:5 But the Jews which believed not, moved with envy, took unto them certain lewd fellows of the baser sort, and gathered a company, and set all the city on an uproar, and assaulted the house of Jason, and sought to bring them out to the people.
Acts17:6 And when they found them not, they drew Jason and certain brethren unto the rulers of the city, crying, These that have turned the world upside down are come hither also;
Acts17:7 Whom Jason hath received: and these all do contrary to the decrees of Caesar, saying that there is another king, one Jesus.
Acts17:8 And they troubled the people and the rulers of the city, when they heard these things.
Acts17:9 And when they had taken security of Jason, and of the other, they let them go.
Acts17:10 And the brethren immediately sent away Paul and Silas by night unto Berea: who coming thither went into the synagogue of the Jews.
Acts17:11 These were more noble than those in Thessalonica, in that they received the word with all readiness of mind, and searched the scriptures daily, whether those things were so.
Acts17:12 Therefore many of them believed; also of honourable women which were Greeks, and of men, not a few.
Acts17:13 But when the Jews of Thessalonica had knowledge that the word of God was preached of Paul at Berea, they came thither also, and stirred up the people.
Acts17:14 And then immediately the brethren sent away Paul to go as it were to the sea: but Silas and Timotheus abode there still.
Acts17:15 And they that conducted Paul brought him unto Athens: and receiving a commandment unto Silas and Timotheus for to come to him with all speed, they departed.
Acts17:16 Now while Paul waited for them at Athens, his spirit was stirred in him, when he saw the city wholly given to idolatry.
Acts17:17 Therefore disputed he in the synagogue with the Jews, and with the devout persons, and in the market daily with them that met with him.
Acts17:18 Then certain philosophers of the Epicureans, and of the Stoicks, encountered him. And some said, What will this babbler say? other some, He seemeth to be a setter forth of strange gods: because he preached unto them Jesus, and the resurrection.
Acts17:19 And they took him, and brought him unto Areopagus, saying, May we know what this new doctrine, whereof thou speakest, is?
Acts17:20 For thou bringest certain strange things to our ears: we would know therefore what these things mean.
Acts17:21 (For all the Athenians and strangers which were there spent their time in nothing else, but either to tell, or to hear some new thing.)
Acts17:22 Then Paul stood in the midst of Mars' hill, and said, Ye men of Athens, I perceive that in all things ye are too superstitious.
Acts17:23 For as I passed by, and beheld your devotions, I found an altar with this inscription, TO THE UNKNOWN GOD. Whom therefore ye ignorantly worship, him declare I unto you.
Acts17:24 God that made the world and all things therein, seeing that he is Lord of heaven and earth, dwelleth not in temples made with hands;
Acts17:25 Neither is worshipped with men's hands, as though he needed any thing, seeing he giveth to all life, and breath, and all things;
Acts17:26 And hath made of one blood all nations of men for to dwell on all the face of the earth, and hath determined the times before appointed, and the bounds of their habitation;
Acts17:27 That they should seek the Lord, if haply they might feel after him, and find him, though he be not far from every one of us:
Acts17:28 For in him we live, and move, and have our being; as certain also of your own poets have said, For we are also his offspring.
Acts17:29 Forasmuch then as we are the offspring of God, we ought not to think that the Godhead is like unto gold, or silver, or stone, graveby art and man's device.
Acts17:30 And the times of this ignorance God winked at; but now commandeth all men every where to repent:
Acts17:31 Because he hath appointed a day, in the which he will judge the world in righteousness by that man whom he hath ordained; whereof he hath given assurance unto all men, in that he hath raised him from the dead.
Acts17:32 And when they heard of the resurrection of the dead, some mocked: and others said, We will hear thee again of this matter.
Acts17:33 So Paul departed from among them.
Acts17:34 Howbeit certain men clave unto him, and believed: among the which was Dionysius the Areopagite, and a woman named Damaris, and others with them.
Acts18:1 After these things Paul departed from Athens, and came to Corinth;
Acts18:2 And found a certain Jew named Aquila, born in Pontus, lately come from Italy, with his wife Priscilla; (because that Claudius had commanded all Jews to depart from Rome:) and came unto them.
Acts18:3 And because he was of the same craft, he abode with them, and wrought: for by their occupation they were tentmakers.
Acts18:4 And he reasoned in the synagogue every sabbath, and persuaded the Jews and the Greeks.
Acts18:5 And when Silas and Timotheus were come from Macedonia, Paul was pressed in the spirit, and testified to the Jews that Jesus was Christ.
Acts18:6 And when they opposed themselves, and blasphemed, he shook his raiment, and said unto them, Your blood be upon your own heads; I am clean: from henceforth I will go unto the Gentiles.
Acts18:7 And he departed thence, and entered into a certain man's house, named Justus, one that worshipped God, whose house joined hard to the synagogue.
Acts18:8 And Crispus, the chief ruler of the synagogue, believed on the Lord with all his house; and many of the Corinthians hearing believed, and were baptized.
Acts18:9 Then spake the Lord to Paul in the night by a vision, Be not afraid, but speak, and hold not thy peace:
Acts18:10 For I am with thee, and no man shall set on thee to hurt thee: for I have much people in this city.
Acts18:11 And he continued there a year and six months, teaching the word of God among them.
Acts18:12 And when Gallio was the deputy of Achaia, the Jews made insurrection with one accord against Paul, and brought him to the judgment seat,
Acts18:13 Saying, This fellow persuadeth men to worship God contrary to the law.
Acts18:14 And when Paul was now about to open his mouth, Gallio said unto the Jews, If it were a matter of wrong or wicked lewdness, O ye Jews, reason would that I should bear with you:
Acts18:15 But if it be a question of words and names, and of your law, look ye to it; for I will be no judge of such matters.
Acts18:16 And he drave them from the judgment seat.
Acts18:17 Then all the Greeks took Sosthenes, the chief ruler of the synagogue, and beat him before the judgment seat. And Gallio cared for none of those things.
Acts18:18 And Paul after this tarried there yet a good while, and then took his leave of the brethren, and sailed thence into Syria, and with him Priscilla and Aquila; having shorn his head in Cenchrea: for he had a vow.
Acts18:19 And he came to Ephesus, and left them there: but he himself entered into the synagogue, and reasoned with the Jews.
Acts18:20 When they desired him to tarry longer time with them, he consented not;
Acts18:21 But bade them farewell, saying, I must by all means keep this feast that cometh in Jerusalem: but I will return again unto you, if God will. And he sailed from Ephesus.
Acts18:22 And when he had landed at Caesarea, and gone up, and saluted the church, he went down to Antioch.
Acts18:23 And after he had spent some time there, he departed, and went over all the country of Galatia and Phrygia in order, strengthening all the disciples.
Acts18:24 And a certain Jew named Apollos, born at Alexandria, an eloquent man, and mighty in the scriptures, came to Ephesus.
Acts18:25 This man was instructed in the way of the Lord; and being fervent in the spirit, he spake and taught diligently the things of the Lord, knowing only the baptism of John.
Acts18:26 And he began to speak boldly in the synagogue: whom when Aquila and Priscilla had heard, they took him unto them, and expounded unto him the way of God more perfectly.
Acts18:27 And when he was disposed to pass into Achaia, the brethren wrote, exhorting the disciples to receive him: who, when he was come, helped them much which had believed through grace:
Acts18:28 For he mightily convinced the Jews, and that publickly, shewing by the scriptures that Jesus was Christ.
Acts19:1 And it came to pass, that, while Apollos was at Corinth, Paul having passed through the upper coasts came to Ephesus: and finding certain disciples,
Acts19:2 He said unto them, Have ye received the Holy Ghost since ye believed? And they said unto him, We have not so much as heard whether there be any Holy Ghost.
Acts19:3 And he said unto them, Unto what then were ye baptized? And they said, Unto John's baptism.
Acts19:4 Then said Paul, John verily baptized with the baptism of repentance, saying unto the people, that they should believe on him which should come after him, that is, on Christ Jesus.
Acts19:5 When they heard this, they were baptized in the name of the Lord Jesus.
Acts19:6 And when Paul had laid his hands upon them, the Holy Ghost came on them; and they spake with tongues, and prophesied.
Acts19:7 And all the men were about twelve.
Acts19:8 And he went into the synagogue, and spake boldly for the space of three months, disputing and persuading the things concerning the kingdom of God.
Acts19:9 But when divers were hardened, and believed not, but spake evil of that way before the multitude, he departed from them, and separated the disciples, disputing daily in the school of one Tyrannus.
Acts19:10 And this continued by the space of two years; so that all they which dwelt in Asia heard the word of the Lord Jesus, both Jews and Greeks.
Acts19:11 And God wrought special miracles by the hands of Paul:
Acts19:12 So that from his body were brought unto the sick handkerchiefs or aprons, and the diseases departed from them, and the evil spirits went out of them.
Acts19:13 Then certain of the vagabond Jews, exorcists, took upon them to call over them which had evil spirits the name of the LORD Jesus, saying, We adjure you by Jesus whom Paul preacheth.
Acts19:14 And there were seven sons of one Sceva, a Jew, and chief of the priests, which did so.
Acts19:15 And the evil spirit answered and said, Jesus I know, and Paul I know; but who are ye?
Acts19:16 And the man in whom the evil spirit was leaped on them, and overcame them, and prevailed against them, so that they fled out of that house naked and wounded.
Acts19:17 And this was known to all the Jews and Greeks also dwelling at Ephesus; and fear fell on them all, and the name of the Lord Jesus was magnified.
Acts19:18 And many that believed came, and confessed, and shewed their deeds.
Acts19:19 Many of them also which used curious arts brought their books together, and burned them before all men: and they counted the price of them, and found it fifty thousand pieces of silver.
Acts19:20 So mightily grew the word of God and prevailed.
Acts19:21 After these things were ended, Paul purposed in the spirit, when he had passed through Macedonia and Achaia, to go to Jerusalem, saying, After I have been there, I must also see Rome.
Acts19:22 So he sent into Macedonia two of them that ministered unto him, Timotheus and Erastus; but he himself stayed in Asia for a season.
Acts19:23 And the same time there arose no small stir about that way.
Acts19:24 For a certain man named Demetrius, a silversmith, which made silver shrines for Diana, brought no small gain unto the craftsmen;
Acts19:25 Whom he called together with the workmen of like occupation, and said, Sirs, ye know that by this craft we have our wealth.
Acts19:26 Moreover ye see and hear, that not alone at Ephesus, but almost throughout all Asia, this Paul hath persuaded and turned away much people, saying that they be no gods, which are made with hands:
Acts19:27 So that not only this our craft is in danger to be set at nought; but also that the tple of the great goddess Diana should be despised, and her magnificence should be destroyed, whom all Asia and the world worshippeth.
Acts19:28 And when they heard these sayings, they were full of wrath, and cried out, saying, Great is Diana of the Ephesians.
Acts19:29 And the whole city was filled with confusion: and having caught Gaius and Aristarchus, men of Macedonia, Paul's companions in travel, they rushed with one accord into the theatre.
Acts19:30 And when Paul would have entered in unto the people, the disciples suffered him not.
Acts19:31 And certain of the chief of Asia, which were his friends, sent unto him, desiring him that he would not adventure himself into the theatre.
Acts19:32 Some therefore cried one thing, and some another: for the assembly was confused; and the more part knew not wherefore they were come together.
Acts19:33 And they drew Alexander out of the multitude, the Jews putting him forward. And Alexander beckoned with the hand, and would have made his defence unto the people.
Acts19:34 But when they knew that he was a Jew, all with one voice about the space of two hours cried out, Great is Diana of the Ephesians.
Acts19:35 And when the townclerk had appeased the people, he said, Ye men of Ephesus, what man is there that knoweth not how that the city of the Ephesians is a worshipper of the great goddess Diana, and of the image which fell down from Jupiter?
Acts19:36 Seeing then that these things cannot be spoken against, ye ought to be quiet, and to do nothing rashly.
Acts19:37 For ye have brought hither these men, which are neither robbers of churches, nor yet blasphemers of your goddess.
Acts19:38 Wherefore if Demetrius, and the craftsmen which are with him, have a matter against any man, the law is open, and there are deputies: let them implead one another.
Acts19:39 But if ye enquire any thing concerning other matters, it shall be determined in a lawful assembly.
Acts19:40 For we are in danger to be called in question for this day's uproar, there being no cause whereby we may give an account of this concourse.
Acts19:41 And when he had thus spoken, he dismissed the assembly.
Acts20:1 And after the uproar was ceased, Paul called unto him the disciples, and embraced them, and departed for to go into Macedonia.
Acts20:2 And when he had gone over those parts, and had given them much exhortation, he came into Greece,
Acts20:3 And there abode three months. And when the Jews laid wait for him, as he was about to sail into Syria, he purposed to return through Macedonia.
Acts20:4 And there accompanied him into Asia Sopater of Berea; and of the Thessalonians, Aristarchus and Secundus; and Gaius of Derbe, and Timotheus; and of Asia, Tychicus and Trophimus.
Acts20:5 These going before tarried for us at Troas.
Acts20:6 And we sailed away from Philippi after the days of unleavened bread, and came unto them to Troas in five days; where we abode seven days.
Acts20:7 And upon the first day of the week, when the disciples came together to break bread, Paul preached unto them, ready to depart on the morrow; and continued his speech until midnight.
Acts20:8 And there were many lights in the upper chamber, where they were gathered together.
Acts20:9 And there sat in a window a certain young man named Eutychus, being fallen into a deep sleep: and as Paul was long preaching, he sunk down with sleep, and fell down from the third loft, and was taken up dead.
Acts20:10 And Paul went down, and fell on him, and embracing him said, Trouble not yourselves; for his life is in him.
Acts20:11 When he therefore was come up again, and had broken bread, and eaten, and talked a long while, even till break of day, so he departed.
Acts20:12 And they brought the young man alive, and were not a little comforted.
Acts20:13 And we went before to ship, and sailed unto Assos, there intending to take in Paul: for so had he appointed, minding himself to go afoot.
Acts20:14 And when he met with us at Assos, we took him in, and came to Mitylene.
Acts20:15 And we sailed thence, and came the next day over against Chios; and the next day we arrived at Samos, and tarried at Trogyllium; and the next day we came to Miletus.
Acts20:16 For Paul had determined to sail by Ephesus, because he would not spend the time in Asia: for he hasted, if it were possible for him, to be at Jerusalem the day of Pentecost.
Acts20:17 And from Miletus he sent to Ephesus, and called the elders of the church.
Acts20:18 And when they were come to him, he said unto them, Ye know, from the first day that I came into Asia, after what manner I have been with you at all seasons,
Acts20:19 Serving the LORD with all humility of mind, and with many tears, and temptations, which befell me by the lying in wait of the Jews:
Acts20:20 And how I kept back nothing that was profitable unto you, but have shewed you, and have taught you publickly, and from house to house,
Acts20:21 Testifying both to the Jews, and also to the Greeks, repentance toward God, and faith toward our Lord Jesus Christ.
Acts20:22 And now, behold, I go bound in the spirit unto Jerusalem, not knowing the things that shall befall me there:
Acts20:23 Save that the Holy Ghost witnesseth in every city, saying that bonds and afflictions abide me.
Acts20:24 But none of these things move me, neither count I my life dear unto myself, so that I might finish my course with joy, and the ministry, which I have received of the Lord Jesus, to testify the gospel of the grace of God.
Acts20:25 And now, behold, I know that ye all, among whom I have gone preaching the kingdom of God, shall see my face no more.
Acts20:26 Wherefore I take you to record this day, that I am pure from the blood of all men.
Acts20:27 For I have not shunned to declare unto you all the counsel of God.
Acts20:28 Take heed therefore unto yourselves, and to all the flock, over the which the Holy Ghost hath made you overseers, to feed the church of God, which he hath purchased with his own blood.
Acts20:29 For I know this, that after my departing shall grievous wolves enter in among you, not sparing the flock.
Acts20:30 Also of your own selves shall men arise, speaking perverse things, to draw away disciples after them.
Acts20:31 Therefore watch, and remember, that by the space of three years I ceased not to warn every one night and day with tears.
Acts20:32 And now, brethren, I commend you to God, and to the word of his grace, which is able to build you up, and to give you an inheritance among all them which are sanctified.
Acts20:33 I have coveted no man's silver, or gold, or apparel.
Acts20:34 Yea, ye yourselves know, that these hands have ministered unto my necessities, and to them that were with me.
Acts20:35 I have shewed you all things, how that so labouring ye ought to support the weak, and to remember the words of the Lord Jesus, how he said, It is more blessed to give than to receive.
Acts20:36 And when he had thus spoken, he kneeled down, and prayed with them all.
Acts20:37 And they all wept sore, and fell on Paul's neck, and kissed him,
Acts20:38 Sorrowing most of all for the words which he spake, that they should see his face no more. And they accompanied him unto the ship.
Acts21:1 And it came to pass, that after we were gotten from them, and had launched, we came with a straight course unto Coos, and the day following unto Rhodes, and from thence unto Patara:
Acts21:2 And finding a ship sailing over unto Phenicia, we went aboard, and set forth.
Acts21:3 Now when we had discovered Cyprus, we left it on the left hand, and sailed into Syria, and landed at Tyre: for there the ship was to unlade her burden.
Acts21:4 And finding disciples, we tarried there seven days: who said to Paul through the Spirit, that he should not go up to Jerusalem.
Acts21:5 And when we had accomplished those days, we departed and went our way; and they all brought us on our way, with wives and children, till we were out of the city: and we kneeled down on the shore, and prayed.
Acts21:6 And when we had taken our leave one of another, we took ship; and they returned home again.
Acts21:7 And when we had finished our course from Tyre, we came to Ptolemais, and saluted the brethren, and, Lord? And he said, I am Jesus whom thou persecutest.
Acts26:16 But rise, and stand upon thy feet: for I have appeared unto thee for this purpose, to make thee a minister and a witness both of these things which thou hast seen, and of those things in the which I will appear unto thee;
Acts26:17 Delivering thee from the people, and from the Gentiles, unto whom now I send thee,
Acts26:18 To open their eyes, and to turn them from darkness to light, and from the power of Satan unto God, that they may receive forgiveness of sins, and inheritance among them which are sanctified by faith that is in me.
Acts26:19 Whereupon, O king Agrippa, I was not disobedient unto the heavenly vision:
Acts26:20 But shewed first unto them of Damascus, and at Jerusalem, and throughout all the coasts of Judaea, and then to the Gentiles, that they should repent and turn to God, and do works meet for repentance.
Acts26:21 For these causes the Jews caught me in the temple, and went about to kill me.
Acts26:22 Having therefore obtained help of God, I continue unto this day, witnessing both to small and great, saying none other things than those which the prophets and Moses did say should come:
Acts26:23 That Christ should suffer, and that he should be the first that should rise from the dead, and should shew light unto the people, and to the Gentiles.
Acts26:24 And as he thus spake for himself, Festus said with a loud voice, Paul, thou art beside thyself; much learning doth make thee mad.
Acts26:25 But he said, I am not mad, most noble Festus; but speak forth the words of truth and soberness.
Acts26:26 For the king knoweth of these things, before whom also I speak freely: for I am persuaded that none of these things are hidden from him; for this thing was not done in a corner.
Acts26:27 King Agrippa, believest thou the prophets? I know that thou believest.
Acts26:28 Then Agrippa said unto Paul, Almost thou persuadest me to be a Christian.
Acts26:29 And Paul said, I would to God, that not only thou, but also all that hear me this day, were both almost, and altogether such as I am, except these bonds.
Acts26:30 And when he had thus spoken, the king rose up, and the governor, and Bernice, and they that sat with them:
Acts26:31 And when they were gone aside, they talked between themselves, saying, This man doeth nothing worthy of death or of bonds.
Acts26:32 Then said Agrippa unto Festus, This man might have been set at liberty, if he had not appealed unto Caesar.
Acts27:1 And when it was determined that we should sail into Italy, they delivered Paul and certain other prisoners unto one named Julius, a centurion of Augustus' band.
Acts27:2 And entering into a ship of Adramyttium, we launched, meaning to sail by the coasts of Asia; one Aristarchus, a Macedonian of Thessalonica, being with us.
Acts27:3 And the next day we touched at Sidon. And Julius courteously entreated Paul, and gave him liberty to go unto his friends to refresh himself.
Acts27:4 And when we had launched from thence, we sailed under Cyprus, because the winds were contrary.
Acts27:5 And when we had sailed over the sea of Cilicia and Pamphylia, we came to Myra, a city of Lycia.
Acts27:6 And there the centurion found a ship of Alexandria sailing into Italy; and he put us therein.
Acts27:7 And when we had sailed slowly many days, and scarce were come over against Cnidus, the wind not suffering us, we sailed under Crete, over against Salmone;
Acts27:8 And, hardly passing it, came unto a place which is called The fair havens; nigh whereunto was the city of Lasea.
Acts27:9 Now when much time was spent, and when sailing was now dangerous, because the fast was now already past, Paul admonished them,
Acts27:10 And said unto them, Sirs, I perceive that this voyage will be with hurt and much damage, not only of the lading and ship, but also of our lives.
Acts27:11 Nevertheless the centurion believed the master and the owner of the ship, more than those things which were spoken by Paul.
Acts27:12 And because the haven was not commodious to winter in, the more part advised to depart thence also, if by any means they might attain to Phenice, and there to winter; which is an haven of Crete, and lieth toward the south west and north west.
Acts27:13 And when the south wind blew softly, supposing that they had obtained their purpose, loosing thence, they sailed close by Crete.
Acts27:14 But not long after there arose against it a tempestuous wind, called Euroclydon.
Acts27:15 And when the ship was caught, and could not bear up into the wind, we let her drive.
Acts27:16 And running under a certain island which is called Clauda, we had much work to come by the boat:
Acts27:17 Which when they had taken up, they used helps, undergirding the ship; and, fearing lest they should fall into the quicksands, strake sail, and so were driven.
Acts27:18 And we being exceedingly tossed with a tempest, the next day they lightened the ship;
Acts27:19 And the third day we cast out with our own hands the tackling of the ship.
Acts27:20 And when neither sun nor stars in many days appeared, and no small tempest lay on us, all hope that we should be saved was then taken away.
Acts27:21 But after long abstinence Paul stood forth in the midst of them, and said, Sirs, ye should have hearkened unto me, and not have loosed from Crete, and to have gained this harm and loss.
Acts27:22 And now I exhort you to be of good cheer: for there shall be no loss of any man's life among you, but of the ship.
Acts27:23 For there stood by me this night the angel of God, whose I am, and whom I serve,
Acts27:24 Saying, Fear not, Paul; thou must be brought before Caesar: and, lo, God hath given thee all them that sail with thee.
Acts27:25 Wherefore, sirs, be of good cheer: for I believe God, that it shall be even as it was told me.
Acts27:26 Howbeit we must be cast upon a certain island.
Acts27:27 But when the fourteenth night was come, as we were driven up and down in Adria, about midnight the shipmen deemed that they drew near to some country;
Acts27:28 And sounded, and found it twenty fathoms: and when they had gone a little further, they sounded again, and found it fifteen fathoms.
Acts27:29 Then fearing lest we should have fallen upon rocks, they cast four anchors out of the stern, and wished for the day.
Acts27:30 And as the shipmen were about to flee out of the ship, when they had let down the boat into the sea, under colour as though they would have cast anchors out of the foreship,
Acts27:31 Paul said to the centurion and to the soldiers, Except these abide in the ship, ye cannot be saved.
Acts27:32 Then the soldiers cut off the ropes of the boat, and let her fall off.
Acts27:33 And while the day was coming on, Paul besought them all to take meat, saying, This day is the fourteenth day that ye have tarried and continued fasting, having taken nothing.
Acts27:34 Wherefore I pray you to take some meat: for this is for your health: for there shall not an hair fall from the head of any of you.
Acts27:35 And when he had thus spoken, he took bread, and gave thanks to God in presence of them all: and when he had broken it, he began to eat.
Acts27:36 Then were they all of good cheer, and they also took some meat.
Acts27:37 And we were in all in the ship two hundred threescore and sixteen souls.
Acts27:38 And when they had eaten enough, they lightened the ship, and cast out the wheat into the sea.
Acts27:39 And when it was day, they knew not the land: but they discovered a certain creek with a shore, into the which they were minded, if it were possible, to thrust in the ship.
Acts27:40 And when they had taken up the anchors, they committed themselves unto the sea, and loosed the rudder bands, and hoised up the mainsail to the wind, and made toward shore.
Acts27:41 And falling into a place where two seas met, they ran the ship aground; and the forepart stuck fast, and remained unmoveable, but the hinder part was broken with the violence of the waves.
Acts27:42 And the soldiers' counsel was to kill the prisoners, lest any of them should swim out, and escape.
Acts27:43 But the centurion, willing to save Paul, kept them from their purpose; and commanded that they whi could swim should cast themselves first into the sea, and get to land:
Acts27:44 And the rest, some on boards, and some on broken pieces of the ship. And so it came to pass, that they escaped all safe to land.
Acts28:1 And when they were escaped, then they knew that the island was called Melita.
Acts28:2 And the barbarous people shewed us no little kindness: for they kindled a fire, and received us every one, because of the present rain, and because of the cold.
Acts28:3 And when Paul had gathered a bundle of sticks, and laid them on the fire, there came a viper out of the heat, and fastened on his hand.
Acts28:4 And when the barbarians saw the venomous beast hang on his hand, they said among themselves, No doubt this man is a murderer, whom, though he hath escaped the sea, yet vengeance suffereth not to live.
Acts28:5 And he shook off the beast into the fire, and felt no harm.
Acts28:6 Howbeit they looked when he should have swollen, or fallen down dead suddenly: but after they had looked a great while, and saw no harm come to him, they changed their minds, and said that he was a god.
Acts28:7 In the same quarters were possessions of the chief man of the island, whose name was Publius; who received us, and lodged us three days courteously.
Acts28:8 And it came to pass, that the father of Publius lay sick of a fever and of a bloody flux: to whom Paul entered in, and prayed, and laid his hands on him, and healed him.
Acts28:9 So when this was done, others also, which had diseases in the island, came, and were healed:
Acts28:10 Who also honoured us with many honours; and when we departed, they laded us with such things as were necessary.
Acts28:11 And after three months we departed in a ship of Alexandria, which had wintered in the isle, whose sign was Castor and Pollux.
Acts28:12 And landing at Syracuse, we tarried there three days.
Acts28:13 And from thence we fetched a compass, and came to Rhegium: and after one day the south wind blew, and we came the next day to Puteoli:
Acts28:14 Where we found brethren, and were desired to tarry with them seven days: and so we went toward Rome.
Acts28:15 And from thence, when the brethren heard of us, they came to meet us as far as Appii forum, and The three taverns: whom when Paul saw, he thanked God, and took courage.
Acts28:16 And when we came to Rome, the centurion delivered the prisoners to the captain of the guard: but Paul was suffered to dwell by himself with a soldier that kept him.
Acts28:17 And it came to pass, that after three days Paul called the chief of the Jews together: and when they were come together, he said unto them, Men and brethren, though I have committed nothing against the people, or customs of our fathers, yet was I delivered prisoner from Jerusalem into the hands of the Romans.
Acts28:18 Who, when they had examined me, would have let me go, because there was no cause of death in me.
Acts28:19 But when the Jews spake against it, I was constrained to appeal unto Caesar; not that I had ought to accuse my nation of.
Acts28:20 For this cause therefore have I called for you, to see you, and to speak with you: because that for the hope of Israel I am bound with this chain.
Acts28:21 And they said unto him, We neither received letters out of Judaea concerning thee, neither any of the brethren that came shewed or spake any harm of thee.
Acts28:22 But we desire to hear of thee what thou thinkest: for as concerning this sect, we know that every where it is spoken against.
Acts28:23 And when they had appointed him a day, there came many to him into his lodging; to whom he expounded and testified the kingdom of God, persuading them concerning Jesus, both out of the law of Moses, and out of the prophets, from morning till evening.
Acts28:24 And some believed the things which were spoken, and some believed not.
Acts28:25 And when they agreed not among themselves, they departed, after that Paul had spoken one word, Well spake the Holy Ghost by Esaias the prophet unto our fathers,
Acts28:26 Saying, Go unto this people, and say, Hearing ye shall hear, and shall not understand; and seeing ye shall see, and not perceive:
Acts28:27 For the heart of this people is waxed gross, and their ears are dull of hearing, and their eyes have they closed; lest they should see with their eyes, and hear with their ears, and understand with their heart, and should be converted, and I should heal them.
Acts28:28 Be it known therefore unto you, that the salvation of God is sent unto the Gentiles, and that they will hear it.
Acts28:29 And when he had said these words, the Jews departed, and had great reasoning among themselves.
Acts28:30 And Paul dwelt two whole years in his own hired house, and received all that came in unto him,
Acts28:31 Preaching the kingdom of God, and teaching those things which concern the Lord Jesus Christ, with all confidence, no man forbidding him.
Rom1:1 Paul, a servant of Jesus Christ, called to be an apostle, separated unto the gospel of God,
Rom1:2 (Which he had promised afore by his prophets in the holy scriptures,)
Rom1:3 Concerning his Son Jesus Christ our Lord, which was made of the seed of David according to the flesh;
Rom1:4 And declared to be the Son of God with power, according to the spirit of holiness, by the resurrection from the dead:
Rom1:5 By whom we have received grace and apostleship, for obedience to the faith among all nations, for his name:
Rom1:6 Among whom are ye also the called of Jesus Christ:
Rom1:7 To all that be in Rome, beloved of God, called to be saints: Grace to you and peace from God our Father, and the Lord Jesus Christ.
Rom1:8 First, I thank my God through Jesus Christ for you all, that your faith is spoken of throughout the whole world.
Rom1:9 For God is my witness, whom I serve with my spirit in the gospel of his Son, that without ceasing I make mention of you always in my prayers;
Rom1:10 Making request, if by any means now at length I might have a prosperous journey by the will of God to come unto you.
Rom1:11 For I long to see you, that I may impart unto you some spiritual gift, to the end ye may be established;
Rom1:12 That is, that I may be comforted together with you by the mutual faith both of you and me.
Rom1:13 Now I would not have you ignorant, brethren, that oftentimes I purposed to come unto you, (but was let hitherto,) that I might have some fruit among you also, even as among other Gentiles.
Rom1:14 I am debtor both to the Greeks, and to the Barbarians; both to the wise, and to the unwise.
Rom1:15 So, as much as in me is, I am ready to preach the gospel to you that are at Rome also.
Rom1:16 For I am not ashamed of the gospel of Christ: for it is the power of God unto salvation to every one that believeth; to the Jew first, and also to the Greek.
Rom1:17 For therein is the righteousness of God revealed from faith to faith: as it is written, The just shall live by faith.
Rom1:18 For the wrath of God is revealed from heaven against all ungodliness and unrighteousness of men, who hold the truth in unrighteousness;
Rom1:19 Because that which may be known of God is manifest in them; for God hath shewed it unto them.
Rom1:20 For the invisible things of him from the creation of the world are clearly seen, being understood by the things that are made, even his eternal power and Godhead; so that they are without excuse:
Rom1:21 Because that, when they knew God, they glorified him not as God, neither were thankful; but became vain in their imaginations, and their foolish heart was darkened.
Rom1:22 Professing themselves to be wise, they became fools,
Rom1:23 And changed the glory of the uncorruptible God into an image made like to corruptible man, and to birds, and fourfooted beasts, and creeping things.
Rom1:24 Wherefore God also gave them up to uncleanness through the lusts of their own hearts, to dishonour their own bodies between themselves:
Rom1:25 Who changed the truth of God into a lie, and worshipped and served the creature more than the Creator, who is blessed for ever. Amen.
Rom1:26 For this cause God gave them up unto vile affections: for even their women did change the natural use into that which is against nature:
Rom1:27 Anlikewise also the men, leaving the natural use of the woman, burned in their lust one toward another; men with men working that which is unseemly, and receiving in themselves that recompence of their error which was meet.
Rom1:28 And even as they did not like to retain God in their knowledge, God gave them over to a reprobate mind, to do those things which are not convenient;
Rom1:29 Being filled with all unrighteousness, fornication, wickedness, covetousness, maliciousness; full of envy, murder, debate, deceit, malignity; whisperers,
Rom1:30 Backbiters, haters of God, despiteful, proud, boasters, inventors of evil things, disobedient to parents,
Rom1:31 Without understanding, covenantbreakers, without natural affection, implacable, unmerciful:
Rom1:32 Who knowing the judgment of God, that they which commit such things are worthy of death, not only do the same, but have pleasure in them that do them.
Rom2:1 Therefore thou art inexcusable, O man, whosoever thou art that judgest: for wherein thou judgest another, thou condemnest thyself; for thou that judgest doest the same things.
Rom2:2 But we are sure that the judgment of God is according to truth against them which commit such things.
Rom2:3 And thinkest thou this, O man, that judgest them which do such things, and doest the same, that thou shalt escape the judgment of God?
Rom2:4 Or despisest thou the riches of his goodness and forbearance and longsuffering; not knowing that the goodness of God leadeth thee to repentance?
Rom2:5 But after thy hardness and impenitent heart treasurest up unto thyself wrath against the day of wrath and revelation of the righteous judgment of God;
Rom2:6 Who will render to every man according to his deeds:
Rom2:7 To them who by patient continuance in well doing seek for glory and honour and immortality, eternal life:
Rom2:8 But unto them that are contentious, and do not obey the truth, but obey unrighteousness, indignation and wrath,
Rom2:9 Tribulation and anguish, upon every soul of man that doeth evil, of the Jew first, and also of the Gentile;
Rom2:10 But glory, honour, and peace, to every man that worketh good, to the Jew first, and also to the Gentile:
Rom2:11 For there is no respect of persons with God.
Rom2:12 For as many as have sinned without law shall also perish without law: and as many as have sinned in the law shall be judged by the law;
Rom2:13 (For not the hearers of the law are just before God, but the doers of the law shall be justified.
Rom2:14 For when the Gentiles, which have not the law, do by nature the things contained in the law, these, having not the law, are a law unto themselves:
Rom2:15 Which shew the work of the law written in their hearts, their conscience also bearing witness, and their thoughts the mean while accusing or else excusing one another;)
Rom2:16 In the day when God shall judge the secrets of men by Jesus Christ according to my gospel.
Rom2:17 Behold, thou art called a Jew, and restest in the law, and makest thy boast of God,
Rom2:18 And knowest his will, and approvest the things that are more excellent, being instructed out of the law;
Rom2:19 And art confident that thou thyself art a guide of the blind, a light of them which are in darkness,
Rom2:20 An instructor of the foolish, a teacher of babes, which hast the form of knowledge and of the truth in the law.
Rom2:21 Thou therefore which teachest another, teachest thou not thyself? thou that preachest a man should not steal, dost thou steal?
Rom2:22 Thou that sayest a man should not commit adultery, dost thou commit adultery? thou that abhorrest idols, dost thou commit sacrilege?
Rom2:23 Thou that makest thy boast of the law, through breaking the law dishonourest thou God?
Rom2:24 For the name of God is blasphemed among the Gentiles through you, as it is written.
Rom2:25 For circumcision verily profiteth, if thou keep the law: but if thou be a breaker of the law, thy circumcision is made uncircumcision.
Rom2:26 Therefore if the uncircumcision keep the righteousness of the law, shall not his uncircumcision be counted for circumcision?
Rom2:27 And shall not uncircumcision which is by nature, if it fulfil the law, judge thee, who by the letter and circumcision dost transgress the law?
Rom2:28 For he is not a Jew, which is one outwardly; neither is that circumcision, which is outward in the flesh:
Rom2:29 But he is a Jew, which is one inwardly; and circumcision is that of the heart, in the spirit, and not in the letter; whose praise is not of men, but of God.
Rom3:1 What advantage then hath the Jew? or what profit is there of circumcision?
Rom3:2 Much every way: chiefly, because that unto them were committed the oracles of God.
Rom3:3 For what if some did not believe? shall their unbelief make the faith of God without effect?
Rom3:4 God forbid: yea, let God be true, but every man a liar; as it is written, That thou mightest be justified in thy sayings, and mightest overcome when thou art judged.
Rom3:5 But if our unrighteousness commend the righteousness of God, what shall we say? Is God unrighteous who taketh vengeance? (I speak as a man)
Rom3:6 God forbid: for then how shall God judge the world?
Rom3:7 For if the truth of God hath more abounded through my lie unto his glory; why yet am I also judged as a sinner?
Rom3:8 And not rather, (as we be slanderously reported, and as some affirm that we say,) Let us do evil, that good may come? whose damnation is just.
Rom3:9 What then? are we better than they? No, in no wise: for we have before proved both Jews and Gentiles, that they are all under sin;
Rom3:10 As it is written, There is none righteous, no, not one:
Rom3:11 There is none that understandeth, there is none that seeketh after God.
Rom3:12 They are all gone out of the way, they are together become unprofitable; there is none that doeth good, no, not one.
Rom3:13 Their throat is an open sepulchre; with their tongues they have used deceit; the poison of asps is under their lips:
Rom3:14 Whose mouth is full of cursing and bitterness:
Rom3:15 Their feet are swift to shed blood:
Rom3:16 Destruction and misery are in their ways:
Rom3:17 And the way of peace have they not known:
Rom3:18 There is no fear of God before their eyes.
Rom3:19 Now we know that what things soever the law saith, it saith to them who are under the law: that every mouth may be stopped, and all the world may become guilty before God.
Rom3:20 Therefore by the deeds of the law there shall no flesh be justified in his sight: for by the law is the knowledge of sin.
Rom3:21 But now the righteousness of God without the law is manifested, being witnessed by the law and the prophets;
Rom3:22 Even the righteousness of God which is by faith of Jesus Christ unto all and upon all them that believe: for there is no difference:
Rom3:23 For all have sinned, and come short of the glory of God;
Rom3:24 Being justified freely by his grace through the redemption that is in Christ Jesus:
Rom3:25 Whom God hath set forth to be a propitiation through faith in his blood, to declare his righteousness for the remission of sins that are past, through the forbearance of God;
Rom3:26 To declare, I say, at this time his righteousness: that he might be just, and the justifier of him which believeth in Jesus.
Rom3:27 Where is boasting then? It is excluded. By what law? of works? Nay: but by the law of faith.
Rom3:28 Therefore we conclude that a man is justified by faith without the deeds of the law.
Rom3:29 Is he the God of the Jews only? is he not also of the Gentiles? Yes, of the Gentiles also:
Rom3:30 Seeing it is one God, which shall justify the circumcision by faith, and uncircumcision through faith.
Rom3:31 Do we then make void the law through faith? God forbid: yea, we establish the law.
Rom4:1 What shall we say then that Abraham our father, as pertaining to the flesh, hath found?
Rom4:2 For if Abraham were justified by works, he hath whereof to glory; but not before God.
Rom4:3 For what saith the scripture? Abraham believed God, and it was counted unto him for righteousness.
Rom4:4 Now to him that worketh is the reward not reckoned of grace, but of debt.
Rom4:5 But to him that worketh not, but believeth on him that  and the diminishing of them the riches of the Gentiles; how much more their fulness?
Rom11:13 For I speak to you Gentiles, inasmuch as I am the apostle of the Gentiles, I magnify mine office:
Rom11:14 If by any means I may provoke to emulation them which are my flesh, and might save some of them.
Rom11:15 For if the casting away of them be the reconciling of the world, what shall the receiving of them be, but life from the dead?
Rom11:16 For if the firstfruit be holy, the lump is also holy: and if the root be holy, so are the branches.
Rom11:17 And if some of the branches be broken off, and thou, being a wild olive tree, wert graffed in among them, and with them partakest of the root and fatness of the olive tree;
Rom11:18 Boast not against the branches. But if thou boast, thou bearest not the root, but the root thee.
Rom11:19 Thou wilt say then, The branches were broken off, that I might be graffed in.
Rom11:20 Well; because of unbelief they were broken off, and thou standest by faith. Be not highminded, but fear:
Rom11:21 For if God spared not the natural branches, take heed lest he also spare not thee.
Rom11:22 Behold therefore the goodness and severity of God: on them which fell, severity; but toward thee, goodness, if thou continue in his goodness: otherwise thou also shalt be cut off.
Rom11:23 And they also, if they abide not still in unbelief, shall be graffed in: for God is able to graff them in again.
Rom11:24 For if thou wert cut out of the olive tree which is wild by nature, and wert graffed contrary to nature into a good olive tree: how much more shall these, which be the natural branches, be graffed into their own olive tree?
Rom11:25 For I would not, brethren, that ye should be ignorant of this mystery, lest ye should be wise in your own conceits; that blindness in part is happened to Israel, until the fulness of the Gentiles be come in.
Rom11:26 And so all Israel shall be saved: as it is written, There shall come out of Sion the Deliverer, and shall turn away ungodliness from Jacob:
Rom11:27 For this is my covenant unto them, when I shall take away their sins.
Rom11:28 As concerning the gospel, they are enemies for your sakes: but as touching the election, they are beloved for the fathers' sakes.
Rom11:29 For the gifts and calling of God are without repentance.
Rom11:30 For as ye in times past have not believed God, yet have now obtained mercy through their unbelief:
Rom11:31 Even so have these also now not believed, that through your mercy they also may obtain mercy.
Rom11:32 For God hath concluded them all in unbelief, that he might have mercy upon all.
Rom11:33 O the depth of the riches both of the wisdom and knowledge of God! how unsearchable are his judgments, and his ways past finding out!
Rom11:34 For who hath known the mind of the Lord? or who hath been his counsellor?
Rom11:35 Or who hath first given to him, and it shall be recompensed unto him again?
Rom11:36 For of him, and through him, and to him, are all things: to whom be glory for ever. Amen.
Rom12:1 I beseech you therefore, brethren, by the mercies of God, that ye present your bodies a living sacrifice, holy, acceptable unto God, which is your reasonable service.
Rom12:2 And be not conformed to this world: but be ye transformed by the renewing of your mind, that ye may prove what is that good, and acceptable, and perfect, will of God.
Rom12:3 For I say, through the grace given unto me, to every man that is among you, not to think of himself more highly than he ought to think; but to think soberly, according as God hath dealt to every man the measure of faith.
Rom12:4 For as we have many members in one body, and all members have not the same office:
Rom12:5 So we, being many, are one body in Christ, and every one members one of another.
Rom12:6 Having then gifts differing according to the grace that is given to us, whether prophecy, let us prophesy according to the proportion of faith;
Rom12:7 Or ministry, let us wait on our ministering: or he that teacheth, on teaching;
Rom12:8 Or he that exhorteth, on exhortation: he that giveth, let him do it with simplicity; he that ruleth, with diligence; he that sheweth mercy, with cheerfulness.
Rom12:9 Let love be without dissimulation. Abhor that which is evil; cleave to that which is good.
Rom12:10 Be kindly affectioned one to another with brotherly love; in honour preferring one another;
Rom12:11 Not slothful in business; fervent in spirit; serving the Lord;
Rom12:12 Rejoicing in hope; patient in tribulation; continuing instant in prayer;
Rom12:13 Distributing to the necessity of saints; given to hospitality.
Rom12:14 Bless them which persecute you: bless, and curse not.
Rom12:15 Rejoice with them that do rejoice, and weep with them that weep.
Rom12:16 Be of the same mind one toward another. Mind not high things, but condescend to men of low estate. Be not wise in your own conceits.
Rom12:17 Recompense to no man evil for evil. Provide things honest in the sight of all men.
Rom12:18 If it be possible, as much as lieth in you, live peaceably with all men.
Rom12:19 Dearly beloved, avenge not yourselves, but rather give place unto wrath: for it is written, Vengeance is mine; I will repay, saith the Lord.
Rom12:20 Therefore if thine enemy hunger, feed him; if he thirst, give him drink: for in so doing thou shalt heap coals of fire on his head.
Rom12:21 Be not overcome of evil, but overcome evil with good.
Rom13:1 Let every soul be subject unto the higher powers. For there is no power but of God: the powers that be are ordained of God.
Rom13:2 Whosoever therefore resisteth the power, resisteth the ordinance of God: and they that resist shall receive to themselves damnation.
Rom13:3 For rulers are not a terror to good works, but to the evil. Wilt thou then not be afraid of the power? do that which is good, and thou shalt have praise of the same:
Rom13:4 For he is the minister of God to thee for good. But if thou do that which is evil, be afraid; for he beareth not the sword in vain: for he is the minister of God, a revenger to execute wrath upon him that doeth evil.
Rom13:5 Wherefore ye must needs be subject, not only for wrath, but also for conscience sake.
Rom13:6 For for this cause pay ye tribute also: for they are God's ministers, attending continually upon this very thing.
Rom13:7 Render therefore to all their dues: tribute to whom tribute is due; custom to whom custom; fear to whom fear; honour to whom honour.
Rom13:8 Owe no man any thing, but to love one another: for he that loveth another hath fulfilled the law.
Rom13:9 For this, Thou shalt not commit adultery, Thou shalt not kill, Thou shalt not steal, Thou shalt not bear false witness, Thou shalt not covet; and if there be any other commandment, it is briefly comprehended in this saying, namely, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself.
Rom13:10 Love worketh no ill to his neighbour: therefore love is the fulfilling of the law.
Rom13:11 And that, knowing the time, that now it is high time to awake out of sleep: for now is our salvation nearer than when we believed.
Rom13:12 The night is far spent, the day is at hand: let us therefore cast off the works of darkness, and let us put on the armour of light.
Rom13:13 Let us walk honestly, as in the day; not in rioting and drunkenness, not in chambering and wantonness, not in strife and envying.
Rom13:14 But put ye on the Lord Jesus Christ, and make not provision for the flesh, to fulfil the lusts thereof.
Rom14:1 Him that is weak in the faith receive ye, but not to doubtful disputations.
Rom14:2 For one believeth that he may eat all things: another, who is weak, eateth herbs.
Rom14:3 Let not him that eateth despise him that eateth not; and let not him which eateth not judge him that eateth: for God hath received him.
Rom14:4 Who art thou that judgest another man's servant? to his own master he standeth or falleth. Yea, he shall be holden up: for God is able to make him stand.
Rom14:5 One man esteemeth one day above another: another esteemeth every day alike. Let every man be fully persuaded in his own mind.
Rom14:6 He that regardeth the day, regardeth it unto the Lord; and he that regardeth not the day, to the Lorhe doth not regard it. He that eateth, eateth to the Lord, for he giveth God thanks; and he that eateth not, to the Lord he eateth not, and giveth God thanks.
Rom14:7 For none of us liveth to himself, and no man dieth to himself.
Rom14:8 For whether we live, we live unto the Lord; and whether we die, we die unto the Lord: whether we live therefore, or die, we are the Lord's.
Rom14:9 For to this end Christ both died, and rose, and revived, that he might be Lord both of the dead and living.
Rom14:10 But why dost thou judge thy brother? or why dost thou set at nought thy brother? for we shall all stand before the judgment seat of Christ.
Rom14:11 For it is written, As I live, saith the Lord, every knee shall bow to me, and every tongue shall confess to God.
Rom14:12 So then every one of us shall give account of himself to God.
Rom14:13 Let us not therefore judge one another any more: but judge this rather, that no man put a stumblingblock or an occasion to fall in his brother's way.
Rom14:14 I know, and am persuaded by the Lord Jesus, that there is nothing unclean of itself: but to him that esteemeth any thing to be unclean, to him it is unclean.
Rom14:15 But if thy brother be grieved with thy meat, now walkest thou not charitably. Destroy not him with thy meat, for whom Christ died.
Rom14:16 Let not then your good be evil spoken of:
Rom14:17 For the kingdom of God is not meat and drink; but righteousness, and peace, and joy in the Holy Ghost.
Rom14:18 For he that in these things serveth Christ is acceptable to God, and approved of men.
Rom14:19 Let us therefore follow after the things which make for peace, and things wherewith one may edify another.
Rom14:20 For meat destroy not the work of God. All things indeed are pure; but it is evil for that man who eateth with offence.
Rom14:21 It is good neither to eat flesh, nor to drink wine, nor any thing whereby thy brother stumbleth, or is offended, or is made weak.
Rom14:22 Hast thou faith? have it to thyself before God. Happy is he that condemneth not himself in that thing which he alloweth.
Rom14:23 And he that doubteth is damned if he eat, because he eateth not of faith: for whatsoever is not of faith is sin.
Rom15:1 We then that are strong ought to bear the infirmities of the weak, and not to please ourselves.
Rom15:2 Let every one of us please his neighbour for his good to edification.
Rom15:3 For even Christ pleased not himself; but, as it is written, The reproaches of them that reproached thee fell on me.
Rom15:4 For whatsoever things were written aforetime were written for our learning, that we through patience and comfort of the scriptures might have hope.
Rom15:5 Now the God of patience and consolation grant you to be likeminded one toward another according to Christ Jesus:
Rom15:6 That ye may with one mind and one mouth glorify God, even the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ.
Rom15:7 Wherefore receive ye one another, as Christ also received us to the glory of God.
Rom15:8 Now I say that Jesus Christ was a minister of the circumcision for the truth of God, to confirm the promises made unto the fathers:
Rom15:9 And that the Gentiles might glorify God for his mercy; as it is written, For this cause I will confess to thee among the Gentiles, and sing unto thy name.
Rom15:10 And again he saith, Rejoice, ye Gentiles, with his people.
Rom15:11 And again, Praise the Lord, all ye Gentiles; and laud him, all ye people.
Rom15:12 And again, Esaias saith, There shall be a root of Jesse, and he that shall rise to reign over the Gentiles; in him shall the Gentiles trust.
Rom15:13 Now the God of hope fill you with all joy and peace in believing, that ye may abound in hope, through the power of the Holy Ghost.
Rom15:14 And I myself also am persuaded of you, my brethren, that ye also are full of goodness, filled with all knowledge, able also to admonish one another.
Rom15:15 Nevertheless, brethren, I have written the more boldly unto you in some sort, as putting you in mind, because of the grace that is given to me of God,
Rom15:16 That I should be the minister of Jesus Christ to the Gentiles, ministering the gospel of God, that the offering up of the Gentiles might be acceptable, being sanctified by the Holy Ghost.
Rom15:17 I have therefore whereof I may glory through Jesus Christ in those things which pertain to God.
Rom15:18 For I will not dare to speak of any of those things which Christ hath not wrought by me, to make the Gentiles obedient, by word and deed,
Rom15:19 Through mighty signs and wonders, by the power of the Spirit of God; so that from Jerusalem, and round about unto Illyricum, I have fully preached the gospel of Christ.
Rom15:20 Yea, so have I strived to preach the gospel, not where Christ was named, lest I should build upon another man's foundation:
Rom15:21 But as it is written, To whom he was not spoken of, they shall see: and they that have not heard shall understand.
Rom15:22 For which cause also I have been much hindered from coming to you.
Rom15:23 But now having no more place in these parts, and having a great desire these many years to come unto you;
Rom15:24 Whensoever I take my journey into Spain, I will come to you: for I trust to see you in my journey, and to be brought on my way thitherward by you, if first I be somewhat filled with your company.
Rom15:25 But now I go unto Jerusalem to minister unto the saints.
Rom15:26 For it hath pleased them of Macedonia and Achaia to make a certain contribution for the poor saints which are at Jerusalem.
Rom15:27 It hath pleased them verily; and their debtors they are. For if the Gentiles have been made partakers of their spiritual things, their duty is also to minister unto them in carnal things.
Rom15:28 When therefore I have performed this, and have sealed to them this fruit, I will come by you into Spain.
Rom15:29 And I am sure that, when I come unto you, I shall come in the fulness of the blessing of the gospel of Christ.
Rom15:30 Now I beseech you, brethren, for the Lord Jesus Christ's sake, and for the love of the Spirit, that ye strive together with me in your prayers to God for me;
Rom15:31 That I may be delivered from them that do not believe in Judaea; and that my service which I have for Jerusalem may be accepted of the saints;
Rom15:32 That I may come unto you with joy by the will of God, and may with you be refreshed.
Rom15:33 Now the God of peace be with you all. Amen.
Rom16:1 I commend unto you Phebe our sister, which is a servant of the church which is at Cenchrea:
Rom16:2 That ye receive her in the Lord, as becometh saints, and that ye assist her in whatsoever business she hath need of you: for she hath been a succourer of many, and of myself also.
Rom16:3 Greet Priscilla and Aquila my helpers in Christ Jesus:
Rom16:4 Who have for my life laid down their own necks: unto whom not only I give thanks, but also all the churches of the Gentiles.
Rom16:5 Likewise greet the church that is in their house. Salute my well-beloved Epaenetus, who is the firstfruits of Achaia unto Christ.
Rom16:6 Greet Mary, who bestowed much labour on us.
Rom16:7 Salute Andronicus and Junia, my kinsmen, and my fellow-prisoners, who are of note among the apostles, who also were in Christ before me.
Rom16:8 Greet Amplias my beloved in the Lord.
Rom16:9 Salute Urbane, our helper in Christ, and Stachys my beloved.
Rom16:10 Salute Apelles approved in Christ. Salute them which are of Aristobulus' household.
Rom16:11 Salute Herodion my kinsman. Greet them that be of the household of Narcissus, which are in the Lord.
Rom16:12 Salute Tryphena and Tryphosa, who labour in the Lord. Salute the beloved Persis, which laboured much in the Lord.
Rom16:13 Salute Rufus chosen in the Lord, and his mother and mine.
Rom16:14 Salute Asyncritus, Phlegon, Hermas, Patrobas, Hermes, and the brethren which are with them.
Rom16:15 Salute Philologus, and Julia, Nereus, and his sister, and Olympas, and all the saints which are with them.
Rom16:16 Salute one another with an holy kiss. The churches of Christ salute you.
Rom16:17 Now I beseech you, brethren, mark them which cause divisions and offences contrary to the doctrine which ye have learned; and avoid them.
Rom16:18or they that are such serve not our Lord Jesus Christ, but their own belly; and by good words and fair speeches deceive the hearts of the simple.
Rom16:19 For your obedience is come abroad unto all men. I am glad therefore on your behalf: but yet I would have you wise unto that which is good, and simple concerning evil.
Rom16:20 And the God of peace shall bruise Satan under your feet shortly. The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you. Amen.
Rom16:21 Timotheus my workfellow, and Lucius, and Jason, and Sosipater, my kinsmen, salute you.
Rom16:22 I Tertius, who wrote this epistle, salute you in the Lord.
Rom16:23 Gaius mine host, and of the whole church, saluteth you. Erastus the chamberlain of the city saluteth you, and Quartus a brother.
Rom16:24 The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you all. Amen.
Rom16:25 Now to him that is of power to stablish you according to my gospel, and the preaching of Jesus Christ, according to the revelation of the mystery, which was kept secret since the world began,
Rom16:26 But now is made manifest, and by the scriptures of the prophets, according to the commandment of the everlasting God, made known to all nations for the obedience of faith:
Rom16:27 To God only wise, be glory through Jesus Christ for ever. Amen.
1Cor1:1 Paul, called to be an apostle of Jesus Christ through the will of God, and Sosthenes our brother,
1Cor1:2 Unto the church of God which is at Corinth, to them that are sanctified in Christ Jesus, called to be saints, with all that in every place call upon the name of Jesus Christ our Lord, both theirs and ours:
1Cor1:3 Grace be unto you, and peace, from God our Father, and from the Lord Jesus Christ.
1Cor1:4 I thank my God always on your behalf, for the grace of God which is given you by Jesus Christ;
1Cor1:5 That in every thing ye are enriched by him, in all utterance, and in all knowledge;
1Cor1:6 Even as the testimony of Christ was confirmed in you:
1Cor1:7 So that ye come behind in no gift; waiting for the coming of our Lord Jesus Christ:
1Cor1:8 Who shall also confirm you unto the end, that ye may be blameless in the day of our Lord Jesus Christ.
1Cor1:9 God is faithful, by whom ye were called unto the fellowship of his Son Jesus Christ our Lord.
1Cor1:10 Now I beseech you, brethren, by the name of our Lord Jesus Christ, that ye all speak the same thing, and that there be no divisions among you; but that ye be perfectly joined together in the same mind and in the same judgment.
1Cor1:11 For it hath been declared unto me of you, my brethren, by them which are of the house of Chloe, that there are contentions among you.
1Cor1:12 Now this I say, that every one of you saith, I am of Paul; and I of Apollos; and I of Cephas; and I of Christ.
1Cor1:13 Is Christ divided? was Paul crucified for you? or were ye baptized in the name of Paul?
1Cor1:14 I thank God that I baptized none of you, but Crispus and Gaius;
1Cor1:15 Lest any should say that I had baptized in mine own name.
1Cor1:16 And I baptized also the household of Stephanas: besides, I know not whether I baptized any other.
1Cor1:17 For Christ sent me not to baptize, but to preach the gospel: not with wisdom of words, lest the cross of Christ should be made of none effect.
1Cor1:18 For the preaching of the cross is to them that perish foolishness; but unto us which are saved it is the power of God.
1Cor1:19 For it is written, I will destroy the wisdom of the wise, and will bring to nothing the understanding of the prudent.
1Cor1:20 Where is the wise? where is the scribe? where is the disputer of this world? hath not God made foolish the wisdom of this world?
1Cor1:21 For after that in the wisdom of God the world by wisdom knew not God, it pleased God by the foolishness of preaching to save them that believe.
1Cor1:22 For the Jews require a sign, and the Greeks seek after wisdom:
1Cor1:23 But we preach Christ crucified, unto the Jews a stumblingblock, and unto the Greeks foolishness;
1Cor1:24 But unto them which are called, both Jews and Greeks, Christ the power of God, and the wisdom of God.
1Cor1:25 Because the foolishness of God is wiser than men; and the weakness of God is stronger than men.
1Cor1:26 For ye see your calling, brethren, how that not many wise men after the flesh, not many mighty, not many noble, are called:
1Cor1:27 But God hath chosen the foolish things of the world to confound the wise; and God hath chosen the weak things of the world to confound the things which are mighty;
1Cor1:28 And base things of the world, and things which are despised, hath God chosen, yea, and things which are not, to bring to nought things that are:
1Cor1:29 That no flesh should glory in his presence.
1Cor1:30 But of him are ye in Christ Jesus, who of God is made unto us wisdom, and righteousness, and sanctification, and redemption:
1Cor1:31 That, according as it is written, He that glorieth, let him glory in the Lord.
1Cor2:1 And I, brethren, when I came to you, came not with excellency of speech or of wisdom, declaring unto you the testimony of God.
1Cor2:2 For I determined not to know any thing among you, save Jesus Christ, and him crucified.
1Cor2:3 And I was with you in weakness, and in fear, and in much trembling.
1Cor2:4 And my speech and my preaching was not with enticing words of man's wisdom, but in demonstration of the Spirit and of power:
1Cor2:5 That your faith should not stand in the wisdom of men, but in the power of God.
1Cor2:6 Howbeit we speak wisdom among them that are perfect: yet not the wisdom of this world, nor of the princes of this world, that come to nought:
1Cor2:7 But we speak the wisdom of God in a mystery, even the hidden wisdom, which God ordained before the world unto our glory:
1Cor2:8 Which none of the princes of this world knew: for had they known it, they would not have crucified the Lord of glory.
1Cor2:9 But as it is written, Eye hath not seen, nor ear heard, neither have entered into the heart of man, the things which God hath prepared for them that love him.
1Cor2:10 But God hath revealed them unto us by his Spirit: for the Spirit searcheth all things, yea, the deep things of God.
1Cor2:11 For what man knoweth the things of a man, save the spirit of man which is in him? even so the things of God knoweth no man, but the Spirit of God.
1Cor2:12 Now we have received, not the spirit of the world, but the spirit which is of God; that we might know the things that are freely given to us of God.
1Cor2:13 Which things also we speak, not in the words which man's wisdom teacheth, but which the Holy Ghost teacheth; comparing spiritual things with spiritual.
1Cor2:14 But the natural man receiveth not the things of the Spirit of God: for they are foolishness unto him: neither can he know them, because they are spiritually discerned.
1Cor2:15 But he that is spiritual judgeth all things, yet he himself is judged of no man.
1Cor2:16 For who hath known the mind of the Lord, that he may instruct him? But we have the mind of Christ.
1Cor3:1 And I, brethren, could not speak unto you as unto spiritual, but as unto carnal, even as unto babes in Christ.
1Cor3:2 I have fed you with milk, and not with meat: for hitherto ye were not able to bear it, neither yet now are ye able.
1Cor3:3 For ye are yet carnal: for whereas there is among you envying, and strife, and divisions, are ye not carnal, and walk as men?
1Cor3:4 For while one saith, I am of Paul; and another, I am of Apollos; are ye not carnal?
1Cor3:5 Who then is Paul, and who is Apollos, but ministers by whom ye believed, even as the Lord gave to every man?
1Cor3:6 I have planted, Apollos watered; but God gave the increase.
1Cor3:7 So then neither is he that planteth any thing, neither he that watereth; but God that giveth the increase.
1Cor3:8 Now he that planteth and he that watereth are one: and every man shall receive his own reward according to his own labour.
1Cor3:9 For we are labourers together with God: ye are God's husbandry, ye are God's building.
1Cor3:10 According to the grace of God which is given unto me, as a wise masterbuilder, I have laid the foundation, and another buildeth thereon. But let every man take heed how he buildeth thereupon.
1C
1Cor11:17 Now in this that I declare unto you I praise you not, that ye come together not for the better, but for the worse.
1Cor11:18 For first of all, when ye come together in the church, I hear that there be divisions among you; and I partly believe it.
1Cor11:19 For there must be also heresies among you, that they which are approved may be made manifest among you.
1Cor11:20 When ye come together therefore into one place, this is not to eat the Lord's supper.
1Cor11:21 For in eating every one taketh before other his own supper: and one is hungry, and another is drunken.
1Cor11:22 What? have ye not houses to eat and to drink in? or despise ye the church of God, and shame them that have not? What shall I say to you? shall I praise you in this? I praise you not.
1Cor11:23 For I have received of the Lord that which also I delivered unto you, That the Lord Jesus the same night in which he was betrayed took bread:
1Cor11:24 And when he had given thanks, he brake it, and said, Take, eat: this is my body, which is broken for you: this do in remembrance of me.
1Cor11:25 After the same manner also he took the cup, when he had supped, saying, This cup is the new testament in my blood: this do ye, as oft as ye drink it, in remembrance of me.
1Cor11:26 For as often as ye eat this bread, and drink this cup, ye do shew the Lord's death till he come.
1Cor11:27 Wherefore whosoever shall eat this bread, and drink this cup of the Lord, unworthily, shall be guilty of the body and blood of the Lord.
1Cor11:28 But let a man examine himself, and so let him eat of that bread, and drink of that cup.
1Cor11:29 For he that eateth and drinketh unworthily, eateth and drinketh damnation to himself, not discerning the Lord's body.
1Cor11:30 For this cause many are weak and sickly among you, and many sleep.
1Cor11:31 For if we would judge ourselves, we should not be judged.
1Cor11:32 But when we are judged, we are chastened of the Lord, that we should not be condemned with the world.
1Cor11:33 Wherefore, my brethren, when ye come together to eat, tarry one for another.
1Cor11:34 And if any man hunger, let him eat at home; that ye come not together unto condemnation. And the rest will I set in order when I come.
1Cor12:1 Now concerning spiritual gifts, brethren, I would not have you ignorant.
1Cor12:2 Ye know that ye were Gentiles, carried away unto these dumb idols, even as ye were led.
1Cor12:3 Wherefore I give you to understand, that no man speaking by the Spirit of God calleth Jesus accursed: and that no man can say that Jesus is the Lord, but by the Holy Ghost.
1Cor12:4 Now there are diversities of gifts, but the same Spirit.
1Cor12:5 And there are differences of administrations, but the same Lord.
1Cor12:6 And there are diversities of operations, but it is the same God which worketh all in all.
1Cor12:7 But the manifestation of the Spirit is given to every man to profit withal.
1Cor12:8 For to one is given by the Spirit the word of wisdom; to another the word of knowledge by the same Spirit;
1Cor12:9 To another faith by the same Spirit; to another the gifts of healing by the same Spirit;
1Cor12:10 To another the working of miracles; to another prophecy; to another discerning of spirits; to another divers kinds of tongues; to another the interpretation of tongues:
1Cor12:11 But all these worketh that one and the selfsame Spirit, dividing to every man severally as he will.
1Cor12:12 For as the body is one, and hath many members, and all the members of that one body, being many, are one body: so also is Christ.
1Cor12:13 For by one Spirit are we all baptized into one body, whether we be Jews or Gentiles, whether we be bond or free; and have been all made to drink into one Spirit.
1Cor12:14 For the body is not one member, but many.
1Cor12:15 If the foot shall say, Because I am not the hand, I am not of the body; is it therefore not of the body?
1Cor12:16 And if the ear shall say, Because I am not the eye, I am not of the body; is it therefore not of the body?
1Cor12:17 If the whole body were an eye, where were the hearing? If the whole were hearing, where were the smelling?
1Cor12:18 But now hath God set the members every one of them in the body, as it hath pleased him.
1Cor12:19 And if they were all one member, where were the body?
1Cor12:20 But now are they many members, yet but one body.
1Cor12:21 And the eye cannot say unto the hand, I have no need of thee: nor again the head to the feet, I have no need of you.
1Cor12:22 Nay, much more those members of the body, which seem to be more feeble, are necessary:
1Cor12:23 And those members of the body, which we think to be less honourable, upon these we bestow more abundant honour; and our uncomely parts have more abundant comeliness.
1Cor12:24 For our comely parts have no need: but God hath tempered the body together, having given more abundant honour to that part which lacked:
1Cor12:25 That there should be no schism in the body; but that the members should have the same care one for another.
1Cor12:26 And whether one member suffer, all the members suffer with it; or one member be honoured, all the members rejoice with it.
1Cor12:27 Now ye are the body of Christ, and members in particular.
1Cor12:28 And God hath set some in the church, first apostles, secondarily prophets, thirdly teachers, after that miracles, then gifts of healings, helps, governments, diversities of tongues.
1Cor12:29 Are all apostles? are all prophets? are all teachers? are all workers of miracles?
1Cor12:30 Have all the gifts of healing? do all speak with tongues? do all interpret?
1Cor12:31 But covet earnestly the best gifts: and yet shew I unto you a more excellent way.
1Cor13:1 Though I speak with the tongues of men and of angels, and have not charity, I am become as sounding brass, or a tinkling cymbal.
1Cor13:2 And though I have the gift of prophecy, and understand all mysteries, and all knowledge; and though I have all faith, so that I could remove mountains, and have not charity, I am nothing.
1Cor13:3 And though I bestow all my goods to feed the poor, and though I give my body to be burned, and have not charity, it profiteth me nothing.
1Cor13:4 Charity suffereth long, and is kind; charity envieth not; charity vaunteth not itself, is not puffed up,
1Cor13:5 Doth not behave itself unseemly, seeketh not her own, is not easily provoked, thinketh no evil;
1Cor13:6 Rejoiceth not in iniquity, but rejoiceth in the truth;
1Cor13:7 Beareth all things, believeth all things, hopeth all things, endureth all things.
1Cor13:8 Charity never faileth: but whether there be prophecies, they shall fail; whether there be tongues, they shall cease; whether there be knowledge, it shall vanish away.
1Cor13:9 For we know in part, and we prophesy in part.
1Cor13:10 But when that which is perfect is come, then that which is in part shall be done away.
1Cor13:11 When I was a child, I spake as a child, I understood as a child, I thought as a child: but when I became a man, I put away childish things.
1Cor13:12 For now we see through a glass, darkly; but then face to face: now I know in part; but then shall I know even as also I am known.
1Cor13:13 And now abideth faith, hope, charity, these three; but the greatest of these is charity.
1Cor14:1 Follow after charity, and desire spiritual gifts, but rather that ye may prophesy.
1Cor14:2 For he that speaketh in an unknown tongue speaketh not unto men, but unto God: for no man understandeth him; howbeit in the spirit he speaketh mysteries.
1Cor14:3 But he that prophesieth speaketh unto men to edification, and exhortation, and comfort.
1Cor14:4 He that speaketh in an unknown tongue edifieth himself; but he that prophesieth edifieth the church.
1Cor14:5 I would that ye all spake with tongues, but rather that ye prophesied: for greater is he that prophesieth than he that speaketh with tongues, except he interpret, that the church may receive edifying.
1Cor14:6 Now, brethren, if I come unto you speaking with tongues, what shall I profit you, except I shall speak to you either by revelation, or by knowledge, or by prophesying, or by doctrine?
1Cor14:7 And even things without life giving sound, whether pipe or harp, exce they give a distinction in the sounds, how shall it be known what is piped or harped?
1Cor14:8 For if the trumpet give an uncertain sound, who shall prepare himself to the battle?
1Cor14:9 So likewise ye, except ye utter by the tongue words easy to be understood, how shall it be known what is spoken? for ye shall speak into the air.
1Cor14:10 There are, it may be, so many kinds of voices in the world, and none of them is without signification.
1Cor14:11 Therefore if I know not the meaning of the voice, I shall be unto him that speaketh a barbarian, and he that speaketh shall be a barbarian unto me.
1Cor14:12 Even so ye, forasmuch as ye are zealous of spiritual gifts, seek that ye may excel to the edifying of the church.
1Cor14:13 Wherefore let him that speaketh in an unknown tongue pray that he may interpret.
1Cor14:14 For if I pray in an unknown tongue, my spirit prayeth, but my understanding is unfruitful.
1Cor14:15 What is it then? I will pray with the spirit, and I will pray with the understanding also: I will sing with the spirit, and I will sing with the understanding also.
1Cor14:16 Else when thou shalt bless with the spirit, how shall he that occupieth the room of the unlearned say Amen at thy giving of thanks, seeing he understandeth not what thou sayest?
1Cor14:17 For thou verily givest thanks well, but the other is not edified.
1Cor14:18 I thank my God, I speak with tongues more than ye all:
1Cor14:19 Yet in the church I had rather speak five words with my understanding, that by my voice I might teach others also, than ten thousand words in an unknown tongue.
1Cor14:20 Brethren, be not children in understanding: howbeit in malice be ye children, but in understanding be men.
1Cor14:21 In the law it is written, With men of other tongues and other lips will I speak unto this people; and yet for all that will they not hear me, saith the LORD.
1Cor14:22 Wherefore tongues are for a sign, not to them that believe, but to them that believe not: but prophesying serveth not for them that believe not, but for them which believe.
1Cor14:23 If therefore the whole church be come together into one place, and all speak with tongues, and there come in those that are unlearned, or unbelievers, will they not say that ye are mad?
1Cor14:24 But if all prophesy, and there come in one that believeth not, or one unlearned, he is convinced of all, he is judged of all:
1Cor14:25 And thus are the secrets of his heart made manifest; and so falling down on his face he will worship God, and report that God is in you of a truth.
1Cor14:26 How is it then, brethren? when ye come together, every one of you hath a psalm, hath a doctrine, hath a tongue, hath a revelation, hath an interpretation. Let all things be done unto edifying.
1Cor14:27 If any man speak in an unknown tongue, let it be by two, or at the most by three, and that by course; and let one interpret.
1Cor14:28 But if there be no interpreter, let him keep silence in the church; and let him speak to himself, and to God.
1Cor14:29 Let the prophets speak two or three, and let the other judge.
1Cor14:30 If any thing be revealed to another that sitteth by, let the first hold his peace.
1Cor14:31 For ye may all prophesy one by one, that all may learn, and all may be comforted.
1Cor14:32 And the spirits of the prophets are subject to the prophets.
1Cor14:33 For God is not the author of confusion, but of peace, as in all churches of the saints.
1Cor14:34 Let your women keep silence in the churches: for it is not permitted unto them to speak; but they are commanded to be under obedience, as also saith the law.
1Cor14:35 And if they will learn any thing, let them ask their husbands at home: for it is a shame for women to speak in the church.
1Cor14:36 What? came the word of God out from you? or came it unto you only?
1Cor14:37 If any man think himself to be a prophet, or spiritual, let him acknowledge that the things that I write unto you are the commandments of the Lord.
1Cor14:38 But if any man be ignorant, let him be ignorant.
1Cor14:39 Wherefore, brethren, covet to prophesy, and forbid not to speak with tongues.
1Cor14:40 Let all things be done decently and in order.
1Cor15:1 Moreover, brethren, I declare unto you the gospel which I preached unto you, which also ye have received, and wherein ye stand;
1Cor15:2 By which also ye are saved, if ye keep in memory what I preached unto you, unless ye have believed in vain.
1Cor15:3 For I delivered unto you first of all that which I also received, how that Christ died for our sins according to the scriptures;
1Cor15:4 And that he was buried, and that he rose again the third day according to the scriptures:
1Cor15:5 And that he was seen of Cephas, then of the twelve:
1Cor15:6 After that, he was seen of above five hundred brethren at once; of whom the greater part remain unto this present, but some are fallen asleep.
1Cor15:7 After that, he was seen of James; then of all the apostles.
1Cor15:8 And last of all he was seen of me also, as of one born out of due time.
1Cor15:9 For I am the least of the apostles, that am not meet to be called an apostle, because I persecuted the church of God.
1Cor15:10 But by the grace of God I am what I am: and his grace which was bestowed upon me was not in vain; but I laboured more abundantly than they all: yet not I, but the grace of God which was with me.
1Cor15:11 Therefore whether it were I or they, so we preach, and so ye believed.
1Cor15:12 Now if Christ be preached that he rose from the dead, how say some among you that there is no resurrection of the dead?
1Cor15:13 But if there be no resurrection of the dead, then is Christ not risen:
1Cor15:14 And if Christ be not risen, then is our preaching vain, and your faith is also vain.
1Cor15:15 Yea, and we are found false witnesses of God; because we have testified of God that he raised up Christ: whom he raised not up, if so be that the dead rise not.
1Cor15:16 For if the dead rise not, then is not Christ raised:
1Cor15:17 And if Christ be not raised, your faith is vain; ye are yet in your sins.
1Cor15:18 Then they also which are fallen asleep in Christ are perished.
1Cor15:19 If in this life only we have hope in Christ, we are of all men most miserable.
1Cor15:20 But now is Christ risen from the dead, and become the firstfruits of them that slept.
1Cor15:21 For since by man came death, by man came also the resurrection of the dead.
1Cor15:22 For as in Adam all die, even so in Christ shall all be made alive.
1Cor15:23 But every man in his own order: Christ the firstfruits; afterward they that are Christ's at his coming.
1Cor15:24 Then cometh the end, when he shall have delivered up the kingdom to God, even the Father; when he shall have put down all rule and all authority and power.
1Cor15:25 For he must reign, till he hath put all enemies under his feet.
1Cor15:26 The last enemy that shall be destroyed is death.
1Cor15:27 For he hath put all things under his feet. But when he saith all things are put under him, it is manifest that he is excepted, which did put all things under him.
1Cor15:28 And when all things shall be subdued unto him, then shall the Son also himself be subject unto him that put all things under him, that God may be all in all.
1Cor15:29 Else what shall they do which are baptized for the dead, if the dead rise not at all? why are they then baptized for the dead?
1Cor15:30 And why stand we in jeopardy every hour?
1Cor15:31 I protest by your rejoicing which I have in Christ Jesus our LORD, I die daily.
1Cor15:32 If after the manner of men I have fought with beasts at Ephesus, what advantageth it me, if the dead rise not? let us eat and drink; for to morrow we die.
1Cor15:33 Be not deceived: evil communications corrupt good manners.
1Cor15:34 Awake to righteousness, and sin not; for some have not the knowledge of God: I speak this to your shame.
1Cor15:35 But some man will say, How are the dead raised up? and with what body do they come?
1Cor15:36 Thou fool, that which thou sowest is not quickened, except it die:
1Cor15:37 And that which thou sowest, thou sowest not that body that shall be, but bare grain, it may chance of wheat, or of some other grain:
1Cor:38 But God giveth it a body as it hath pleased him, and to every seed his own body.
1Cor15:39 All flesh is not the same flesh: but there is one kind of flesh of men, another flesh of beasts, another of fishes, and another of birds.
1Cor15:40 There are also celestial bodies, and bodies terrestrial: but the glory of the celestial is one, and the glory of the terrestrial is another.
1Cor15:41 There is one glory of the sun, and another glory of the moon, and another glory of the stars: for one star differeth from another star in glory.
1Cor15:42 So also is the resurrection of the dead. It is sown in corruption; it is raised in incorruption:
1Cor15:43 It is sown in dishonour; it is raised in glory: it is sown in weakness; it is raised in power:
1Cor15:44 It is sown a natural body; it is raised a spiritual body. There is a natural body, and there is a spiritual body.
1Cor15:45 And so it is written, The first man Adam was made a living soul; the last Adam was made a quickening spirit.
1Cor15:46 Howbeit that was not first which is spiritual, but that which is natural; and afterward that which is spiritual.
1Cor15:47 The first man is of the earth, earthy: the second man is the Lord from heaven.
1Cor15:48 As is the earthy, such are they also that are earthy: and as is the heavenly, such are they also that are heavenly.
1Cor15:49 And as we have borne the image of the earthy, we shall also bear the image of the heavenly.
1Cor15:50 Now this I say, brethren, that flesh and blood cannot inherit the kingdom of God; neither doth corruption inherit incorruption.
1Cor15:51 Behold, I shew you a mystery; We shall not all sleep, but we shall all be changed,
1Cor15:52 In a moment, in the twinkling of an eye, at the last trump: for the trumpet shall sound, and the dead shall be raised incorruptible, and we shall be changed.
1Cor15:53 For this corruptible must put on incorruption, and this mortal must put on immortality.
1Cor15:54 So when this corruptible shall have put on incorruption, and this mortal shall have put on immortality, then shall be brought to pass the saying that is written, Death is swallowed up in victory.
1Cor15:55 O death, where is thy sting? O grave, where is thy victory?
1Cor15:56 The sting of death is sin; and the strength of sin is the law.
1Cor15:57 But thanks be to God, which giveth us the victory through our Lord Jesus Christ.
1Cor15:58 Therefore, my beloved brethren, be ye stedfast, unmoveable, always abounding in the work of the Lord, forasmuch as ye know that your labour is not in vain in the Lord.
1Cor16:1 Now concerning the collection for the saints, as I have given order to the churches of Galatia, even so do ye.
1Cor16:2 Upon the first day of the week let every one of you lay by him in store, as God hath prospered him, that there be no gatherings when I come.
1Cor16:3 And when I come, whomsoever ye shall approve by your letters, them will I send to bring your liberality unto Jerusalem.
1Cor16:4 And if it be meet that I go also, they shall go with me.
1Cor16:5 Now I will come unto you, when I shall pass through Macedonia: for I do pass through Macedonia.
1Cor16:6 And it may be that I will abide, yea, and winter with you, that ye may bring me on my journey whithersoever I go.
1Cor16:7 For I will not see you now by the way; but I trust to tarry a while with you, if the Lord permit.
1Cor16:8 But I will tarry at Ephesus until Pentecost.
1Cor16:9 For a great door and effectual is opened unto me, and there are many adversaries.
1Cor16:10 Now if Timotheus come, see that he may be with you without fear: for he worketh the work of the Lord, as I also do.
1Cor16:11 Let no man therefore despise him: but conduct him forth in peace, that he may come unto me: for I look for him with the brethren.
1Cor16:12 As touching our brother Apollos, I greatly desired him to come unto you with the brethren: but his will was not at all to come at this time; but he will come when he shall have convenient time.
1Cor16:13 Watch ye, stand fast in the faith, quit you like men, be strong.
1Cor16:14 Let all your things be done with charity.
1Cor16:15 I beseech you, brethren, (ye know the house of Stephanas, that it is the firstfruits of Achaia, and that they have addicted themselves to the ministry of the saints,)
1Cor16:16 That ye submit yourselves unto such, and to every one that helpeth with us, and laboureth.
1Cor16:17 I am glad of the coming of Stephanas and Fortunatus and Achaicus: for that which was lacking on your part they have supplied.
1Cor16:18 For they have refreshed my spirit and yours: therefore acknowledge ye them that are such.
1Cor16:19 The churches of Asia salute you. Aquila and Priscilla salute you much in the Lord, with the church that is in their house.
1Cor16:20 All the brethren greet you. Greet ye one another with an holy kiss.
1Cor16:21 The salutation of me Paul with mine own hand.
1Cor16:22 If any man love not the Lord Jesus Christ, let him be Anathema Maranatha.
1Cor16:23 The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you.
1Cor16:24 My love be with you all in Christ Jesus. Amen.
2Cor1:1 Paul, an apostle of Jesus Christ by the will of God, and Timothy our brother, unto the church of God which is at Corinth, with all the saints which are in all Achaia:
2Cor1:2 Grace be to you and peace from God our Father, and from the Lord Jesus Christ.
2Cor1:3 Blessed be God, even the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, the Father of mercies, and the God of all comfort;
2Cor1:4 Who comforteth us in all our tribulation, that we may be able to comfort them which are in any trouble, by the comfort wherewith we ourselves are comforted of God.
2Cor1:5 For as the sufferings of Christ abound in us, so our consolation also aboundeth by Christ.
2Cor1:6 And whether we be afflicted, it is for your consolation and salvation, which is effectual in the enduring of the same sufferings which we also suffer: or whether we be comforted, it is for your consolation and salvation.
2Cor1:7 And our hope of you is stedfast, knowing, that as ye are partakers of the sufferings, so shall ye be also of the consolation.
2Cor1:8 For we would not, brethren, have you ignorant of our trouble which came to us in Asia, that we were pressed out of measure, above strength, insomuch that we despaired even of life:
2Cor1:9 But we had the sentence of death in ourselves, that we should not trust in ourselves, but in God which raiseth the dead:
2Cor1:10 Who delivered us from so great a death, and doth deliver: in whom we trust that he will yet deliver us;
2Cor1:11 Ye also helping together by prayer for us, that for the gift bestowed upon us by the means of many persons thanks may be given by many on our behalf.
2Cor1:12 For our rejoicing is this, the testimony of our conscience, that in simplicity and godly sincerity, not with fleshly wisdom, but by the grace of God, we have had our conversation in the world, and more abundantly to you-ward.
2Cor1:13 For we write none other things unto you, than what ye read or acknowledge; and I trust ye shall acknowledge even to the end;
2Cor1:14 As also ye have acknowledged us in part, that we are your rejoicing, even as ye also are ours in the day of the Lord Jesus.
2Cor1:15 And in this confidence I was minded to come unto you before, that ye might have a second benefit;
2Cor1:16 And to pass by you into Macedonia, and to come again out of Macedonia unto you, and of you to be brought on my way toward Judaea.
2Cor1:17 When I therefore was thus minded, did I use lightness? or the things that I purpose, do I purpose according to the flesh, that with me there should be yea yea, and nay nay?
2Cor1:18 But as God is true, our word toward you was not yea and nay.
2Cor1:19 For the Son of God, Jesus Christ, who was preached among you by us, even by me and Silvanus and Timotheus, was not yea and nay, but in him was yea.
2Cor1:20 For all the promises of God in him are yea, and in him Amen, unto the glory of God by us.
2Cor1:21 Now he which stablisheth us with you in Christ, and hath anointed us, is God;
2Cor1:22 Who hath also sealed us, and given the earnest of the Spirit in our hearts.
2Cor1:23 Moreover I call God for a record upon my soul, that to spare you I came not as te you on the face.
2Cor11:21 I speak as concerning reproach, as though we had been weak. Howbeit whereinsoever any is bold, (I speak foolishly,) I am bold also.
2Cor11:22 Are they Hebrews? so am I. Are they Israelites? so am I. Are they the seed of Abraham? so am I.
2Cor11:23 Are they ministers of Christ? (I speak as a fool) I am more; in labours more abundant, in stripes above measure, in prisons more frequent, in deaths oft.
2Cor11:24 Of the Jews five times received I forty stripes save one.
2Cor11:25 Thrice was I beaten with rods, once was I stoned, thrice I suffered shipwreck, a night and a day I have been in the deep;
2Cor11:26 In journeyings often, in perils of waters, in perils of robbers, in perils by mine own countrymen, in perils by the heathen, in perils in the city, in perils in the wilderness, in perils in the sea, in perils among false brethren;
2Cor11:27 In weariness and painfulness, in watchings often, in hunger and thirst, in fastings often, in cold and nakedness.
2Cor11:28 Beside those things that are without, that which cometh upon me daily, the care of all the churches.
2Cor11:29 Who is weak, and I am not weak? who is offended, and I burn not?
2Cor11:30 If I must needs glory, I will glory of the things which concern mine infirmities.
2Cor11:31 The God and Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, which is blessed for evermore, knoweth that I lie not.
2Cor11:32 In Damascus the governor under Aretas the king kept the city of the Damascenes with a garrison, desirous to apprehend me:
2Cor11:33 And through a window in a basket was I let down by the wall, and escaped his hands.
2Cor12:1 It is not expedient for me doubtless to glory. I will come to visions and revelations of the Lord.
2Cor12:2 I knew a man in Christ above fourteen years ago, (whether in the body, I cannot tell; or whether out of the body, I cannot tell: God knoweth;) such an one caught up to the third heaven.
2Cor12:3 And I knew such a man, (whether in the body, or out of the body, I cannot tell: God knoweth;)
2Cor12:4 How that he was caught up into paradise, and heard unspeakable words, which it is not lawful for a man to utter.
2Cor12:5 Of such an one will I glory: yet of myself I will not glory, but in mine infirmities.
2Cor12:6 For though I would desire to glory, I shall not be a fool; for I will say the truth: but now I forbear, lest any man should think of me above that which he seeth me to be, or that he heareth of me.
2Cor12:7 And lest I should be exalted above measure through the abundance of the revelations, there was given to me a thorn in the flesh, the messenger of Satan to buffet me, lest I should be exalted above measure.
2Cor12:8 For this thing I besought the Lord thrice, that it might depart from me.
2Cor12:9 And he said unto me, My grace is sufficient for thee: for my strength is made perfect in weakness. Most gladly therefore will I rather glory in my infirmities, that the power of Christ may rest upon me.
2Cor12:10 Therefore I take pleasure in infirmities, in reproaches, in necessities, in persecutions, in distresses for Christ's sake: for when I am weak, then am I strong.
2Cor12:11 I am become a fool in glorying; ye have compelled me: for I ought to have been commended of you: for in nothing am I behind the very chiefest apostles, though I be nothing.
2Cor12:12 Truly the signs of an apostle were wrought among you in all patience, in signs, and wonders, and mighty deeds.
2Cor12:13 For what is it wherein ye were inferior to other churches, except it be that I myself was not burdensome to you? forgive me this wrong.
2Cor12:14 Behold, the third time I am ready to come to you; and I will not be burdensome to you: for I seek not yours, but you: for the children ought not to lay up for the parents, but the parents for the children.
2Cor12:15 And I will very gladly spend and be spent for you; though the more abundantly I love you, the less I be loved.
2Cor12:16 But be it so, I did not burden you: nevertheless, being crafty, I caught you with guile.
2Cor12:17 Did I make a gain of you by any of them whom I sent unto you?
2Cor12:18 I desired Titus, and with him I sent a brother. Did Titus make a gain of you? walked we not in the same spirit? walked we not in the same steps?
2Cor12:19 Again, think ye that we excuse ourselves unto you? we speak before God in Christ: but we do all things, dearly beloved, for your edifying.
2Cor12:20 For I fear, lest, when I come, I shall not find you such as I would, and that I shall be found unto you such as ye would not: lest there be debates, envyings, wraths, strifes, backbitings, whisperings, swellings, tumults:
2Cor12:21 And lest, when I come again, my God will humble me among you, and that I shall bewail many which have sinned already, and have not repented of the uncleanness and fornication and lasciviousness which they have committed.
2Cor13:1 This is the third time I am coming to you. In the mouth of two or three witnesses shall every word be established.
2Cor13:2 I told you before, and foretell you, as if I were present, the second time; and being absent now I write to them which heretofore have sinned, and to all other, that, if I come again, I will not spare:
2Cor13:3 Since ye seek a proof of Christ speaking in me, which to you-ward is not weak, but is mighty in you.
2Cor13:4 For though he was crucified through weakness, yet he liveth by the power of God. For we also are weak in him, but we shall live with him by the power of God toward you.
2Cor13:5 Examine yourselves, whether ye be in the faith; prove your own selves. Know ye not your own selves, how that Jesus Christ is in you, except ye be reprobates?
2Cor13:6 But I trust that ye shall know that we are not reprobates.
2Cor13:7 Now I pray to God that ye do no evil; not that we should appear approved, but that ye should do that which is honest, though we be as reprobates.
2Cor13:8 For we can do nothing against the truth, but for the truth.
2Cor13:9 For we are glad, when we are weak, and ye are strong: and this also we wish, even your perfection.
2Cor13:10 Therefore I write these things being absent, lest being present I should use sharpness, according to the power which the Lord hath given me to edification, and not to destruction.
2Cor13:11 Finally, brethren, farewell. Be perfect, be of good comfort, be of one mind, live in peace; and the God of love and peace shall be with you.
2Cor13:12 Greet one another with an holy kiss.
2Cor13:13 All the saints salute you.
2Cor13:14 The grace of the Lord Jesus Christ, and the love of God, and the communion of the Holy Ghost, be with you all. Amen.
Gal1:1 Paul, an apostle, (not of men, neither by man, but by Jesus Christ, and God the Father, who raised him from the dead;)
Gal1:2 And all the brethren which are with me, unto the churches of Galatia:
Gal1:3 Grace be to you and peace from God the Father, and from our Lord Jesus Christ,
Gal1:4 Who gave himself for our sins, that he might deliver us from this present evil world, according to the will of God and our Father:
Gal1:5 To whom be glory for ever and ever. Amen.
Gal1:6 I marvel that ye are so soon removed from him that called you into the grace of Christ unto another gospel:
Gal1:7 Which is not another; but there be some that trouble you, and would pervert the gospel of Christ.
Gal1:8 But though we, or an angel from heaven, preach any other gospel unto you than that which we have preached unto you, let him be accursed.
Gal1:9 As we said before, so say I now again, If any man preach any other gospel unto you than that ye have received, let him be accursed.
Gal1:10 For do I now persuade men, or God? or do I seek to please men? for if I yet pleased men, I should not be the servant of Christ.
Gal1:11 But I certify you, brethren, that the gospel which was preached of me is not after man.
Gal1:12 For I neither received it of man, neither was I taught it, but by the revelation of Jesus Christ.
Gal1:13 For ye have heard of my conversation in time past in the Jews' religion, how that beyond measure I persecuted the church of God, and wasted it:
Gal1:14 And profited in the Jews' religion above many my equals in mine own nation, being more exceedingly zealous of the traditions  my fathers.
Gal1:15 But when it pleased God, who separated me from my mother's womb, and called me by his grace,
Gal1:16 To reveal his Son in me, that I might preach him among the heathen; immediately I conferred not with flesh and blood:
Gal1:17 Neither went I up to Jerusalem to them which were apostles before me; but I went into Arabia, and returned again unto Damascus.
Gal1:18 Then after three years I went up to Jerusalem to see Peter, and abode with him fifteen days.
Gal1:19 But other of the apostles saw I none, save James the Lord's brother.
Gal1:20 Now the things which I write unto you, behold, before God, I lie not.
Gal1:21 Afterwards I came into the regions of Syria and Cilicia;
Gal1:22 And was unknown by face unto the churches of Judaea which were in Christ:
Gal1:23 But they had heard only, That he which persecuted us in times past now preacheth the faith which once he destroyed.
Gal1:24 And they glorified God in me.
Gal2:1 Then fourteen years after I went up again to Jerusalem with Barnabas, and took Titus with me also.
Gal2:2 And I went up by revelation, and communicated unto them that gospel which I preach among the Gentiles, but privately to them which were of reputation, lest by any means I should run, or had run, in vain.
Gal2:3 But neither Titus, who was with me, being a Greek, was compelled to be circumcised:
Gal2:4 And that because of false brethren unawares brought in, who came in privily to spy out our liberty which we have in Christ Jesus, that they might bring us into bondage:
Gal2:5 To whom we gave place by subjection, no, not for an hour; that the truth of the gospel might continue with you.
Gal2:6 But of these who seemed to be somewhat, (whatsoever they were, it maketh no matter to me: God accepteth no man's person:) for they who seemed to be somewhat in conference added nothing to me:
Gal2:7 But contrariwise, when they saw that the gospel of the uncircumcision was committed unto me, as the gospel of the circumcision was unto Peter;
Gal2:8 (For he that wrought effectually in Peter to the apostleship of the circumcision, the same was mighty in me toward the Gentiles:)
Gal2:9 And when James, Cephas, and John, who seemed to be pillars, perceived the grace that was given unto me, they gave to me and Barnabas the right hands of fellowship; that we should go unto the heathen, and they unto the circumcision.
Gal2:10 Only they would that we should remember the poor; the same which I also was forward to do.
Gal2:11 But when Peter was come to Antioch, I withstood him to the face, because he was to be blamed.
Gal2:12 For before that certain came from James, he did eat with the Gentiles: but when they were come, he withdrew and separated himself, fearing them which were of the circumcision.
Gal2:13 And the other Jews dissembled likewise with him; insomuch that Barnabas also was carried away with their dissimulation.
Gal2:14 But when I saw that they walked not uprightly according to the truth of the gospel, I said unto Peter before them all, If thou, being a Jew, livest after the manner of Gentiles, and not as do the Jews, why compellest thou the Gentiles to live as do the Jews?
Gal2:15 We who are Jews by nature, and not sinners of the Gentiles,
Gal2:16 Knowing that a man is not justified by the works of the law, but by the faith of Jesus Christ, even we have believed in Jesus Christ, that we might be justified by the faith of Christ, and not by the works of the law: for by the works of the law shall no flesh be justified.
Gal2:17 But if, while we seek to be justified by Christ, we ourselves also are found sinners, is therefore Christ the minister of sin? God forbid.
Gal2:18 For if I build again the things which I destroyed, I make myself a transgressor.
Gal2:19 For I through the law am dead to the law, that I might live unto God.
Gal2:20 I am crucified with Christ: nevertheless I live; yet not I, but Christ liveth in me: and the life which I now live in the flesh I live by the faith of the Son of God, who loved me, and gave himself for me.
Gal2:21 I do not frustrate the grace of God: for if righteousness come by the law, then Christ is dead in vain.
Gal3:1 O foolish Galatians, who hath bewitched you, that ye should not obey the truth, before whose eyes Jesus Christ hath been evidently set forth, crucified among you?
Gal3:2 This only would I learn of you, Received ye the Spirit by the works of the law, or by the hearing of faith?
Gal3:3 Are ye so foolish? having begun in the Spirit, are ye now made perfect by the flesh?
Gal3:4 Have ye suffered so many things in vain? if it be yet in vain.
Gal3:5 He therefore that ministereth to you the Spirit, and worketh miracles among you, doeth he it by the works of the law, or by the hearing of faith?
Gal3:6 Even as Abraham believed God, and it was accounted to him for righteousness.
Gal3:7 Know ye therefore that they which are of faith, the same are the children of Abraham.
Gal3:8 And the scripture, foreseeing that God would justify the heathen through faith, preached before the gospel unto Abraham, saying, In thee shall all nations be blessed.
Gal3:9 So then they which be of faith are blessed with faithful Abraham.
Gal3:10 For as many as are of the works of the law are under the curse: for it is written, Cursed is every one that continueth not in all things which are written in the book of the law to do them.
Gal3:11 But that no man is justified by the law in the sight of God, it is evident: for, The just shall live by faith.
Gal3:12 And the law is not of faith: but, The man that doeth them shall live in them.
Gal3:13 Christ hath redeemed us from the curse of the law, being made a curse for us: for it is written, Cursed is every one that hangeth on a tree:
Gal3:14 That the blessing of Abraham might come on the Gentiles through Jesus Christ; that we might receive the promise of the Spirit through faith.
Gal3:15 Brethren, I speak after the manner of men; Though it be but a man's covenant, yet if it be confirmed, no man disannulleth, or addeth thereto.
Gal3:16 Now to Abraham and his seed were the promises made. He saith not, And to seeds, as of many; but as of one, And to thy seed, which is Christ.
Gal3:17 And this I say, that the covenant, that was confirmed before of God in Christ, the law, which was four hundred and thirty years after, cannot disannul, that it should make the promise of none effect.
Gal3:18 For if the inheritance be of the law, it is no more of promise: but God gave it to Abraham by promise.
Gal3:19 Wherefore then serveth the law? It was added because of transgressions, till the seed should come to whom the promise was made; and it was ordained by angels in the hand of a mediator.
Gal3:20 Now a mediator is not a mediator of one, but God is one.
Gal3:21 Is the law then against the promises of God? God forbid: for if there had been a law given which could have given life, verily righteousness should have been by the law.
Gal3:22 But the scripture hath concluded all under sin, that the promise by faith of Jesus Christ might be given to them that believe.
Gal3:23 But before faith came, we were kept under the law, shut up unto the faith which should afterwards be revealed.
Gal3:24 Wherefore the law was our schoolmaster to bring us unto Christ, that we might be justified by faith.
Gal3:25 But after that faith is come, we are no longer under a schoolmaster.
Gal3:26 For ye are all the children of God by faith in Christ Jesus.
Gal3:27 For as many of you as have been baptized into Christ have put on Christ.
Gal3:28 There is neither Jew nor Greek, there is neither bond nor free, there is neither male nor female: for ye are all one in Christ Jesus.
Gal3:29 And if ye be Christ's, then are ye Abraham's seed, and heirs according to the promise.
Gal4:1 Now I say, That the heir, as long as he is a child, differeth nothing from a servant, though he be lord of all;
Gal4:2 But is under tutors and governors until the time appointed of the father.
Gal4:3 Even so we, when we were children, were in bondage under the elements of the world:
Gal4:4 But when the fulness of the time was come, God sent forth his Son, made of a woman, made under the law,
Gal4:5 To redeem them that were under the w, that we might receive the adoption of sons.
Gal4:6 And because ye are sons, God hath sent forth the Spirit of his Son into your hearts, crying, Abba, Father.
Gal4:7 Wherefore thou art no more a servant, but a son; and if a son, then an heir of God through Christ.
Gal4:8 Howbeit then, when ye knew not God, ye did service unto them which by nature are no gods.
Gal4:9 But now, after that ye have known God, or rather are known of God, how turn ye again to the weak and beggarly elements, whereunto ye desire again to be in bondage?
Gal4:10 Ye observe days, and months, and times, and years.
Gal4:11 I am afraid of you, lest I have bestowed upon you labour in vain.
Gal4:12 Brethren, I beseech you, be as I am; for I am as ye are: ye have not injured me at all.
Gal4:13 Ye know how through infirmity of the flesh I preached the gospel unto you at the first.
Gal4:14 And my temptation which was in my flesh ye despised not, nor rejected; but received me as an angel of God, even as Christ Jesus.
Gal4:15 Where is then the blessedness ye spake of? for I bear you record, that, if it had been possible, ye would have plucked out your own eyes, and have given them to me.
Gal4:16 Am I therefore become your enemy, because I tell you the truth?
Gal4:17 They zealously affect you, but not well; yea, they would exclude you, that ye might affect them.
Gal4:18 But it is good to be zealously affected always in a good thing, and not only when I am present with you.
Gal4:19 My little children, of whom I travail in birth again until Christ be formed in you,
Gal4:20 I desire to be present with you now, and to change my voice; for I stand in doubt of you.
Gal4:21 Tell me, ye that desire to be under the law, do ye not hear the law?
Gal4:22 For it is written, that Abraham had two sons, the one by a bondmaid, the other by a freewoman.
Gal4:23 But he who was of the bondwoman was born after the flesh; but he of the freewoman was by promise.
Gal4:24 Which things are an allegory: for these are the two covenants; the one from the mount Sinai, which gendereth to bondage, which is Agar.
Gal4:25 For this Agar is mount Sinai in Arabia, and answereth to Jerusalem which now is, and is in bondage with her children.
Gal4:26 But Jerusalem which is above is free, which is the mother of us all.
Gal4:27 For it is written, Rejoice, thou barren that bearest not; break forth and cry, thou that travailest not: for the desolate hath many more children than she which hath an husband.
Gal4:28 Now we, brethren, as Isaac was, are the children of promise.
Gal4:29 But as then he that was born after the flesh persecuted him that was born after the Spirit, even so it is now.
Gal4:30 Nevertheless what saith the scripture? Cast out the bondwoman and her son: for the son of the bondwoman shall not be heir with the son of the freewoman.
Gal4:31 So then, brethren, we are not children of the bondwoman, but of the free.
Gal5:1 Stand fast therefore in the liberty wherewith Christ hath made us free, and be not entangled again with the yoke of bondage.
Gal5:2 Behold, I Paul say unto you, that if ye be circumcised, Christ shall profit you nothing.
Gal5:3 For I testify again to every man that is circumcised, that he is a debtor to do the whole law.
Gal5:4 Christ is become of no effect unto you, whosoever of you are justified by the law; ye are fallen from grace.
Gal5:5 For we through the Spirit wait for the hope of righteousness by faith.
Gal5:6 For in Jesus Christ neither circumcision availeth any thing, nor uncircumcision; but faith which worketh by love.
Gal5:7 Ye did run well; who did hinder you that ye should not obey the truth?
Gal5:8 This persuasion cometh not of him that calleth you.
Gal5:9 A little leaven leaveneth the whole lump.
Gal5:10 I have confidence in you through the Lord, that ye will be none otherwise minded: but he that troubleth you shall bear his judgment, whosoever he be.
Gal5:11 And I, brethren, if I yet preach circumcision, why do I yet suffer persecution? then is the offence of the cross ceased.
Gal5:12 I would they were even cut off which trouble you.
Gal5:13 For, brethren, ye have been called unto liberty; only use not liberty for an occasion to the flesh, but by love serve one another.
Gal5:14 For all the law is fulfilled in one word, even in this; Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself.
Gal5:15 But if ye bite and devour one another, take heed that ye be not consumed one of another.
Gal5:16 This I say then, Walk in the Spirit, and ye shall not fulfil the lust of the flesh.
Gal5:17 For the flesh lusteth against the Spirit, and the Spirit against the flesh: and these are contrary the one to the other: so that ye cannot do the things that ye would.
Gal5:18 But if ye be led of the Spirit, ye are not under the law.
Gal5:19 Now the works of the flesh are manifest, which are these; Adultery, fornication, uncleanness, lasciviousness,
Gal5:20 Idolatry, witchcraft, hatred, variance, emulations, wrath, strife, seditions, heresies,
Gal5:21 Envyings, murders, drunkenness, revellings, and such like: of the which I tell you before, as I have also told you in time past, that they which do such things shall not inherit the kingdom of God.
Gal5:22 But the fruit of the Spirit is love, joy, peace, longsuffering, gentleness, goodness, faith,
Gal5:23 Meekness, temperance: against such there is no law.
Gal5:24 And they that are Christ's have crucified the flesh with the affections and lusts.
Gal5:25 If we live in the Spirit, let us also walk in the Spirit.
Gal5:26 Let us not be desirous of vain glory, provoking one another, envying one another.
Gal6:1 Brethren, if a man be overtaken in a fault, ye which are spiritual, restore such an one in the spirit of meekness; considering thyself, lest thou also be tempted.
Gal6:2 Bear ye one another's burdens, and so fulfil the law of Christ.
Gal6:3 For if a man think himself to be something, when he is nothing, he deceiveth himself.
Gal6:4 But let every man prove his own work, and then shall he have rejoicing in himself alone, and not in another.
Gal6:5 For every man shall bear his own burden.
Gal6:6 Let him that is taught in the word communicate unto him that teacheth in all good things.
Gal6:7 Be not deceived; God is not mocked: for whatsoever a man soweth, that shall he also reap.
Gal6:8 For he that soweth to his flesh shall of the flesh reap corruption; but he that soweth to the Spirit shall of the Spirit reap life everlasting.
Gal6:9 And let us not be weary in well doing: for in due season we shall reap, if we faint not.
Gal6:10 As we have therefore opportunity, let us do good unto all men, especially unto them who are of the household of faith.
Gal6:11 Ye see how large a letter I have written unto you with mine own hand.
Gal6:12 As many as desire to make a fair shew in the flesh, they constrain you to be circumcised; only lest they should suffer persecution for the cross of Christ.
Gal6:13 For neither they themselves who are circumcised keep the law; but desire to have you circumcised, that they may glory in your flesh.
Gal6:14 But God forbid that I should glory, save in the cross of our Lord Jesus Christ, by whom the world is crucified unto me, and I unto the world.
Gal6:15 For in Christ Jesus neither circumcision availeth any thing, nor uncircumcision, but a new creature.
Gal6:16 And as many as walk according to this rule, peace be on them, and mercy, and upon the Israel of God.
Gal6:17 From henceforth let no man trouble me: for I bear in my body the marks of the Lord Jesus.
Gal6:18 Brethren, the grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with your spirit. Amen.
Eph1:1 Paul, an apostle of Jesus Christ by the will of God, to the saints which are at Ephesus, and to the faithful in Christ Jesus:
Eph1:2 Grace be to you, and peace, from God our Father, and from the Lord Jesus Christ.
Eph1:3 Blessed be the God and Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, who hath blessed us with all spiritual blessings in heavenly places in Christ:
Eph1:4 According as he hath chosen us in him before the foundation of the world, that we should be holy and without blame before him in love:
Eph1:5 Having predestinated us unto the adoption of children by Jesus Christ to himself, according to the goode of Christ Jesus my Lord: for whom I have suffered the loss of all things, and do count them but dung, that I may win Christ,
Phi3:9 And be found in him, not having mine own righteousness, which is of the law, but that which is through the faith of Christ, the righteousness which is of God by faith:
Phi3:10 That I may know him, and the power of his resurrection, and the fellowship of his sufferings, being made conformable unto his death;
Phi3:11 If by any means I might attain unto the resurrection of the dead.
Phi3:12 Not as though I had already attained, either were already perfect: but I follow after, if that I may apprehend that for which also I am apprehended of Christ Jesus.
Phi3:13 Brethren, I count not myself to have apprehended: but this one thing I do, forgetting those things which are behind, and reaching forth unto those things which are before,
Phi3:14 I press toward the mark for the prize of the high calling of God in Christ Jesus.
Phi3:15 Let us therefore, as many as be perfect, be thus minded: and if in any thing ye be otherwise minded, God shall reveal even this unto you.
Phi3:16 Nevertheless, whereto we have already attained, let us walk by the same rule, let us mind the same thing.
Phi3:17 Brethren, be followers together of me, and mark them which walk so as ye have us for an ensample.
Phi3:18 (For many walk, of whom I have told you often, and now tell you even weeping, that they are the enemies of the cross of Christ:
Phi3:19 Whose end is destruction, whose God is their belly, and whose glory is in their shame, who mind earthly things.)
Phi3:20 For our conversation is in heaven; from whence also we look for the Saviour, the Lord Jesus Christ:
Phi3:21 Who shall change our vile body, that it may be fashioned like unto his glorious body, according to the working whereby he is able even to subdue all things unto himself.
Phi4:1 Therefore, my brethren dearly beloved and longed for, my joy and crown, so stand fast in the Lord, my dearly beloved.
Phi4:2 I beseech Euodias, and beseech Syntyche, that they be of the same mind in the Lord.
Phi4:3 And I intreat thee also, true yokefellow, help those women which laboured with me in the gospel, with Clement also, and with other my fellowlabourers, whose names are in the book of life.
Phi4:4 Rejoice in the Lord alway: and again I say, Rejoice.
Phi4:5 Let your moderation be known unto all men. The Lord is at hand.
Phi4:6 Be careful for nothing; but in every thing by prayer and supplication with thanksgiving let your requests be made known unto God.
Phi4:7 And the peace of God, which passeth all understanding, shall keep your hearts and minds through Christ Jesus.
Phi4:8 Finally, brethren, whatsoever things are true, whatsoever things are honest, whatsoever things are just, whatsoever things are pure, whatsoever things are lovely, whatsoever things are of good report; if there be any virtue, and if there be any praise, think on these things.
Phi4:9 Those things, which ye have both learned, and received, and heard, and seen in me, do: and the God of peace shall be with you.
Phi4:10 But I rejoiced in the Lord greatly, that now at the last your care of me hath flourished again; wherein ye were also careful, but ye lacked opportunity.
Phi4:11 Not that I speak in respect of want: for I have learned, in whatsoever state I am, therewith to be content.
Phi4:12 I know both how to be abased, and I know how to abound: every where and in all things I am instructed both to be full and to be hungry, both to abound and to suffer need.
Phi4:13 I can do all things through Christ which strengtheneth me.
Phi4:14 Notwithstanding ye have well done, that ye did communicate with my affliction.
Phi4:15 Now ye Philippians know also, that in the beginning of the gospel, when I departed from Macedonia, no church communicated with me as concerning giving and receiving, but ye only.
Phi4:16 For even in Thessalonica ye sent once and again unto my necessity.
Phi4:17 Not because I desire a gift: but I desire fruit that may abound to your account.
Phi4:18 But I have all, and abound: I am full, having received of Epaphroditus the things which were sent from you, an odour of a sweet smell, a sacrifice acceptable, wellpleasing to God.
Phi4:19 But my God shall supply all your need according to his riches in glory by Christ Jesus.
Phi4:20 Now unto God and our Father be glory for ever and ever. Amen.
Phi4:21 Salute every saint in Christ Jesus. The brethren which are with me greet you.
Phi4:22 All the saints salute you, chiefly they that are of Caesar's household.
Phi4:23 The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you all. Amen.
Col1:1 Paul, an apostle of Jesus Christ by the will of God, and Timotheus our brother,
Col1:2 To the saints and faithful brethren in Christ which are at Colosse: Grace be unto you, and peace, from God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ.
Col1:3 We give thanks to God and the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, praying always for you,
Col1:4 Since we heard of your faith in Christ Jesus, and of the love which ye have to all the saints,
Col1:5 For the hope which is laid up for you in heaven, whereof ye heard before in the word of the truth of the gospel;
Col1:6 Which is come unto you, as it is in all the world; and bringeth forth fruit, as it doth also in you, since the day ye heard of it, and knew the grace of God in truth:
Col1:7 As ye also learned of Epaphras our dear fellowservant, who is for you a faithful minister of Christ;
Col1:8 Who also declared unto us your love in the Spirit.
Col1:9 For this cause we also, since the day we heard it, do not cease to pray for you, and to desire that ye might be filled with the knowledge of his will in all wisdom and spiritual understanding;
Col1:10 That ye might walk worthy of the Lord unto all pleasing, being fruitful in every good work, and increasing in the knowledge of God;
Col1:11 Strengthened with all might, according to his glorious power, unto all patience and longsuffering with joyfulness;
Col1:12 Giving thanks unto the Father, which hath made us meet to be partakers of the inheritance of the saints in light:
Col1:13 Who hath delivered us from the power of darkness, and hath translated us into the kingdom of his dear Son:
Col1:14 In whom we have redemption through his blood, even the forgiveness of sins:
Col1:15 Who is the image of the invisible God, the firstborn of every creature:
Col1:16 For by him were all things created, that are in heaven, and that are in earth, visible and invisible, whether they be thrones, or dominions, or principalities, or powers: all things were created by him, and for him:
Col1:17 And he is before all things, and by him all things consist.
Col1:18 And he is the head of the body, the church: who is the beginning, the firstborn from the dead; that in all things he might have the preeminence.
Col1:19 For it pleased the Father that in him should all fulness dwell;
Col1:20 And, having made peace through the blood of his cross, by him to reconcile all things unto himself; by him, I say, whether they be things in earth, or things in heaven.
Col1:21 And you, that were sometime alienated and enemies in your mind by wicked works, yet now hath he reconciled
Col1:22 In the body of his flesh through death, to present you holy and unblameable and unreproveable in his sight:
Col1:23 If ye continue in the faith grounded and settled, and be not moved away from the hope of the gospel, which ye have heard, and which was preached to every creature which is under heaven; whereof I Paul am made a minister;
Col1:24 Who now rejoice in my sufferings for you, and fill up that which is behind of the afflictions of Christ in my flesh for his body's sake, which is the church:
Col1:25 Whereof I am made a minister, according to the dispensation of God which is given to me for you, to fulfil the word of God;
Col1:26 Even the mystery which hath been hid from ages and from generations, but now is made manifest to his saints:
Col1:27 To whom God would make known what is the riches of the glory of this mystery among the Gentiles; which is Christ in you, the hope of glory:
Col1:28 Whom we preach, warning every man, and teaching every man in all wisdom; thate may present every man perfect in Christ Jesus:
Col1:29 Whereunto I also labour, striving according to his working, which worketh in me mightily.
Col2:1 For I would that ye knew what great conflict I have for you, and for them at Laodicea, and for as many as have not seen my face in the flesh;
Col2:2 That their hearts might be comforted, being knit together in love, and unto all riches of the full assurance of understanding, to the acknowledgement of the mystery of God, and of the Father, and of Christ;
Col2:3 In whom are hid all the treasures of wisdom and knowledge.
Col2:4 And this I say, lest any man should beguile you with enticing words.
Col2:5 For though I be absent in the flesh, yet am I with you in the spirit, joying and beholding your order, and the stedfastness of your faith in Christ.
Col2:6 As ye have therefore received Christ Jesus the Lord, so walk ye in him:
Col2:7 Rooted and built up in him, and stablished in the faith, as ye have been taught, abounding therein with thanksgiving.
Col2:8 Beware lest any man spoil you through philosophy and vain deceit, after the tradition of men, after the rudiments of the world, and not after Christ.
Col2:9 For in him dwelleth all the fulness of the Godhead bodily.
Col2:10 And ye are complete in him, which is the head of all principality and power:
Col2:11 In whom also ye are circumcised with the circumcision made without hands, in putting off the body of the sins of the flesh by the circumcision of Christ:
Col2:12 Buried with him in baptism, wherein also ye are risen with him through the faith of the operation of God, who hath raised him from the dead.
Col2:13 And you, being dead in your sins and the uncircumcision of your flesh, hath he quickened together with him, having forgiven you all trespasses;
Col2:14 Blotting out the handwriting of ordinances that was against us, which was contrary to us, and took it out of the way, nailing it to his cross;
Col2:15 And having spoiled principalities and powers, he made a shew of them openly, triumphing over them in it.
Col2:16 Let no man therefore judge you in meat, or in drink, or in respect of an holyday, or of the new moon, or of the sabbath days:
Col2:17 Which are a shadow of things to come; but the body is of Christ.
Col2:18 Let no man beguile you of your reward in a voluntary humility and worshipping of angels, intruding into those things which he hath not seen, vainly puffed up by his fleshly mind,
Col2:19 And not holding the Head, from which all the body by joints and bands having nourishment ministered, and knit together, increaseth with the increase of God.
Col2:20 Wherefore if ye be dead with Christ from the rudiments of the world, why, as though living in the world, are ye subject to ordinances,
Col2:21 (Touch not; taste not; handle not;
Col2:22 Which all are to perish with the using;) after the commandments and doctrines of men?
Col2:23 Which things have indeed a shew of wisdom in will worship, and humility, and neglecting of the body; not in any honour to the satisfying of the flesh.
Col3:1 If ye then be risen with Christ, seek those things which are above, where Christ sitteth on the right hand of God.
Col3:2 Set your affection on things above, not on things on the earth.
Col3:3 For ye are dead, and your life is hid with Christ in God.
Col3:4 When Christ, who is our life, shall appear, then shall ye also appear with him in glory.
Col3:5 Mortify therefore your members which are upon the earth; fornication, uncleanness, inordinate affection, evil concupiscence, and covetousness, which is idolatry:
Col3:6 For which things' sake the wrath of God cometh on the children of disobedience:
Col3:7 In the which ye also walked some time, when ye lived in them.
Col3:8 But now ye also put off all these; anger, wrath, malice, blasphemy, filthy communication out of your mouth.
Col3:9 Lie not one to another, seeing that ye have put off the old man with his deeds;
Col3:10 And have put on the new man, which is renewed in knowledge after the image of him that created him:
Col3:11 Where there is neither Greek nor Jew, circumcision nor uncircumcision, Barbarian, Scythian, bond nor free: but Christ is all, and in all.
Col3:12 Put on therefore, as the elect of God, holy and beloved, bowels of mercies, kindness, humbleness of mind, meekness, longsuffering;
Col3:13 Forbearing one another, and forgiving one another, if any man have a quarrel against any: even as Christ forgave you, so also do ye.
Col3:14 And above all these things put on charity, which is the bond of perfectness.
Col3:15 And let the peace of God rule in your hearts, to the which also ye are called in one body; and be ye thankful.
Col3:16 Let the word of Christ dwell in you richly in all wisdom; teaching and admonishing one another in psalms and hymns and spiritual songs, singing with grace in your hearts to the Lord.
Col3:17 And whatsoever ye do in word or deed, do all in the name of the Lord Jesus, giving thanks to God and the Father by him.
Col3:18 Wives, submit yourselves unto your own husbands, as it is fit in the Lord.
Col3:19 Husbands, love your wives, and be not bitter against them.
Col3:20 Children, obey your parents in all things: for this is well pleasing unto the Lord.
Col3:21 Fathers, provoke not your children to anger, lest they be discouraged.
Col3:22 Servants, obey in all things your masters according to the flesh; not with eyeservice, as menpleasers; but in singleness of heart, fearing God:
Col3:23 And whatsoever ye do, do it heartily, as to the Lord, and not unto men;
Col3:24 Knowing that of the Lord ye shall receive the reward of the inheritance: for ye serve the Lord Christ.
Col3:25 But he that doeth wrong shall receive for the wrong which he hath done: and there is no respect of persons.
Col4:1 Masters, give unto your servants that which is just and equal; knowing that ye also have a Master in heaven.
Col4:2 Continue in prayer, and watch in the same with thanksgiving;
Col4:3 Withal praying also for us, that God would open unto us a door of utterance, to speak the mystery of Christ, for which I am also in bonds:
Col4:4 That I may make it manifest, as I ought to speak.
Col4:5 Walk in wisdom toward them that are without, redeeming the time.
Col4:6 Let your speech be alway with grace, seasoned with salt, that ye may know how ye ought to answer every man.
Col4:7 All my state shall Tychicus declare unto you, who is a beloved brother, and a faithful minister and fellowservant in the Lord:
Col4:8 Whom I have sent unto you for the same purpose, that he might know your estate, and comfort your hearts;
Col4:9 With Onesimus, a faithful and beloved brother, who is one of you. They shall make known unto you all things which are done here.
Col4:10 Aristarchus my fellowprisoner saluteth you, and Marcus, sister's son to Barnabas, (touching whom ye received commandments: if he come unto you, receive him;)
Col4:11 And Jesus, which is called Justus, who are of the circumcision. These only are my fellowworkers unto the kingdom of God, which have been a comfort unto me.
Col4:12 Epaphras, who is one of you, a servant of Christ, saluteth you, always labouring fervently for you in prayers, that ye may stand perfect and complete in all the will of God.
Col4:13 For I bear him record, that he hath a great zeal for you, and them that are in Laodicea, and them in Hierapolis.
Col4:14 Luke, the beloved physician, and Demas, greet you.
Col4:15 Salute the brethren which are in Laodicea, and Nymphas, and the church which is in his house.
Col4:16 And when this epistle is read among you, cause that it be read also in the church of the Laodiceans; and that ye likewise read the epistle from Laodicea.
Col4:17 And say to Archippus, Take heed to the ministry which thou hast received in the Lord, that thou fulfil it.
Col4:18 The salutation by the hand of me Paul. Remember my bonds. Grace be with you. Amen.
1Th1:1 Paul, and Silvanus, and Timotheus, unto the church of the Thessalonians which is in God the Father and in the Lord Jesus Christ: Grace be unto you, and peace, from God our Father, and the Lord Jesus Christ.
1Th1:2 We give thanks to God always for you all, making mention of you in our prayers;
1Th1:3 Rembering without ceasing your work of faith, and labour of love, and patience of hope in our Lord Jesus Christ, in the sight of God and our Father;
1Th1:4 Knowing, brethren beloved, your election of God.
1Th1:5 For our gospel came not unto you in word only, but also in power, and in the Holy Ghost, and in much assurance; as ye know what manner of men we were among you for your sake.
1Th1:6 And ye became followers of us, and of the Lord, having received the word in much affliction, with joy of the Holy Ghost:
1Th1:7 So that ye were ensamples to all that believe in Macedonia and Achaia.
1Th1:8 For from you sounded out the word of the Lord not only in Macedonia and Achaia, but also in every place your faith to God-ward is spread abroad; so that we need not to speak any thing.
1Th1:9 For they themselves shew of us what manner of entering in we had unto you, and how ye turned to God from idols to serve the living and true God;
1Th1:10 And to wait for his Son from heaven, whom he raised from the dead, even Jesus, which delivered us from the wrath to come.
1Th2:1 For yourselves, brethren, know our entrance in unto you, that it was not in vain:
1Th2:2 But even after that we had suffered before, and were shamefully entreated, as ye know, at Philippi, we were bold in our God to speak unto you the gospel of God with much contention.
1Th2:3 For our exhortation was not of deceit, nor of uncleanness, nor in guile:
1Th2:4 But as we were allowed of God to be put in trust with the gospel, even so we speak; not as pleasing men, but God, which trieth our hearts.
1Th2:5 For neither at any time used we flattering words, as ye know, nor a cloke of covetousness; God is witness:
1Th2:6 Nor of men sought we glory, neither of you, nor yet of others, when we might have been burdensome, as the apostles of Christ.
1Th2:7 But we were gentle among you, even as a nurse cherisheth her children:
1Th2:8 So being affectionately desirous of you, we were willing to have imparted unto you, not the gospel of God only, but also our own souls, because ye were dear unto us.
1Th2:9 For ye remember, brethren, our labour and travail: for labouring night and day, because we would not be chargeable unto any of you, we preached unto you the gospel of God.
1Th2:10 Ye are witnesses, and God also, how holily and justly and unblameably we behaved ourselves among you that believe:
1Th2:11 As ye know how we exhorted and comforted and charged every one of you, as a father doth his children,
1Th2:12 That ye would walk worthy of God, who hath called you unto his kingdom and glory.
1Th2:13 For this cause also thank we God without ceasing, because, when ye received the word of God which ye heard of us, ye received it not as the word of men, but as it is in truth, the word of God, which effectually worketh also in you that believe.
1Th2:14 For ye, brethren, became followers of the churches of God which in Judaea are in Christ Jesus: for ye also have suffered like things of your own countrymen, even as they have of the Jews:
1Th2:15 Who both killed the Lord Jesus, and their own prophets, and have persecuted us; and they please not God, and are contrary to all men:
1Th2:16 Forbidding us to speak to the Gentiles that they might be saved, to fill up their sins alway: for the wrath is come upon them to the uttermost.
1Th2:17 But we, brethren, being taken from you for a short time in presence, not in heart, endeavoured the more abundantly to see your face with great desire.
1Th2:18 Wherefore we would have come unto you, even I Paul, once and again; but Satan hindered us.
1Th2:19 For what is our hope, or joy, or crown of rejoicing? Are not even ye in the presence of our Lord Jesus Christ at his coming?
1Th2:20 For ye are our glory and joy.
1Th3:1 Wherefore when we could no longer forbear, we thought it good to be left at Athens alone;
1Th3:2 And sent Timotheus, our brother, and minister of God, and our fellowlabourer in the gospel of Christ, to establish you, and to comfort you concerning your faith:
1Th3:3 That no man should be moved by these afflictions: for yourselves know that we are appointed thereunto.
1Th3:4 For verily, when we were with you, we told you before that we should suffer tribulation; even as it came to pass, and ye know.
1Th3:5 For this cause, when I could no longer forbear, I sent to know your faith, lest by some means the tempter have tempted you, and our labour be in vain.
1Th3:6 But now when Timotheus came from you unto us, and brought us good tidings of your faith and charity, and that ye have good remembrance of us always, desiring greatly to see us, as we also to see you:
1Th3:7 Therefore, brethren, we were comforted over you in all our affliction and distress by your faith:
1Th3:8 For now we live, if ye stand fast in the Lord.
1Th3:9 For what thanks can we render to God again for you, for all the joy wherewith we joy for your sakes before our God;
1Th3:10 Night and day praying exceedingly that we might see your face, and might perfect that which is lacking in your faith?
1Th3:11 Now God himself and our Father, and our Lord Jesus Christ, direct our way unto you.
1Th3:12 And the Lord make you to increase and abound in love one toward another, and toward all men, even as we do toward you:
1Th3:13 To the end he may stablish your hearts unblameable in holiness before God, even our Father, at the coming of our Lord Jesus Christ with all his saints.
1Th4:1 Furthermore then we beseech you, brethren, and exhort you by the Lord Jesus, that as ye have received of us how ye ought to walk and to please God, so ye would abound more and more.
1Th4:2 For ye know what commandments we gave you by the Lord Jesus.
1Th4:3 For this is the will of God, even your sanctification, that ye should abstain from fornication:
1Th4:4 That every one of you should know how to possess his vessel in sanctification and honour;
1Th4:5 Not in the lust of concupiscence, even as the Gentiles which know not God:
1Th4:6 That no man go beyond and defraud his brother in any matter: because that the Lord is the avenger of all such, as we also have forewarned you and testified.
1Th4:7 For God hath not called us unto uncleanness, but unto holiness.
1Th4:8 He therefore that despiseth, despiseth not man, but God, who hath also given unto us his holy Spirit.
1Th4:9 But as touching brotherly love ye need not that I write unto you: for ye yourselves are taught of God to love one another.
1Th4:10 And indeed ye do it toward all the brethren which are in all Macedonia: but we beseech you, brethren, that ye increase more and more;
1Th4:11 And that ye study to be quiet, and to do your own business, and to work with your own hands, as we commanded you;
1Th4:12 That ye may walk honestly toward them that are without, and that ye may have lack of nothing.
1Th4:13 But I would not have you to be ignorant, brethren, concerning them which are asleep, that ye sorrow not, even as others which have no hope.
1Th4:14 For if we believe that Jesus died and rose again, even so them also which sleep in Jesus will God bring with him.
1Th4:15 For this we say unto you by the word of the Lord, that we which are alive and remain unto the coming of the Lord shall not prevent them which are asleep.
1Th4:16 For the Lord himself shall descend from heaven with a shout, with the voice of the archangel, and with the trump of God: and the dead in Christ shall rise first:
1Th4:17 Then we which are alive and remain shall be caught up together with them in the clouds, to meet the Lord in the air: and so shall we ever be with the Lord.
1Th4:18 Wherefore comfort one another with these words.
1Th5:1 But of the times and the seasons, brethren, ye have no need that I write unto you.
1Th5:2 For yourselves know perfectly that the day of the Lord so cometh as a thief in the night.
1Th5:3 For when they shall say, Peace and safety; then sudden destruction cometh upon them, as travail upon a woman with child; and they shall not escape.
1Th5:4 But ye, brethren, are not in darkness, that that day should overtake you as a thief.
1Th5:5 Ye are all the children of light, and the children of the day: we are not of the night, nor of darkness.
1Th5:6 Therefore let us not sleep, as dr, even unto bonds; but the word of God is not bound.
2Tim2:10 Therefore I endure all things for the elect's sakes, that they may also obtain the salvation which is in Christ Jesus with eternal glory.
2Tim2:11 It is a faithful saying: For if we be dead with him, we shall also live with him:
2Tim2:12 If we suffer, we shall also reign with him: if we deny him, he also will deny us:
2Tim2:13 If we believe not, yet he abideth faithful: he cannot deny himself.
2Tim2:14 Of these things put them in remembrance, charging them before the Lord that they strive not about words to no profit, but to the subverting of the hearers.
2Tim2:15 Study to shew thyself approved unto God, a workman that needeth not to be ashamed, rightly dividing the word of truth.
2Tim2:16 But shun profane and vain babblings: for they will increase unto more ungodliness.
2Tim2:17 And their word will eat as doth a canker: of whom is Hymenaeus and Philetus;
2Tim2:18 Who concerning the truth have erred, saying that the resurrection is past already; and overthrow the faith of some.
2Tim2:19 Nevertheless the foundation of God standeth sure, having this seal, The Lord knoweth them that are his. And, Let every one that nameth the name of Christ depart from iniquity.
2Tim2:20 But in a great house there are not only vessels of gold and of silver, but also of wood and of earth; and some to honour, and some to dishonour.
2Tim2:21 If a man therefore purge himself from these, he shall be a vessel unto honour, sanctified, and meet for the master's use, and prepared unto every good work.
2Tim2:22 Flee also youthful lusts: but follow righteousness, faith, charity, peace, with them that call on the Lord out of a pure heart.
2Tim2:23 But foolish and unlearned questions avoid, knowing that they do gender strifes.
2Tim2:24 And the servant of the Lord must not strive; but be gentle unto all men, apt to teach, patient,
2Tim2:25 In meekness instructing those that oppose themselves; if God peradventure will give them repentance to the acknowledging of the truth;
2Tim2:26 And that they may recover themselves out of the snare of the devil, who are taken captive by him at his will.
2Tim3:1 This know also, that in the last days perilous times shall come.
2Tim3:2 For men shall be lovers of their own selves, covetous, boasters, proud, blasphemers, disobedient to parents, unthankful, unholy,
2Tim3:3 Without natural affection, trucebreakers, false accusers, incontinent, fierce, despisers of those that are good,
2Tim3:4 Traitors, heady, highminded, lovers of pleasures more than lovers of God;
2Tim3:5 Having a form of godliness, but denying the power thereof: from such turn away.
2Tim3:6 For of this sort are they which creep into houses, and lead captive silly women laden with sins, led away with divers lusts,
2Tim3:7 Ever learning, and never able to come to the knowledge of the truth.
2Tim3:8 Now as Jannes and Jambres withstood Moses, so do these also resist the truth: men of corrupt minds, reprobate concerning the faith.
2Tim3:9 But they shall proceed no further: for their folly shall be manifest unto all men, as theirs also was.
2Tim3:10 But thou hast fully known my doctrine, manner of life, purpose, faith, longsuffering, charity, patience,
2Tim3:11 Persecutions, afflictions, which came unto me at Antioch, at Iconium, at Lystra; what persecutions I endured: but out of them all the Lord delivered me.
2Tim3:12 Yea, and all that will live godly in Christ Jesus shall suffer persecution.
2Tim3:13 But evil men and seducers shall wax worse and worse, deceiving, and being deceived.
2Tim3:14 But continue thou in the things which thou hast learned and hast been assured of, knowing of whom thou hast learned them;
2Tim3:15 And that from a child thou hast known the holy scriptures, which are able to make thee wise unto salvation through faith which is in Christ Jesus.
2Tim3:16 All scripture is given by inspiration of God, and is profitable for doctrine, for reproof, for correction, for instruction in righteousness:
2Tim3:17 That the man of God may be perfect, throughly furnished unto all good works.
2Tim4:1 I charge thee therefore before God, and the Lord Jesus Christ, who shall judge the quick and the dead at his appearing and his kingdom;
2Tim4:2 Preach the word; be instant in season, out of season; reprove, rebuke, exhort with all longsuffering and doctrine.
2Tim4:3 For the time will come when they will not endure sound doctrine; but after their own lusts shall they heap to themselves teachers, having itching ears;
2Tim4:4 And they shall turn away their ears from the truth, and shall be turned unto fables.
2Tim4:5 But watch thou in all things, endure afflictions, do the work of an evangelist, make full proof of thy ministry.
2Tim4:6 For I am now ready to be offered, and the time of my departure is at hand.
2Tim4:7 I have fought a good fight, I have finished my course, I have kept the faith:
2Tim4:8 Henceforth there is laid up for me a crown of righteousness, which the Lord, the righteous judge, shall give me at that day: and not to me only, but unto all them also that love his appearing.
2Tim4:9 Do thy diligence to come shortly unto me:
2Tim4:10 For Demas hath forsaken me, having loved this present world, and is departed unto Thessalonica; Crescens to Galatia, Titus unto Dalmatia.
2Tim4:11 Only Luke is with me. Take Mark, and bring him with thee: for he is profitable to me for the ministry.
2Tim4:12 And Tychicus have I sent to Ephesus.
2Tim4:13 The cloke that I left at Troas with Carpus, when thou comest, bring with thee, and the books, but especially the parchments.
2Tim4:14 Alexander the coppersmith did me much evil: the Lord reward him according to his works:
2Tim4:15 Of whom be thou ware also; for he hath greatly withstood our words.
2Tim4:16 At my first answer no man stood with me, but all men forsook me: I pray God that it may not be laid to their charge.
2Tim4:17 Notwithstanding the Lord stood with me, and strengthened me; that by me the preaching might be fully known, and that all the Gentiles might hear: and I was delivered out of the mouth of the lion.
2Tim4:18 And the Lord shall deliver me from every evil work, and will preserve me unto his heavenly kingdom: to whom be glory for ever and ever. Amen.
2Tim4:19 Salute Prisca and Aquila, and the household of Onesiphorus.
2Tim4:20 Erastus abode at Corinth: but Trophimus have I left at Miletum sick.
2Tim4:21 Do thy diligence to come before winter. Eubulus greeteth thee, and Pudens, and Linus, and Claudia, and all the brethren.
2Tim4:22 The Lord Jesus Christ be with thy spirit. Grace be with you. Amen.
Titus1:1 Paul, a servant of God, and an apostle of Jesus Christ, according to the faith of God's elect, and the acknowledging of the truth which is after godliness;
Titus1:2 In hope of eternal life, which God, that cannot lie, promised before the world began;
Titus1:3 But hath in due times manifested his word through preaching, which is committed unto me according to the commandment of God our Saviour;
Titus1:4 To Titus, mine own son after the common faith: Grace, mercy, and peace, from God the Father and the Lord Jesus Christ our Saviour.
Titus1:5 For this cause left I thee in Crete, that thou shouldest set in order the things that are wanting, and ordain elders in every city, as I had appointed thee:
Titus1:6 If any be blameless, the husband of one wife, having faithful children not accused of riot or unruly.
Titus1:7 For a bishop must be blameless, as the steward of God; not selfwilled, not soon angry, not given to wine, no striker, not given to filthy lucre;
Titus1:8 But a lover of hospitality, a lover of good men, sober, just, holy, temperate;
Titus1:9 Holding fast the faithful word as he hath been taught, that he may be able by sound doctrine both to exhort and to convince the gainsayers.
Titus1:10 For there are many unruly and vain talkers and deceivers, specially they of the circumcision:
Titus1:11 Whose mouths must be stopped, who subvert whole houses, teaching things which they ought not, for filthy lucre's sake.
Titus1:12 One of themselves, even a prophet of their own, said, The Cretians are alway liars, evil beasts, slow bellies.
Titus1:13 This witns is true. Wherefore rebuke them sharply, that they may be sound in the faith;
Titus1:14 Not giving heed to Jewish fables, and commandments of men, that turn from the truth.
Titus1:15 Unto the pure all things are pure: but unto them that are defiled and unbelieving is nothing pure; but even their mind and conscience is defiled.
Titus1:16 They profess that they know God; but in works they deny him, being abominable, and disobedient, and unto every good work reprobate.
Titus2:1 But speak thou the things which become sound doctrine:
Titus2:2 That the aged men be sober, grave, temperate, sound in faith, in charity, in patience.
Titus2:3 The aged women likewise, that they be in behaviour as becometh holiness, not false accusers, not given to much wine, teachers of good things;
Titus2:4 That they may teach the young women to be sober, to love their husbands, to love their children,
Titus2:5 To be discreet, chaste, keepers at home, good, obedient to their own husbands, that the word of God be not blasphemed.
Titus2:6 Young men likewise exhort to be sober minded.
Titus2:7 In all things shewing thyself a pattern of good works: in doctrine shewing uncorruptness, gravity, sincerity,
Titus2:8 Sound speech, that cannot be condemned; that he that is of the contrary part may be ashamed, having no evil thing to say of you.
Titus2:9 Exhort servants to be obedient unto their own masters, and to please them well in all things; not answering again;
Titus2:10 Not purloining, but shewing all good fidelity; that they may adorn the doctrine of God our Saviour in all things.
Titus2:11 For the grace of God that bringeth salvation hath appeared to all men,
Titus2:12 Teaching us that, denying ungodliness and worldly lusts, we should live soberly, righteously, and godly, in this present world;
Titus2:13 Looking for that blessed hope, and the glorious appearing of the great God and our Saviour Jesus Christ;
Titus2:14 Who gave himself for us, that he might redeem us from all iniquity, and purify unto himself a peculiar people, zealous of good works.
Titus2:15 These things speak, and exhort, and rebuke with all authority. Let no man despise thee.
Titus3:1 Put them in mind to be subject to principalities and powers, to obey magistrates, to be ready to every good work,
Titus3:2 To speak evil of no man, to be no brawlers, but gentle, shewing all meekness unto all men.
Titus3:3 For we ourselves also were sometimes foolish, disobedient, deceived, serving divers lusts and pleasures, living in malice and envy, hateful, and hating one another.
Titus3:4 But after that the kindness and love of God our Saviour toward man appeared,
Titus3:5 Not by works of righteousness which we have done, but according to his mercy he saved us, by the washing of regeneration, and renewing of the Holy Ghost;
Titus3:6 Which he shed on us abundantly through Jesus Christ our Saviour;
Titus3:7 That being justified by his grace, we should be made heirs according to the hope of eternal life.
Titus3:8 This is a faithful saying, and these things I will that thou affirm constantly, that they which have believed in God might be careful to maintain good works. These things are good and profitable unto men.
Titus3:9 But avoid foolish questions, and genealogies, and contentions, and strivings about the law; for they are unprofitable and vain.
Titus3:10 A man that is an heretick after the first and second admonition reject;
Titus3:11 Knowing that he that is such is subverted, and sinneth, being condemned of himself.
Titus3:12 When I shall send Artemas unto thee, or Tychicus, be diligent to come unto me to Nicopolis: for I have determined there to winter.
Titus3:13 Bring Zenas the lawyer and Apollos on their journey diligently, that nothing be wanting unto them.
Titus3:14 And let ours also learn to maintain good works for necessary uses, that they be not unfruitful.
Titus3:15 All that are with me salute thee. Greet them that love us in the faith. Grace be with you all. Amen.
Phmn1:1 Paul, a prisoner of Jesus Christ, and Timothy our brother, unto Philemon our dearly beloved, and fellowlabourer,
Phmn1:2 And to our beloved Apphia, and Archippus our fellowsoldier, and to the church in thy house:
Phmn1:3 Grace to you, and peace, from God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ.
Phmn1:4 I thank my God, making mention of thee always in my prayers,
Phmn1:5 Hearing of thy love and faith, which thou hast toward the Lord Jesus, and toward all saints;
Phmn1:6 That the communication of thy faith may become effectual by the acknowledging of every good thing which is in you in Christ Jesus.
Phmn1:7 For we have great joy and consolation in thy love, because the bowels of the saints are refreshed by thee, brother.
Phmn1:8 Wherefore, though I might be much bold in Christ to enjoin thee that which is convenient,
Phmn1:9 Yet for love's sake I rather beseech thee, being such an one as Paul the aged, and now also a prisoner of Jesus Christ.
Phmn1:10 I beseech thee for my son Onesimus, whom I have begotten in my bonds:
Phmn1:11 Which in time past was to thee unprofitable, but now profitable to thee and to me:
Phmn1:12 Whom I have sent again: thou therefore receive him, that is, mine own bowels:
Phmn1:13 Whom I would have retained with me, that in thy stead he might have ministered unto me in the bonds of the gospel:
Phmn1:14 But without thy mind would I do nothing; that thy benefit should not be as it were of necessity, but willingly.
Phmn1:15 For perhaps he therefore departed for a season, that thou shouldest receive him for ever;
Phmn1:16 Not now as a servant, but above a servant, a brother beloved, specially to me, but how much more unto thee, both in the flesh, and in the Lord?
Phmn1:17 If thou count me therefore a partner, receive him as myself.
Phmn1:18 If he hath wronged thee, or oweth thee ought, put that on mine account;
Phmn1:19 I Paul have written it with mine own hand, I will repay it: albeit I do not say to thee how thou owest unto me even thine own self besides.
Phmn1:20 Yea, brother, let me have joy of thee in the Lord: refresh my bowels in the Lord.
Phmn1:21 Having confidence in thy obedience I wrote unto thee, knowing that thou wilt also do more than I say.
Phmn1:22 But withal prepare me also a lodging: for I trust that through your prayers I shall be given unto you.
Phmn1:23 There salute thee Epaphras, my fellowprisoner in Christ Jesus;
Phmn1:24 Marcus, Aristarchus, Demas, Lucas, my fellowlabourers.
Phmn1:25 The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with your spirit. Amen.
Heb1:1 God, who at sundry times and in divers manners spake in time past unto the fathers by the prophets,
Heb1:2 Hath in these last days spoken unto us by his Son, whom he hath appointed heir of all things, by whom also he made the worlds;
Heb1:3 Who being the brightness of his glory, and the express image of his person, and upholding all things by the word of his power, when he had by himself purged our sins, sat down on the right hand of the Majesty on high;
Heb1:4 Being made so much better than the angels, as he hath by inheritance obtained a more excellent name than they.
Heb1:5 For unto which of the angels said he at any time, Thou art my Son, this day have I begotten thee? And again, I will be to him a Father, and he shall be to me a Son?
Heb1:6 And again, when he bringeth in the firstbegotten into the world, he saith, And let all the angels of God worship him.
Heb1:7 And of the angels he saith, Who maketh his angels spirits, and his ministers a flame of fire.
Heb1:8 But unto the Son he saith, Thy throne, O God, is for ever and ever: a sceptre of righteousness is the sceptre of thy kingdom.
Heb1:9 Thou hast loved righteousness, and hated iniquity; therefore God, even thy God, hath anointed thee with the oil of gladness above thy fellows.
Heb1:10 And, Thou, Lord, in the beginning hast laid the foundation of the earth; and the heavens are the works of thine hands:
Heb1:11 They shall perish; but thou remainest; and they all shall wax old as doth a garment;
Heb1:12 And as a vesture shalt thou fold them up, and they shall be changed: but thou art the same, and thy years shall not fail.
Heb1:13 But to which of the angels said he at any time, Sit on myight hand, until I make thine enemies thy footstool?
Heb1:14 Are they not all ministering spirits, sent forth to minister for them who shall be heirs of salvation?
Heb2:1 Therefore we ought to give the more earnest heed to the things which we have heard, lest at any time we should let them slip.
Heb2:2 For if the word spoken by angels was stedfast, and every transgression and disobedience received a just recompence of reward;
Heb2:3 How shall we escape, if we neglect so great salvation; which at the first began to be spoken by the Lord, and was confirmed unto us by them that heard him;
Heb2:4 God also bearing them witness, both with signs and wonders, and with divers miracles, and gifts of the Holy Ghost, according to his own will?
Heb2:5 For unto the angels hath he not put in subjection the world to come, whereof we speak.
Heb2:6 But one in a certain place testified, saying, What is man, that thou art mindful of him? or the son of man, that thou visitest him?
Heb2:7 Thou madest him a little lower than the angels; thou crownedst him with glory and honour, and didst set him over the works of thy hands:
Heb2:8 Thou hast put all things in subjection under his feet. For in that he put all in subjection under him, he left nothing that is not put under him. But now we see not yet all things put under him.
Heb2:9 But we see Jesus, who was made a little lower than the angels for the suffering of death, crowned with glory and honour; that he by the grace of God should taste death for every man.
Heb2:10 For it became him, for whom are all things, and by whom are all things, in bringing many sons unto glory, to make the captain of their salvation perfect through sufferings.
Heb2:11 For both he that sanctifieth and they who are sanctified are all of one: for which cause he is not ashamed to call them brethren,
Heb2:12 Saying, I will declare thy name unto my brethren, in the midst of the church will I sing praise unto thee.
Heb2:13 And again, I will put my trust in him. And again, Behold I and the children which God hath given me.
Heb2:14 Forasmuch then as the children are partakers of flesh and blood, he also himself likewise took part of the same; that through death he might destroy him that had the power of death, that is, the devil;
Heb2:15 And deliver them who through fear of death were all their lifetime subject to bondage.
Heb2:16 For verily he took not on him the nature of angels; but he took on him the seed of Abraham.
Heb2:17 Wherefore in all things it behoved him to be made like unto his brethren, that he might be a merciful and faithful high priest in things pertaining to God, to make reconciliation for the sins of the people.
Heb2:18 For in that he himself hath suffered being tempted, he is able to succour them that are tempted.
Heb3:1 Wherefore, holy brethren, partakers of the heavenly calling, consider the Apostle and High Priest of our profession, Christ Jesus;
Heb3:2 Who was faithful to him that appointed him, as also Moses was faithful in all his house.
Heb3:3 For this man was counted worthy of more glory than Moses, inasmuch as he who hath builded the house hath more honour than the house.
Heb3:4 For every house is builded by some man; but he that built all things is God.
Heb3:5 And Moses verily was faithful in all his house, as a servant, for a testimony of those things which were to be spoken after;
Heb3:6 But Christ as a son over his own house; whose house are we, if we hold fast the confidence and the rejoicing of the hope firm unto the end.
Heb3:7 Wherefore (as the Holy Ghost saith, To day if ye will hear his voice,
Heb3:8 Harden not your hearts, as in the provocation, in the day of temptation in the wilderness:
Heb3:9 When your fathers tempted me, proved me, and saw my works forty years.
Heb3:10 Wherefore I was grieved with that generation, and said, They do alway err in their heart; and they have not known my ways.
Heb3:11 So I sware in my wrath, They shall not enter into my rest.)
Heb3:12 Take heed, brethren, lest there be in any of you an evil heart of unbelief, in departing from the living God.
Heb3:13 But exhort one another daily, while it is called To day; lest any of you be hardened through the deceitfulness of sin.
Heb3:14 For we are made partakers of Christ, if we hold the beginning of our confidence stedfast unto the end;
Heb3:15 While it is said, To day if ye will hear his voice, harden not your hearts, as in the provocation.
Heb3:16 For some, when they had heard, did provoke: howbeit not all that came out of Egypt by Moses.
Heb3:17 But with whom was he grieved forty years? was it not with them that had sinned, whose carcases fell in the wilderness?
Heb3:18 And to whom sware he that they should not enter into his rest, but to them that believed not?
Heb3:19 So we see that they could not enter in because of unbelief.
Heb4:1 Let us therefore fear, lest, a promise being left us of entering into his rest, any of you should seem to come short of it.
Heb4:2 For unto us was the gospel preached, as well as unto them: but the word preached did not profit them, not being mixed with faith in them that heard it.
Heb4:3 For we which have believed do enter into rest, as he said, As I have sworn in my wrath, if they shall enter into my rest: although the works were finished from the foundation of the world.
Heb4:4 For he spake in a certain place of the seventh day on this wise, And God did rest the seventh day from all his works.
Heb4:5 And in this place again, If they shall enter into my rest.
Heb4:6 Seeing therefore it remaineth that some must enter therein, and they to whom it was first preached entered not in because of unbelief:
Heb4:7 Again, he limiteth a certain day, saying in David, To day, after so long a time; as it is said, To day if ye will hear his voice, harden not your hearts.
Heb4:8 For if Jesus had given them rest, then would he not afterward have spoken of another day.
Heb4:9 There remaineth therefore a rest to the people of God.
Heb4:10 For he that is entered into his rest, he also hath ceased from his own works, as God did from his.
Heb4:11 Let us labour therefore to enter into that rest, lest any man fall after the same example of unbelief.
Heb4:12 For the word of God is quick, and powerful, and sharper than any twoedged sword, piercing even to the dividing asunder of soul and spirit, and of the joints and marrow, and is a discerner of the thoughts and intents of the heart.
Heb4:13 Neither is there any creature that is not manifest in his sight: but all things are naked and opened unto the eyes of him with whom we have to do.
Heb4:14 Seeing then that we have a great high priest, that is passed into the heavens, Jesus the Son of God, let us hold fast our profession.
Heb4:15 For we have not an high priest which cannot be touched with the feeling of our infirmities; but was in all points tempted like as we are, yet without sin.
Heb4:16 Let us therefore come boldly unto the throne of grace, that we may obtain mercy, and find grace to help in time of need.
Heb5:1 For every high priest taken from among men is ordained for men in things pertaining to God, that he may offer both gifts and sacrifices for sins:
Heb5:2 Who can have compassion on the ignorant, and on them that are out of the way; for that he himself also is compassed with infirmity.
Heb5:3 And by reason hereof he ought, as for the people, so also for himself, to offer for sins.
Heb5:4 And no man taketh this honour unto himself, but he that is called of God, as was Aaron.
Heb5:5 So also Christ glorified not himself to be made an high priest; but he that said unto him, Thou art my Son, to day have I begotten thee.
Heb5:6 As he saith also in another place, Thou art a priest for ever after the order of Melchisedec.
Heb5:7 Who in the days of his flesh, when he had offered up prayers and supplications with strong crying and tears unto him that was able to save him from death, and was heard in that he feared;
Heb5:8 Though he were a Son, yet learned he obedience by the things which he suffered;
Heb5:9 And being made perfect, he became the author of eternal salvation unto all them that obey him;
Heb5:10 Called of God an high priest after the order of Melchiset of the way; but let it rather be healed.
Heb12:14 Follow peace with all men, and holiness, without which no man shall see the Lord:
Heb12:15 Looking diligently lest any man fail of the grace of God; lest any root of bitterness springing up trouble you, and thereby many be defiled;
Heb12:16 Lest there be any fornicator, or profane person, as Esau, who for one morsel of meat sold his birthright.
Heb12:17 For ye know how that afterward, when he would have inherited the blessing, he was rejected: for he found no place of repentance, though he sought it carefully with tears.
Heb12:18 For ye are not come unto the mount that might be touched, and that burned with fire, nor unto blackness, and darkness, and tempest,
Heb12:19 And the sound of a trumpet, and the voice of words; which voice they that heard intreated that the word should not be spoken to them any more:
Heb12:20 (For they could not endure that which was commanded, And if so much as a beast touch the mountain, it shall be stoned, or thrust through with a dart:
Heb12:21 And so terrible was the sight, that Moses said, I exceedingly fear and quake:)
Heb12:22 But ye are come unto mount Sion, and unto the city of the living God, the heavenly Jerusalem, and to an innumerable company of angels,
Heb12:23 To the general assembly and church of the firstborn, which are written in heaven, and to God the Judge of all, and to the spirits of just men made perfect,
Heb12:24 And to Jesus the mediator of the new covenant, and to the blood of sprinkling, that speaketh better things than that of Abel.
Heb12:25 See that ye refuse not him that speaketh. For if they escaped not who refused him that spake on earth, much more shall not we escape, if we turn away from him that speaketh from heaven:
Heb12:26 Whose voice then shook the earth: but now he hath promised, saying, Yet once more I shake not the earth only, but also heaven.
Heb12:27 And this word, Yet once more, signifieth the removing of those things that are shaken, as of things that are made, that those things which cannot be shaken may remain.
Heb12:28 Wherefore we receiving a kingdom which cannot be moved, let us have grace, whereby we may serve God acceptably with reverence and godly fear:
Heb12:29 For our God is a consuming fire.
Heb13:1 Let brotherly love continue.
Heb13:2 Be not forgetful to entertain strangers: for thereby some have entertained angels unawares.
Heb13:3 Remember them that are in bonds, as bound with them; and them which suffer adversity, as being yourselves also in the body.
Heb13:4 Marriage is honourable in all, and the bed undefiled: but whoremongers and adulterers God will judge.
Heb13:5 Let your conversation be without covetousness; and be content with such things as ye have: for he hath said, I will never leave thee, nor forsake thee.
Heb13:6 So that we may boldly say, The Lord is my helper, and I will not fear what man shall do unto me.
Heb13:7 Remember them which have the rule over you, who have spoken unto you the word of God: whose faith follow, considering the end of their conversation.
Heb13:8 Jesus Christ the same yesterday, and to day, and for ever.
Heb13:9 Be not carried about with divers and strange doctrines. For it is a good thing that the heart be established with grace; not with meats, which have not profited them that have been occupied therein.
Heb13:10 We have an altar, whereof they have no right to eat which serve the tabernacle.
Heb13:11 For the bodies of those beasts, whose blood is brought into the sanctuary by the high priest for sin, are burned without the camp.
Heb13:12 Wherefore Jesus also, that he might sanctify the people with his own blood, suffered without the gate.
Heb13:13 Let us go forth therefore unto him without the camp, bearing his reproach.
Heb13:14 For here have we no continuing city, but we seek one to come.
Heb13:15 By him therefore let us offer the sacrifice of praise to God continually, that is, the fruit of our lips giving thanks to his name.
Heb13:16 But to do good and to communicate forget not: for with such sacrifices God is well pleased.
Heb13:17 Obey them that have the rule over you, and submit yourselves: for they watch for your souls, as they that must give account, that they may do it with joy, and not with grief: for that is unprofitable for you.
Heb13:18 Pray for us: for we trust we have a good conscience, in all things willing to live honestly.
Heb13:19 But I beseech you the rather to do this, that I may be restored to you the sooner.
Heb13:20 Now the God of peace, that brought again from the dead our Lord Jesus, that great shepherd of the sheep, through the blood of the everlasting covenant,
Heb13:21 Make you perfect in every good work to do his will, working in you that which is wellpleasing in his sight, through Jesus Christ; to whom be glory for ever and ever. Amen.
Heb13:22 And I beseech you, brethren, suffer the word of exhortation: for I have written a letter unto you in few words.
Heb13:23 Know ye that our brother Timothy is set at liberty; with whom, if he come shortly, I will see you.
Heb13:24 Salute all them that have the rule over you, and all the saints. They of Italy salute you.
Heb13:25 Grace be with you all. Amen.
Jas1:1 James, a servant of God and of the Lord Jesus Christ, to the twelve tribes which are scattered abroad, greeting.
Jas1:2 My brethren, count it all joy when ye fall into divers temptations;
Jas1:3 Knowing this, that the trying of your faith worketh patience.
Jas1:4 But let patience have her perfect work, that ye may be perfect and entire, wanting nothing.
Jas1:5 If any of you lack wisdom, let him ask of God, that giveth to all men liberally, and upbraideth not; and it shall be given him.
Jas1:6 But let him ask in faith, nothing wavering. For he that wavereth is like a wave of the sea driven with the wind and tossed.
Jas1:7 For let not that man think that he shall receive any thing of the Lord.
Jas1:8 A double minded man is unstable in all his ways.
Jas1:9 Let the brother of low degree rejoice in that he is exalted:
Jas1:10 But the rich, in that he is made low: because as the flower of the grass he shall pass away.
Jas1:11 For the sun is no sooner risen with a burning heat, but it withereth the grass, and the flower thereof falleth, and the grace of the fashion of it perisheth: so also shall the rich man fade away in his ways.
Jas1:12 Blessed is the man that endureth temptation: for when he is tried, he shall receive the crown of life, which the Lord hath promised to them that love him.
Jas1:13 Let no man say when he is tempted, I am tempted of God: for God cannot be tempted with evil, neither tempteth he any man:
Jas1:14 But every man is tempted, when he is drawn away of his own lust, and enticed.
Jas1:15 Then when lust hath conceived, it bringeth forth sin: and sin, when it is finished, bringeth forth death.
Jas1:16 Do not err, my beloved brethren.
Jas1:17 Every good gift and every perfect gift is from above, and cometh down from the Father of lights, with whom is no variableness, neither shadow of turning.
Jas1:18 Of his own will begat he us with the word of truth, that we should be a kind of firstfruits of his creatures.
Jas1:19 Wherefore, my beloved brethren, let every man be swift to hear, slow to speak, slow to wrath:
Jas1:20 For the wrath of man worketh not the righteousness of God.
Jas1:21 Wherefore lay apart all filthiness and superfluity of naughtiness, and receive with meekness the engrafted word, which is able to save your souls.
Jas1:22 But be ye doers of the word, and not hearers only, deceiving your own selves.
Jas1:23 For if any be a hearer of the word, and not a doer, he is like unto a man beholding his natural face in a glass:
Jas1:24 For he beholdeth himself, and goeth his way, and straightway forgetteth what manner of man he was.
Jas1:25 But whoso looketh into the perfect law of liberty, and continueth therein, he being not a forgetful hearer, but a doer of the work, this man shall be blessed in his deed.
Jas1:26 If any man among you seem to be religious, and bridleth not his tongue, but deceiveth his own heart, this man's religion is vain.
Jas1:27 Pure religion and undefiled before God and the Father is this, To sit the fatherless and widows in their affliction, and to keep himself unspotted from the world.
Jas2:1 My brethren, have not the faith of our Lord Jesus Christ, the Lord of glory, with respect of persons.
Jas2:2 For if there come unto your assembly a man with a gold ring, in goodly apparel, and there come in also a poor man in vile raiment;
Jas2:3 And ye have respect to him that weareth the gay clothing, and say unto him, Sit thou here in a good place; and say to the poor, Stand thou there, or sit here under my footstool:
Jas2:4 Are ye not then partial in yourselves, and are become judges of evil thoughts?
Jas2:5 Hearken, my beloved brethren, Hath not God chosen the poor of this world rich in faith, and heirs of the kingdom which he hath promised to them that love him?
Jas2:6 But ye have despised the poor. Do not rich men oppress you, and draw you before the judgment seats?
Jas2:7 Do not they blaspheme that worthy name by the which ye are called?
Jas2:8 If ye fulfil the royal law according to the scripture, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself, ye do well:
Jas2:9 But if ye have respect to persons, ye commit sin, and are convinced of the law as transgressors.
Jas2:10 For whosoever shall keep the whole law, and yet offend in one point, he is guilty of all.
Jas2:11 For he that said, Do not commit adultery, said also, Do not kill. Now if thou commit no adultery, yet if thou kill, thou art become a transgressor of the law.
Jas2:12 So speak ye, and so do, as they that shall be judged by the law of liberty.
Jas2:13 For he shall have judgment without mercy, that hath shewed no mercy; and mercy rejoiceth against judgment.
Jas2:14 What doth it profit, my brethren, though a man say he hath faith, and have not works? can faith save him?
Jas2:15 If a brother or sister be naked, and destitute of daily food,
Jas2:16 And one of you say unto them, Depart in peace, be ye warmed and filled; notwithstanding ye give them not those things which are needful to the body; what doth it profit?
Jas2:17 Even so faith, if it hath not works, is dead, being alone.
Jas2:18 Yea, a man may say, Thou hast faith, and I have works: shew me thy faith without thy works, and I will shew thee my faith by my works.
Jas2:19 Thou believest that there is one God; thou doest well: the devils also believe, and tremble.
Jas2:20 But wilt thou know, O vain man, that faith without works is dead?
Jas2:21 Was not Abraham our father justified by works, when he had offered Isaac his son upon the altar?
Jas2:22 Seest thou how faith wrought with his works, and by works was faith made perfect?
Jas2:23 And the scripture was fulfilled which saith, Abraham believed God, and it was imputed unto him for righteousness: and he was called the Friend of God.
Jas2:24 Ye see then how that by works a man is justified, and not by faith only.
Jas2:25 Likewise also was not Rahab the harlot justified by works, when she had received the messengers, and had sent them out another way?
Jas2:26 For as the body without the spirit is dead, so faith without works is dead also.
Jas3:1 My brethren, be not many masters, knowing that we shall receive the greater condemnation.
Jas3:2 For in many things we offend all. If any man offend not in word, the same is a perfect man, and able also to bridle the whole body.
Jas3:3 Behold, we put bits in the horses' mouths, that they may obey us; and we turn about their whole body.
Jas3:4 Behold also the ships, which though they be so great, and are driven of fierce winds, yet are they turned about with a very small helm, whithersoever the governor listeth.
Jas3:5 Even so the tongue is a little member, and boasteth great things. Behold, how great a matter a little fire kindleth!
Jas3:6 And the tongue is a fire, a world of iniquity: so is the tongue among our members, that it defileth the whole body, and setteth on fire the course of nature; and it is set on fire of hell.
Jas3:7 For every kind of beasts, and of birds, and of serpents, and of things in the sea, is tamed, and hath been tamed of mankind:
Jas3:8 But the tongue can no man tame; it is an unruly evil, full of deadly poison.
Jas3:9 Therewith bless we God, even the Father; and therewith curse we men, which are made after the similitude of God.
Jas3:10 Out of the same mouth proceedeth blessing and cursing. My brethren, these things ought not so to be.
Jas3:11 Doth a fountain send forth at the same place sweet water and bitter?
Jas3:12 Can the fig tree, my brethren, bear olive berries? either a vine, figs? so can no fountain both yield salt water and fresh.
Jas3:13 Who is a wise man and endued with knowledge among you? let him shew out of a good conversation his works with meekness of wisdom.
Jas3:14 But if ye have bitter envying and strife in your hearts, glory not, and lie not against the truth.
Jas3:15 This wisdom descendeth not from above, but is earthly, sensual, devilish.
Jas3:16 For where envying and strife is, there is confusion and every evil work.
Jas3:17 But the wisdom that is from above is first pure, then peaceable, gentle, and easy to be intreated, full of mercy and good fruits, without partiality, and without hypocrisy.
Jas3:18 And the fruit of righteousness is sown in peace of them that make peace.
Jas4:1 From whence come wars and fightings among you? come they not hence, even of your lusts that war in your members?
Jas4:2 Ye lust, and have not: ye kill, and desire to have, and cannot obtain: ye fight and war, yet ye have not, because ye ask not.
Jas4:3 Ye ask, and receive not, because ye ask amiss, that ye may consume it upon your lusts.
Jas4:4 Ye adulterers and adulteresses, know ye not that the friendship of the world is enmity with God? whosoever therefore will be a friend of the world is the enemy of God.
Jas4:5 Do ye think that the scripture saith in vain, The spirit that dwelleth in us lusteth to envy?
Jas4:6 But he giveth more grace. Wherefore he saith, God resisteth the proud, but giveth grace unto the humble.
Jas4:7 Submit yourselves therefore to God. Resist the devil, and he will flee from you.
Jas4:8 Draw nigh to God, and he will draw nigh to you. Cleanse your hands, ye sinners; and purify your hearts, ye double minded.
Jas4:9 Be afflicted, and mourn, and weep: let your laughter be turned to mourning, and your joy to heaviness.
Jas4:10 Humble yourselves in the sight of the Lord, and he shall lift you up.
Jas4:11 Speak not evil one of another, brethren. He that speaketh evil of his brother, and judgeth his brother, speaketh evil of the law, and judgeth the law: but if thou judge the law, thou art not a doer of the law, but a judge.
Jas4:12 There is one lawgiver, who is able to save and to destroy: who art thou that judgest another?
Jas4:13 Go to now, ye that say, To day or to morrow we will go into such a city, and continue there a year, and buy and sell, and get gain:
Jas4:14 Whereas ye know not what shall be on the morrow. For what is your life? It is even a vapour, that appeareth for a little time, and then vanisheth away.
Jas4:15 For that ye ought to say, If the Lord will, we shall live, and do this, or that.
Jas4:16 But now ye rejoice in your boastings: all such rejoicing is evil.
Jas4:17 Therefore to him that knoweth to do good, and doeth it not, to him it is sin.
Jas5:1 Go to now, ye rich men, weep and howl for your miseries that shall come upon you.
Jas5:2 Your riches are corrupted, and your garments are motheaten.
Jas5:3 Your gold and silver is cankered; and the rust of them shall be a witness against you, and shall eat your flesh as it were fire. Ye have heaped treasure together for the last days.
Jas5:4 Behold, the hire of the labourers who have reaped down your fields, which is of you kept back by fraud, crieth: and the cries of them which have reaped are entered into the ears of the Lord of sabaoth.
Jas5:5 Ye have lived in pleasure on the earth, and been wanton; ye have nourished your hearts, as in a day of slaughter.
Jas5:6 Ye have condemned and killed the just; and he doth not resist you.
Jas5:7 Be patient therefore, brethren, unto the coming of the Lord. Behold, the husbandman waiteth for the precious fruit of the earth, and hath long patience for it, until he receive the early a latter rain.
Jas5:8 Be ye also patient; stablish your hearts: for the coming of the Lord draweth nigh.
Jas5:9 Grudge not one against another, brethren, lest ye be condemned: behold, the judge standeth before the door.
Jas5:10 Take, my brethren, the prophets, who have spoken in the name of the Lord, for an example of suffering affliction, and of patience.
Jas5:11 Behold, we count them happy which endure. Ye have heard of the patience of Job, and have seen the end of the Lord; that the Lord is very pitiful, and of tender mercy.
Jas5:12 But above all things, my brethren, swear not, neither by heaven, neither by the earth, neither by any other oath: but let your yea be yea; and your nay, nay; lest ye fall into condemnation.
Jas5:13 Is any among you afflicted? let him pray. Is any merry? let him sing psalms.
Jas5:14 Is any sick among you? let him call for the elders of the church; and let them pray over him, anointing him with oil in the name of the Lord:
Jas5:15 And the prayer of faith shall save the sick, and the Lord shall raise him up; and if he have committed sins, they shall be forgiven him.
Jas5:16 Confess your faults one to another, and pray one for another, that ye may be healed. The effectual fervent prayer of a righteous man availeth much.
Jas5:17 Elias was a man subject to like passions as we are, and he prayed earnestly that it might not rain: and it rained not on the earth by the space of three years and six months.
Jas5:18 And he prayed again, and the heaven gave rain, and the earth brought forth her fruit.
Jas5:19 Brethren, if any of you do err from the truth, and one convert him;
Jas5:20 Let him know, that he which converteth the sinner from the error of his way shall save a soul from death, and shall hide a multitude of sins.
1Pet1:1 Peter, an apostle of Jesus Christ, to the strangers scattered throughout Pontus, Galatia, Cappadocia, Asia, and Bithynia,
1Pet1:2 Elect according to the foreknowledge of God the Father, through sanctification of the Spirit, unto obedience and sprinkling of the blood of Jesus Christ: Grace unto you, and peace, be multiplied.
1Pet1:3 Blessed be the God and Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, which according to his abundant mercy hath begotten us again unto a lively hope by the resurrection of Jesus Christ from the dead,
1Pet1:4 To an inheritance incorruptible, and undefiled, and that fadeth not away, reserved in heaven for you,
1Pet1:5 Who are kept by the power of God through faith unto salvation ready to be revealed in the last time.
1Pet1:6 Wherein ye greatly rejoice, though now for a season, if need be, ye are in heaviness through manifold temptations:
1Pet1:7 That the trial of your faith, being much more precious than of gold that perisheth, though it be tried with fire, might be found unto praise and honour and glory at the appearing of Jesus Christ:
1Pet1:8 Whom having not seen, ye love; in whom, though now ye see him not, yet believing, ye rejoice with joy unspeakable and full of glory:
1Pet1:9 Receiving the end of your faith, even the salvation of your souls.
1Pet1:10 Of which salvation the prophets have enquired and searched diligently, who prophesied of the grace that should come unto you:
1Pet1:11 Searching what, or what manner of time the Spirit of Christ which was in them did signify, when it testified beforehand the sufferings of Christ, and the glory that should follow.
1Pet1:12 Unto whom it was revealed, that not unto themselves, but unto us they did minister the things, which are now reported unto you by them that have preached the gospel unto you with the Holy Ghost sent down from heaven; which things the angels desire to look into.
1Pet1:13 Wherefore gird up the loins of your mind, be sober, and hope to the end for the grace that is to be brought unto you at the revelation of Jesus Christ;
1Pet1:14 As obedient children, not fashioning yourselves according to the former lusts in your ignorance:
1Pet1:15 But as he which hath called you is holy, so be ye holy in all manner of conversation;
1Pet1:16 Because it is written, Be ye holy; for I am holy.
1Pet1:17 And if ye call on the Father, who without respect of persons judgeth according to every man's work, pass the time of your sojourning here in fear:
1Pet1:18 Forasmuch as ye know that ye were not redeemed with corruptible things, as silver and gold, from your vain conversation received by tradition from your fathers;
1Pet1:19 But with the precious blood of Christ, as of a lamb without blemish and without spot:
1Pet1:20 Who verily was foreordained before the foundation of the world, but was manifest in these last times for you,
1Pet1:21 Who by him do believe in God, that raised him up from the dead, and gave him glory; that your faith and hope might be in God.
1Pet1:22 Seeing ye have purified your souls in obeying the truth through the Spirit unto unfeigned love of the brethren, see that ye love one another with a pure heart fervently:
1Pet1:23 Being born again, not of corruptible seed, but of incorruptible, by the word of God, which liveth and abideth for ever.
1Pet1:24 For all flesh is as grass, and all the glory of man as the flower of grass. The grass withereth, and the flower thereof falleth away:
1Pet1:25 But the word of the Lord endureth for ever. And this is the word which by the gospel is preached unto you.
1Pet2:1 Wherefore laying aside all malice, and all guile, and hypocrisies, and envies, and all evil speakings,
1Pet2:2 As newborn babes, desire the sincere milk of the word, that ye may grow thereby:
1Pet2:3 If so be ye have tasted that the Lord is gracious.
1Pet2:4 To whom coming, as unto a living stone, disallowed indeed of men, but chosen of God, and precious,
1Pet2:5 Ye also, as lively stones, are built up a spiritual house, an holy priesthood, to offer up spiritual sacrifices, acceptable to God by Jesus Christ.
1Pet2:6 Wherefore also it is contained in the scripture, Behold, I lay in Sion a chief corner stone, elect, precious: and he that believeth on him shall not be confounded.
1Pet2:7 Unto you therefore which believe he is precious: but unto them which be disobedient, the stone which the builders disallowed, the same is made the head of the corner,
1Pet2:8 And a stone of stumbling, and a rock of offence, even to them which stumble at the word, being disobedient: whereunto also they were appointed.
1Pet2:9 But ye are a chosen generation, a royal priesthood, an holy nation, a peculiar people; that ye should shew forth the praises of him who hath called you out of darkness into his marvellous light:
1Pet2:10 Which in time past were not a people, but are now the people of God: which had not obtained mercy, but now have obtained mercy.
1Pet2:11 Dearly beloved, I beseech you as strangers and pilgrims, abstain from fleshly lusts, which war against the soul;
1Pet2:12 Having your conversation honest among the Gentiles: that, whereas they speak against you as evildoers, they may by your good works, which they shall behold, glorify God in the day of visitation.
1Pet2:13 Submit yourselves to every ordinance of man for the Lord's sake: whether it be to the king, as supreme;
1Pet2:14 Or unto governors, as unto them that are sent by him for the punishment of evildoers, and for the praise of them that do well.
1Pet2:15 For so is the will of God, that with well doing ye may put to silence the ignorance of foolish men:
1Pet2:16 As free, and not using your liberty for a cloke of maliciousness, but as the servants of God.
1Pet2:17 Honour all men. Love the brotherhood. Fear God. Honour the king.
1Pet2:18 Servants, be subject to your masters with all fear; not only to the good and gentle, but also to the froward.
1Pet2:19 For this is thankworthy, if a man for conscience toward God endure grief, suffering wrongfully.
1Pet2:20 For what glory is it, if, when ye be buffeted for your faults, ye shall take it patiently? but if, when ye do well, and suffer for it, ye take it patiently, this is acceptable with God.
1Pet2:21 For even hereunto were ye called: because Christ also suffered for us, leaving us an example, that ye should follow his steps:
1Pet2:22 Who did no sin, neither was guile found in his mouth:
1Pet2:23 Who, when he was revilcompassion from him, how dwelleth the love of God in him?
1Jn3:18 My little children, let us not love in word, neither in tongue; but in deed and in truth.
1Jn3:19 And hereby we know that we are of the truth, and shall assure our hearts before him.
1Jn3:20 For if our heart condemn us, God is greater than our heart, and knoweth all things.
1Jn3:21 Beloved, if our heart condemn us not, then have we confidence toward God.
1Jn3:22 And whatsoever we ask, we receive of him, because we keep his commandments, and do those things that are pleasing in his sight.
1Jn3:23 And this is his commandment, That we should believe on the name of his Son Jesus Christ, and love one another, as he gave us commandment.
1Jn3:24 And he that keepeth his commandments dwelleth in him, and he in him. And hereby we know that he abideth in us, by the Spirit which he hath given us.
1Jn4:1 Beloved, believe not every spirit, but try the spirits whether they are of God: because many false prophets are gone out into the world.
1Jn4:2 Hereby know ye the Spirit of God: Every spirit that confesseth that Jesus Christ is come in the flesh is of God:
1Jn4:3 And every spirit that confesseth not that Jesus Christ is come in the flesh is not of God: and this is that spirit of antichrist, whereof ye have heard that it should come; and even now already is it in the world.
1Jn4:4 Ye are of God, little children, and have overcome them: because greater is he that is in you, than he that is in the world.
1Jn4:5 They are of the world: therefore speak they of the world, and the world heareth them.
1Jn4:6 We are of God: he that knoweth God heareth us; he that is not of God heareth not us. Hereby know we the spirit of truth, and the spirit of error.
1Jn4:7 Beloved, let us love one another: for love is of God; and every one that loveth is born of God, and knoweth God.
1Jn4:8 He that loveth not knoweth not God; for God is love.
1Jn4:9 In this was manifested the love of God toward us, because that God sent his only begotten Son into the world, that we might live through him.
1Jn4:10 Herein is love, not that we loved God, but that he loved us, and sent his Son to be the propitiation for our sins.
1Jn4:11 Beloved, if God so loved us, we ought also to love one another.
1Jn4:12 No man hath seen God at any time. If we love one another, God dwelleth in us, and his love is perfected in us.
1Jn4:13 Hereby know we that we dwell in him, and he in us, because he hath given us of his Spirit.
1Jn4:14 And we have seen and do testify that the Father sent the Son to be the Saviour of the world.
1Jn4:15 Whosoever shall confess that Jesus is the Son of God, God dwelleth in him, and he in God.
1Jn4:16 And we have known and believed the love that God hath to us. God is love; and he that dwelleth in love dwelleth in God, and God in him.
1Jn4:17 Herein is our love made perfect, that we may have boldness in the day of judgment: because as he is, so are we in this world.
1Jn4:18 There is no fear in love; but perfect love casteth out fear: because fear hath torment. He that feareth is not made perfect in love.
1Jn4:19 We love him, because he first loved us.
1Jn4:20 If a man say, I love God, and hateth his brother, he is a liar: for he that loveth not his brother whom he hath seen, how can he love God whom he hath not seen?
1Jn4:21 And this commandment have we from him, That he who loveth God love his brother also.
1Jn5:1 Whosoever believeth that Jesus is the Christ is born of God: and every one that loveth him that begat loveth him also that is begotten of him.
1Jn5:2 By this we know that we love the children of God, when we love God, and keep his commandments.
1Jn5:3 For this is the love of God, that we keep his commandments: and his commandments are not grievous.
1Jn5:4 For whatsoever is born of God overcometh the world: and this is the victory that overcometh the world, even our faith.
1Jn5:5 Who is he that overcometh the world, but he that believeth that Jesus is the Son of God?
1Jn5:6 This is he that came by water and blood, even Jesus Christ; not by water only, but by water and blood. And it is the Spirit that beareth witness, because the Spirit is truth.
1Jn5:7 For there are three that bear record in heaven, the Father, the Word, and the Holy Ghost: and these three are one.
1Jn5:8 And there are three that bear witness in earth, the Spirit, and the water, and the blood: and these three agree in one.
1Jn5:9 If we receive the witness of men, the witness of God is greater: for this is the witness of God which he hath testified of his Son.
1Jn5:10 He that believeth on the Son of God hath the witness in himself: he that believeth not God hath made him a liar; because he believeth not the record that God gave of his Son.
1Jn5:11 And this is the record, that God hath given to us eternal life, and this life is in his Son.
1Jn5:12 He that hath the Son hath life; and he that hath not the Son of God hath not life.
1Jn5:13 These things have I written unto you that believe on the name of the Son of God; that ye may know that ye have eternal life, and that ye may believe on the name of the Son of God.
1Jn5:14 And this is the confidence that we have in him, that, if we ask any thing according to his will, he heareth us:
1Jn5:15 And if we know that he hear us, whatsoever we ask, we know that we have the petitions that we desired of him.
1Jn5:16 If any man see his brother sin a sin which is not unto death, he shall ask, and he shall give him life for them that sin not unto death. There is a sin unto death: I do not say that he shall pray for it.
1Jn5:17 All unrighteousness is sin: and there is a sin not unto death.
1Jn5:18 We know that whosoever is born of God sinneth not; but he that is begotten of God keepeth himself, and that wicked one toucheth him not.
1Jn5:19 And we know that we are of God, and the whole world lieth in wickedness.
1Jn5:20 And we know that the Son of God is come, and hath given us an understanding, that we may know him that is true, and we are in him that is true, even in his Son Jesus Christ. This is the true God, and eternal life.
1Jn5:21 Little children, keep yourselves from idols. Amen.
2Jn1:1 The elder unto the elect lady and her children, whom I love in the truth; and not I only, but also all they that have known the truth;
2Jn1:2 For the truth's sake, which dwelleth in us, and shall be with us for ever.
2Jn1:3 Grace be with you, mercy, and peace, from God the Father, and from the Lord Jesus Christ, the Son of the Father, in truth and love.
2Jn1:4 I rejoiced greatly that I found of thy children walking in truth, as we have received a commandment from the Father.
2Jn1:5 And now I beseech thee, lady, not as though I wrote a new commandment unto thee, but that which we had from the beginning, that we love one another.
2Jn1:6 And this is love, that we walk after his commandments. This is the commandment, That, as ye have heard from the beginning, ye should walk in it.
2Jn1:7 For many deceivers are entered into the world, who confess not that Jesus Christ is come in the flesh. This is a deceiver and an antichrist.
2Jn1:8 Look to yourselves, that we lose not those things which we have wrought, but that we receive a full reward.
2Jn1:9 Whosoever transgresseth, and abideth not in the doctrine of Christ, hath not God. He that abideth in the doctrine of Christ, he hath both the Father and the Son.
2Jn1:10 If there come any unto you, and bring not this doctrine, receive him not into your house, neither bid him God speed:
2Jn1:11 For he that biddeth him God speed is partaker of his evil deeds.
2Jn1:12 Having many things to write unto you, I would not write with paper and ink: but I trust to come unto you, and speak face to face, that our joy may be full.
2Jn1:13 The children of thy elect sister greet thee. Amen.
3Jn1:1 The elder unto the wellbeloved Gaius, whom I love in the truth.
3Jn1:2 Beloved, I wish above all things that thou mayest prosper and be in health, even as thy soul prospereth.
3Jn1:3 For I rejoiced greatly, when the brethren came and testified of the truth that is in thee, even as thou walkest in the truth.
3Jn1:4 I have no greater joy than to hear that my children walk in truth.
3Jn1:5 Beloved, tu doest faithfully whatsoever thou doest to the brethren, and to strangers;
3Jn1:6 Which have borne witness of thy charity before the church: whom if thou bring forward on their journey after a godly sort, thou shalt do well:
3Jn1:7 Because that for his name's sake they went forth, taking nothing of the Gentiles.
3Jn1:8 We therefore ought to receive such, that we might be fellowhelpers to the truth.
3Jn1:9 I wrote unto the church: but Diotrephes, who loveth to have the preeminence among them, receiveth us not.
3Jn1:10 Wherefore, if I come, I will remember his deeds which he doeth, prating against us with malicious words: and not content therewith, neither doth he himself receive the brethren, and forbiddeth them that would, and casteth them out of the church.
3Jn1:11 Beloved, follow not that which is evil, but that which is good. He that doeth good is of God: but he that doeth evil hath not seen God.
3Jn1:12 Demetrius hath good report of all men, and of the truth itself: yea, and we also bear record; and ye know that our record is true.
3Jn1:13 I had many things to write, but I will not with ink and pen write unto thee:
3Jn1:14 But I trust I shall shortly see thee, and we shall speak face to face. Peace be to thee. Our friends salute thee. Greet the friends by name.
Jude1:1 Jude, the servant of Jesus Christ, and brother of James, to them that are sanctified by God the Father, and preserved in Jesus Christ, and called:
Jude1:2 Mercy unto you, and peace, and love, be multiplied.
Jude1:3 Beloved, when I gave all diligence to write unto you of the common salvation, it was needful for me to write unto you, and exhort you that ye should earnestly contend for the faith which was once delivered unto the saints.
Jude1:4 For there are certain men crept in unawares, who were before of old ordained to this condemnation, ungodly men, turning the grace of our God into lasciviousness, and denying the only Lord God, and our Lord Jesus Christ.
Jude1:5 I will therefore put you in remembrance, though ye once knew this, how that the Lord, having saved the people out of the land of Egypt, afterward destroyed them that believed not.
Jude1:6 And the angels which kept not their first estate, but left their own habitation, he hath reserved in everlasting chains under darkness unto the judgment of the great day.
Jude1:7 Even as Sodom and Gomorrha, and the cities about them in like manner, giving themselves over to fornication, and going after strange flesh, are set forth for an example, suffering the vengeance of eternal fire.
Jude1:8 Likewise also these filthy dreamers defile the flesh, despise dominion, and speak evil of dignities.
Jude1:9 Yet Michael the archangel, when contending with the devil he disputed about the body of Moses, durst not bring against him a railing accusation, but said, The Lord rebuke thee.
Jude1:10 But these speak evil of those things which they know not: but what they know naturally, as brute beasts, in those things they corrupt themselves.
Jude1:11 Woe unto them! for they have gone in the way of Cain, and ran greedily after the error of Balaam for reward, and perished in the gainsaying of Core.
Jude1:12 These are spots in your feasts of charity, when they feast with you, feeding themselves without fear: clouds they are without water, carried about of winds; trees whose fruit withereth, without fruit, twice dead, plucked up by the roots;
Jude1:13 Raging waves of the sea, foaming out their own shame; wandering stars, to whom is reserved the blackness of darkness for ever.
Jude1:14 And Enoch also, the seventh from Adam, prophesied of these, saying, Behold, the Lord cometh with ten thousands of his saints,
Jude1:15 To execute judgment upon all, and to convince all that are ungodly among them of all their ungodly deeds which they have ungodly committed, and of all their hard speeches which ungodly sinners have spoken against him.
Jude1:16 These are murmurers, complainers, walking after their own lusts; and their mouth speaketh great swelling words, having men's persons in admiration because of advantage.
Jude1:17 But, beloved, remember ye the words which were spoken before of the apostles of our Lord Jesus Christ;
Jude1:18 How that they told you there should be mockers in the last time, who should walk after their own ungodly lusts.
Jude1:19 These be they who separate themselves, sensual, having not the Spirit.
Jude1:20 But ye, beloved, building up yourselves on your most holy faith, praying in the Holy Ghost,
Jude1:21 Keep yourselves in the love of God, looking for the mercy of our Lord Jesus Christ unto eternal life.
Jude1:22 And of some have compassion, making a difference:
Jude1:23 And others save with fear, pulling them out of the fire; hating even the garment spotted by the flesh.
Jude1:24 Now unto him that is able to keep you from falling, and to present you faultless before the presence of his glory with exceeding joy,
Jude1:25 To the only wise God our Saviour, be glory and majesty, dominion and power, both now and ever. Amen.
Rev1:1 The Revelation of Jesus Christ, which God gave unto him, to shew unto his servants things which must shortly come to pass; and he sent and signified it by his angel unto his servant John:
Rev1:2 Who bare record of the word of God, and of the testimony of Jesus Christ, and of all things that he saw.
Rev1:3 Blessed is he that readeth, and they that hear the words of this prophecy, and keep those things which are written therein: for the time is at hand.
Rev1:4 John to the seven churches which are in Asia: Grace be unto you, and peace, from him which is, and which was, and which is to come; and from the seven Spirits which are before his throne;
Rev1:5 And from Jesus Christ, who is the faithful witness, and the first begotten of the dead, and the prince of the kings of the earth. Unto him that loved us, and washed us from our sins in his own blood,
Rev1:6 And hath made us kings and priests unto God and his Father; to him be glory and dominion for ever and ever. Amen.
Rev1:7 Behold, he cometh with clouds; and every eye shall see him, and they also which pierced him: and all kindreds of the earth shall wail because of him. Even so, Amen.
Rev1:8 I am Alpha and Omega, the beginning and the ending, saith the Lord, which is, and which was, and which is to come, the Almighty.
Rev1:9 I John, who also am your brother, and companion in tribulation, and in the kingdom and patience of Jesus Christ, was in the isle that is called Patmos, for the word of God, and for the testimony of Jesus Christ.
Rev1:10 I was in the Spirit on the Lord's day, and heard behind me a great voice, as of a trumpet,
Rev1:11 Saying, I am Alpha and Omega, the first and the last: and, What thou seest, write in a book, and send it unto the seven churches which are in Asia; unto Ephesus, and unto Smyrna, and unto Pergamos, and unto Thyatira, and unto Sardis, and unto Philadelphia, and unto Laodicea.
Rev1:12 And I turned to see the voice that spake with me. And being turned, I saw seven golden candlesticks;
Rev1:13 And in the midst of the seven candlesticks one like unto the Son of man, clothed with a garment down to the foot, and girt about the paps with a golden girdle.
Rev1:14 His head and his hairs were white like wool, as white as snow; and his eyes were as a flame of fire;
Rev1:15 And his feet like unto fine brass, as if they burned in a furnace; and his voice as the sound of many waters.
Rev1:16 And he had in his right hand seven stars: and out of his mouth went a sharp twoedged sword: and his countenance was as the sun shineth in his strength.
Rev1:17 And when I saw him, I fell at his feet as dead. And he laid his right hand upon me, saying unto me, Fear not; I am the first and the last:
Rev1:18 I am he that liveth, and was dead; and, behold, I am alive for evermore, Amen; and have the keys of hell and of death.
Rev1:19 Write the things which thou hast seen, and the things which are, and the things which shall be hereafter;
Rev1:20 The mystery of the seven stars which thou sawest in my right hand, and the seven golden candlesticks. The seven stars are the angels of the seven churches: and the seven candlesticks which thou sawest are theeven churches.
Rev2:1 Unto the angel of the church of Ephesus write; These things saith he that holdeth the seven stars in his right hand, who walketh in the midst of the seven golden candlesticks;
Rev2:2 I know thy works, and thy labour, and thy patience, and how thou canst not bear them which are evil: and thou hast tried them which say they are apostles, and are not, and hast found them liars:
Rev2:3 And hast borne, and hast patience, and for my name's sake hast laboured, and hast not fainted.
Rev2:4 Nevertheless I have somewhat against thee, because thou hast left thy first love.
Rev2:5 Remember therefore from whence thou art fallen, and repent, and do the first works; or else I will come unto thee quickly, and will remove thy candlestick out of his place, except thou repent.
Rev2:6 But this thou hast, that thou hatest the deeds of the Nicolaitanes, which I also hate.
Rev2:7 He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches; To him that overcometh will I give to eat of the tree of life, which is in the midst of the paradise of God.
Rev2:8 And unto the angel of the church in Smyrna write; These things saith the first and the last, which was dead, and is alive;
Rev2:9 I know thy works, and tribulation, and poverty, (but thou art rich) and I know the blasphemy of them which say they are Jews, and are not, but are the synagogue of Satan.
Rev2:10 Fear none of those things which thou shalt suffer: behold, the devil shall cast some of you into prison, that ye may be tried; and ye shall have tribulation ten days: be thou faithful unto death, and I will give thee a crown of life.
Rev2:11 He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches; He that overcometh shall not be hurt of the second death.
Rev2:12 And to the angel of the church in Pergamos write; These things saith he which hath the sharp sword with two edges;
Rev2:13 I know thy works, and where thou dwellest, even where Satan's seat is: and thou holdest fast my name, and hast not denied my faith, even in those days wherein Antipas was my faithful martyr, who was slain among you, where Satan dwelleth.
Rev2:14 But I have a few things against thee, because thou hast there them that hold the doctrine of Balaam, who taught Balac to cast a stumblingblock before the children of Israel, to eat things sacrificed unto idols, and to commit fornication.
Rev2:15 So hast thou also them that hold the doctrine of the Nicolaitanes, which thing I hate.
Rev2:16 Repent; or else I will come unto thee quickly, and will fight against them with the sword of my mouth.
Rev2:17 He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches; To him that overcometh will I give to eat of the hidden manna, and will give him a white stone, and in the stone a new name written, which no man knoweth saving he that receiveth it.
Rev2:18 And unto the angel of the church in Thyatira write; These things saith the Son of God, who hath his eyes like unto a flame of fire, and his feet are like fine brass;
Rev2:19 I know thy works, and charity, and service, and faith, and thy patience, and thy works; and the last to be more than the first.
Rev2:20 Notwithstanding I have a few things against thee, because thou sufferest that woman Jezebel, which calleth herself a prophetess, to teach and to seduce my servants to commit fornication, and to eat things sacrificed unto idols.
Rev2:21 And I gave her space to repent of her fornication; and she repented not.
Rev2:22 Behold, I will cast her into a bed, and them that commit adultery with her into great tribulation, except they repent of their deeds.
Rev2:23 And I will kill her children with death; and all the churches shall know that I am he which searcheth the reins and hearts: and I will give unto every one of you according to your works.
Rev2:24 But unto you I say, and unto the rest in Thyatira, as many as have not this doctrine, and which have not known the depths of Satan, as they speak; I will put upon you none other burden.
Rev2:25 But that which ye have already hold fast till I come.
Rev2:26 And he that overcometh, and keepeth my works unto the end, to him will I give power over the nations:
Rev2:27 And he shall rule them with a rod of iron; as the vessels of a potter shall they be broken to shivers: even as I received of my Father.
Rev2:28 And I will give him the morning star.
Rev2:29 He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches.
Rev3:1 And unto the angel of the church in Sardis write; These things saith he that hath the seven Spirits of God, and the seven stars; I know thy works, that thou hast a name that thou livest, and art dead.
Rev3:2 Be watchful, and strengthen the things which remain, that are ready to die: for I have not found thy works perfect before God.
Rev3:3 Remember therefore how thou hast received and heard, and hold fast, and repent. If therefore thou shalt not watch, I will come on thee as a thief, and thou shalt not know what hour I will come upon thee.
Rev3:4 Thou hast a few names even in Sardis which have not defiled their garments; and they shall walk with me in white: for they are worthy.
Rev3:5 He that overcometh, the same shall be clothed in white raiment; and I will not blot out his name out of the book of life, but I will confess his name before my Father, and before his angels.
Rev3:6 He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches.
Rev3:7 And to the angel of the church in Philadelphia write; These things saith he that is holy, he that is true, he that hath the key of David, he that openeth, and no man shutteth; and shutteth, and no man openeth;
Rev3:8 I know thy works: behold, I have set before thee an open door, and no man can shut it: for thou hast a little strength, and hast kept my word, and hast not denied my name.
Rev3:9 Behold, I will make them of the synagogue of Satan, which say they are Jews, and are not, but do lie; behold, I will make them to come and worship before thy feet, and to know that I have loved thee.
Rev3:10 Because thou hast kept the word of my patience, I also will keep thee from the hour of temptation, which shall come upon all the world, to try them that dwell upon the earth.
Rev3:11 Behold, I come quickly: hold that fast which thou hast, that no man take thy crown.
Rev3:12 Him that overcometh will I make a pillar in the temple of my God, and he shall go no more out: and I will write upon him the name of my God, and the name of the city of my God, which is new Jerusalem, which cometh down out of heaven from my God: and I will write upon him my new name.
Rev3:13 He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches.
Rev3:14 And unto the angel of the church of the Laodiceans write; These things saith the Amen, the faithful and true witness, the beginning of the creation of God;
Rev3:15 I know thy works, that thou art neither cold nor hot: I would thou wert cold or hot.
Rev3:16 So then because thou art lukewarm, and neither cold nor hot, I will spue thee out of my mouth.
Rev3:17 Because thou sayest, I am rich, and increased with goods, and have need of nothing; and knowest not that thou art wretched, and miserable, and poor, and blind, and naked:
Rev3:18 I counsel thee to buy of me gold tried in the fire, that thou mayest be rich; and white raiment, that thou mayest be clothed, and that the shame of thy nakedness do not appear; and anoint thine eyes with eyesalve, that thou mayest see.
Rev3:19 As many as I love, I rebuke and chasten: be zealous therefore, and repent.
Rev3:20 Behold, I stand at the door, and knock: if any man hear my voice, and open the door, I will come in to him, and will sup with him, and he with me.
Rev3:21 To him that overcometh will I grant to sit with me in my throne, even as I also overcame, and am set down with my Father in his throne.
Rev3:22 He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches.
Rev4:1 After this I looked, and, behold, a door was opened in heaven: and the first voice which I heard was as it were of a trumpet talking with me; which said, Come up hither, and I will shew thee things which must be hereafter.
Rev4:2 And immediately I w, so that he maketh fire come down from heaven on the earth in the sight of men,
Rev13:14 And deceiveth them that dwell on the earth by the means of those miracles which he had power to do in the sight of the beast; saying to them that dwell on the earth, that they should make an image to the beast, which had the wound by a sword, and did live.
Rev13:15 And he had power to give life unto the image of the beast, that the image of the beast should both speak, and cause that as many as would not worship the image of the beast should be killed.
Rev13:16 And he causeth all, both small and great, rich and poor, free and bond, to receive a mark in their right hand, or in their foreheads:
Rev13:17 And that no man might buy or sell, save he that had the mark, or the name of the beast, or the number of his name.
Rev13:18 Here is wisdom. Let him that hath understanding count the number of the beast: for it is the number of a man; and his number is Six hundred threescore and six.
Rev14:1 And I looked, and, lo, a Lamb stood on the mount Sion, and with him an hundred forty and four thousand, having his Father's name written in their foreheads.
Rev14:2 And I heard a voice from heaven, as the voice of many waters, and as the voice of a great thunder: and I heard the voice of harpers harping with their harps:
Rev14:3 And they sung as it were a new song before the throne, and before the four beasts, and the elders: and no man could learn that song but the hundred and forty and four thousand, which were redeemed from the earth.
Rev14:4 These are they which were not defiled with women; for they are virgins. These are they which follow the Lamb whithersoever he goeth. These were redeemed from among men, being the firstfruits unto God and to the Lamb.
Rev14:5 And in their mouth was found no guile: for they are without fault before the throne of God.
Rev14:6 And I saw another angel fly in the midst of heaven, having the everlasting gospel to preach unto them that dwell on the earth, and to every nation, and kindred, and tongue, and people,
Rev14:7 Saying with a loud voice, Fear God, and give glory to him; for the hour of his judgment is come: and worship him that made heaven, and earth, and the sea, and the fountains of waters.
Rev14:8 And there followed another angel, saying, Babylon is fallen, is fallen, that great city, because she made all nations drink of the wine of the wrath of her fornication.
Rev14:9 And the third angel followed them, saying with a loud voice, If any man worship the beast and his image, and receive his mark in his forehead, or in his hand,
Rev14:10 The same shall drink of the wine of the wrath of God, which is poured out without mixture into the cup of his indignation; and he shall be tormented with fire and brimstone in the presence of the holy angels, and in the presence of the Lamb:
Rev14:11 And the smoke of their torment ascendeth up for ever and ever: and they have no rest day nor night, who worship the beast and his image, and whosoever receiveth the mark of his name.
Rev14:12 Here is the patience of the saints: here are they that keep the commandments of God, and the faith of Jesus.
Rev14:13 And I heard a voice from heaven saying unto me, Write, Blessed are the dead which die in the Lord from henceforth: Yea, saith the Spirit, that they may rest from their labours; and their works do follow them.
Rev14:14 And I looked, and behold a white cloud, and upon the cloud one sat like unto the Son of man, having on his head a golden crown, and in his hand a sharp sickle.
Rev14:15 And another angel came out of the temple, crying with a loud voice to him that sat on the cloud, Thrust in thy sickle, and reap: for the time is come for thee to reap; for the harvest of the earth is ripe.
Rev14:16 And he that sat on the cloud thrust in his sickle on the earth; and the earth was reaped.
Rev14:17 And another angel came out of the temple which is in heaven, he also having a sharp sickle.
Rev14:18 And another angel came out from the altar, which had power over fire; and cried with a loud cry to him that had the sharp sickle, saying, Thrust in thy sharp sickle, and gather the clusters of the vine of the earth; for her grapes are fully ripe.
Rev14:19 And the angel thrust in his sickle into the earth, and gathered the vine of the earth, and cast it into the great winepress of the wrath of God.
Rev14:20 And the winepress was trodden without the city, and blood came out of the winepress, even unto the horse bridles, by the space of a thousand and six hundred furlongs.
Rev15:1 And I saw another sign in heaven, great and marvellous, seven angels having the seven last plagues; for in them is filled up the wrath of God.
Rev15:2 And I saw as it were a sea of glass mingled with fire: and them that had gotten the victory over the beast, and over his image, and over his mark, and over the number of his name, stand on the sea of glass, having the harps of God.
Rev15:3 And they sing the song of Moses the servant of God, and the song of the Lamb, saying, Great and marvellous are thy works, Lord God Almighty; just and true are thy ways, thou King of saints.
Rev15:4 Who shall not fear thee, O Lord, and glorify thy name? for thou only art holy: for all nations shall come and worship before thee; for thy judgments are made manifest.
Rev15:5 And after that I looked, and, behold, the temple of the tabernacle of the testimony in heaven was opened:
Rev15:6 And the seven angels came out of the temple, having the seven plagues, clothed in pure and white linen, and having their breasts girded with golden girdles.
Rev15:7 And one of the four beasts gave unto the seven angels seven golden vials full of the wrath of God, who liveth for ever and ever.
Rev15:8 And the temple was filled with smoke from the glory of God, and from his power; and no man was able to enter into the temple, till the seven plagues of the seven angels were fulfilled.
Rev16:1 And I heard a great voice out of the temple saying to the seven angels, Go your ways, and pour out the vials of the wrath of God upon the earth.
Rev16:2 And the first went, and poured out his vial upon the earth; and there fell a noisome and grievous sore upon the men which had the mark of the beast, and upon them which worshipped his image.
Rev16:3 And the second angel poured out his vial upon the sea; and it became as the blood of a dead man: and every living soul died in the sea.
Rev16:4 And the third angel poured out his vial upon the rivers and fountains of waters; and they became blood.
Rev16:5 And I heard the angel of the waters say, Thou art righteous, O Lord, which art, and wast, and shalt be, because thou hast judged thus.
Rev16:6 For they have shed the blood of saints and prophets, and thou hast given them blood to drink; for they are worthy.
Rev16:7 And I heard another out of the altar say, Even so, Lord God Almighty, true and righteous are thy judgments.
Rev16:8 And the fourth angel poured out his vial upon the sun; and power was given unto him to scorch men with fire.
Rev16:9 And men were scorched with great heat, and blasphemed the name of God, which hath power over these plagues: and they repented not to give him glory.
Rev16:10 And the fifth angel poured out his vial upon the seat of the beast; and his kingdom was full of darkness; and they gnawed their tongues for pain,
Rev16:11 And blasphemed the God of heaven because of their pains and their sores, and repented not of their deeds.
Rev16:12 And the sixth angel poured out his vial upon the great river Euphrates; and the water thereof was dried up, that the way of the kings of the east might be prepared.
Rev16:13 And I saw three unclean spirits like frogs come out of the mouth of the dragon, and out of the mouth of the beast, and out of the mouth of the false prophet.
Rev16:14 For they are the spirits of devils, working miracles, which go forth unto the kings of the earth and of the whole world, to gather them to the battle of that great day of God Almighty.
Rev16:15 Behold, I come as a thief. Blessed is he that watcheth, and keepeth his garments, lest he walk naked, and they see his shame.
Rev16:16 And he gathered them together into a place called in the Hebrew tgue Armageddon.
Rev16:17 And the seventh angel poured out his vial into the air; and there came a great voice out of the temple of heaven, from the throne, saying, It is done.
Rev16:18 And there were voices, and thunders, and lightnings; and there was a great earthquake, such as was not since men were upon the earth, so mighty an earthquake, and so great.
Rev16:19 And the great city was divided into three parts, and the cities of the nations fell: and great Babylon came in remembrance before God, to give unto her the cup of the wine of the fierceness of his wrath.
Rev16:20 And every island fled away, and the mountains were not found.
Rev16:21 And there fell upon men a great hail out of heaven, every stone about the weight of a talent: and men blasphemed God because of the plague of the hail; for the plague thereof was exceeding great.
Rev17:1 And there came one of the seven angels which had the seven vials, and talked with me, saying unto me, Come hither; I will shew unto thee the judgment of the great whore that sitteth upon many waters:
Rev17:2 With whom the kings of the earth have committed fornication, and the inhabitants of the earth have been made drunk with the wine of her fornication.
Rev17:3 So he carried me away in the spirit into the wilderness: and I saw a woman sit upon a scarlet coloured beast, full of names of blasphemy, having seven heads and ten horns.
Rev17:4 And the woman was arrayed in purple and scarlet colour, and decked with gold and precious stones and pearls, having a golden cup in her hand full of abominations and filthiness of her fornication:
Rev17:5 And upon her forehead was a name written, MYSTERY, BABYLON THE GREAT, THE MOTHER OF HARLOTS AND ABOMINATIONS OF THE EARTH.
Rev17:6 And I saw the woman drunken with the blood of the saints, and with the blood of the martyrs of Jesus: and when I saw her, I wondered with great admiration.
Rev17:7 And the angel said unto me, Wherefore didst thou marvel? I will tell thee the mystery of the woman, and of the beast that carrieth her, which hath the seven heads and ten horns.
Rev17:8 The beast that thou sawest was, and is not; and shall ascend out of the bottomless pit, and go into perdition: and they that dwell on the earth shall wonder, whose names were not written in the book of life from the foundation of the world, when they behold the beast that was, and is not, and yet is.
Rev17:9 And here is the mind which hath wisdom. The seven heads are seven mountains, on which the woman sitteth.
Rev17:10 And there are seven kings: five are fallen, and one is, and the other is not yet come; and when he cometh, he must continue a short space.
Rev17:11 And the beast that was, and is not, even he is the eighth, and is of the seven, and goeth into perdition.
Rev17:12 And the ten horns which thou sawest are ten kings, which have received no kingdom as yet; but receive power as kings one hour with the beast.
Rev17:13 These have one mind, and shall give their power and strength unto the beast.
Rev17:14 These shall make war with the Lamb, and the Lamb shall overcome them: for he is Lord of lords, and King of kings: and they that are with him are called, and chosen, and faithful.
Rev17:15 And he saith unto me, The waters which thou sawest, where the whore sitteth, are peoples, and multitudes, and nations, and tongues.
Rev17:16 And the ten horns which thou sawest upon the beast, these shall hate the whore, and shall make her desolate and naked, and shall eat her flesh, and burn her with fire.
Rev17:17 For God hath put in their hearts to fulfil his will, and to agree, and give their kingdom unto the beast, until the words of God shall be fulfilled.
Rev17:18 And the woman which thou sawest is that great city, which reigneth over the kings of the earth.
Rev18:1 And after these things I saw another angel come down from heaven, having great power; and the earth was lightened with his glory.
Rev18:2 And he cried mightily with a strong voice, saying, Babylon the great is fallen, is fallen, and is become the habitation of devils, and the hold of every foul spirit, and a cage of every unclean and hateful bird.
Rev18:3 For all nations have drunk of the wine of the wrath of her fornication, and the kings of the earth have committed fornication with her, and the merchants of the earth are waxed rich through the abundance of her delicacies.
Rev18:4 And I heard another voice from heaven, saying, Come out of her, my people, that ye be not partakers of her sins, and that ye receive not of her plagues.
Rev18:5 For her sins have reached unto heaven, and God hath remembered her iniquities.
Rev18:6 Reward her even as she rewarded you, and double unto her double according to her works: in the cup which she hath filled fill to her double.
Rev18:7 How much she hath glorified herself, and lived deliciously, so much torment and sorrow give her: for she saith in her heart, I sit a queen, and am no widow, and shall see no sorrow.
Rev18:8 Therefore shall her plagues come in one day, death, and mourning, and famine; and she shall be utterly burned with fire: for strong is the Lord God who judgeth her.
Rev18:9 And the kings of the earth, who have committed fornication and lived deliciously with her, shall bewail her, and lament for her, when they shall see the smoke of her burning,
Rev18:10 Standing afar off for the fear of her torment, saying, Alas, alas that great city Babylon, that mighty city! for in one hour is thy judgment come.
Rev18:11 And the merchants of the earth shall weep and mourn over her; for no man buyeth their merchandise any more:
Rev18:12 The merchandise of gold, and silver, and precious stones, and of pearls, and fine linen, and purple, and silk, and scarlet, and all thyine wood, and all manner vessels of ivory, and all manner vessels of most precious wood, and of brass, and iron, and marble,
Rev18:13 And cinnamon, and odours, and ointments, and frankincense, and wine, and oil, and fine flour, and wheat, and beasts, and sheep, and horses, and chariots, and slaves, and souls of men.
Rev18:14 And the fruits that thy soul lusted after are departed from thee, and all things which were dainty and goodly are departed from thee, and thou shalt find them no more at all.
Rev18:15 The merchants of these things, which were made rich by her, shall stand afar off for the fear of her torment, weeping and wailing,
Rev18:16 And saying, Alas, alas, that great city, that was clothed in fine linen, and purple, and scarlet, and decked with gold, and precious stones, and pearls!
Rev18:17 For in one hour so great riches is come to nought. And every shipmaster, and all the company in ships, and sailors, and as many as trade by sea, stood afar off,
Rev18:18 And cried when they saw the smoke of her burning, saying, What city is like unto this great city!
Rev18:19 And they cast dust on their heads, and cried, weeping and wailing, saying, Alas, alas, that great city, wherein were made rich all that had ships in the sea by reason of her costliness! for in one hour is she made desolate.
Rev18:20 Rejoice over her, thou heaven, and ye holy apostles and prophets; for God hath avenged you on her.
Rev18:21 And a mighty angel took up a stone like a great millstone, and cast it into the sea, saying, Thus with violence shall that great city Babylon be thrown down, and shall be found no more at all.
Rev18:22 And the voice of harpers, and musicians, and of pipers, and trumpeters, shall be heard no more at all in thee; and no craftsman, of whatsoever craft he be, shall be found any more in thee; and the sound of a millstone shall be heard no more at all in thee;
Rev18:23 And the light of a candle shall shine no more at all in thee; and the voice of the bridegroom and of the bride shall be heard no more at all in thee: for thy merchants were the great men of the earth; for by thy sorceries were all nations deceived.
Rev18:24 And in her was found the blood of prophets, and of saints, and of all that were slain upon the earth.
Rev19:1 And after these things I heard a great voice of much people in heaven, saying, Alleluia; Salvation, and glory, and honour, and power, unto the Lord our God:
Rev19:2 For true and righteous are his judgment for he hath judged the great whore, which did corrupt the earth with her fornication, and hath avenged the blood of his servants at her hand.
Rev19:3 And again they said, Alleluia.  And her smoke rose up for ever and ever.
Rev19:4 And the four and twenty elders and the four beasts fell down and worshipped God that sat on the throne, saying, Amen; Alleluia.
Rev19:5 And a voice came out of the throne, saying, Praise our God, all ye his servants, and ye that fear him, both small and great.
Rev19:6 And I heard as it were the voice of a great multitude, and as the voice of many waters, and as the voice of mighty thunderings, saying, Alleluia: for the Lord God omnipotent reigneth.
Rev19:7 Let us be glad and rejoice, and give honour to him: for the marriage of the Lamb is come, and his wife hath made herself ready.
Rev19:8 And to her was granted that she should be arrayed in fine linen, clean and white: for the fine linen is the righteousness of saints.
Rev19:9 And he saith unto me, Write, Blessed are they which are called unto the marriage supper of the Lamb. And he saith unto me, These are the true sayings of God.
Rev19:10 And I fell at his feet to worship him. And he said unto me, See thou do it not: I am thy fellowservant, and of thy brethren that have the testimony of Jesus: worship God: for the testimony of Jesus is the spirit of prophecy.
Rev19:11 And I saw heaven opened, and behold a white horse; and he that sat upon him was called Faithful and True, and in righteousness he doth judge and make war.
Rev19:12 His eyes were as a flame of fire, and on his head were many crowns; and he had a name written, that no man knew, but he himself.
Rev19:13 And he was clothed with a vesture dipped in blood: and his name is called The Word of God.
Rev19:14 And the armies which were in heaven followed him upon white horses, clothed in fine linen, white and clean.
Rev19:15 And out of his mouth goeth a sharp sword, that with it he should smite the nations: and he shall rule them with a rod of iron: and he treadeth the winepress of the fierceness and wrath of Almighty God.
Rev19:16 And he hath on his vesture and on his thigh a name written, KING OF KINGS, AND LORD OF LORDS.
Rev19:17 And I saw an angel standing in the sun; and he cried with a loud voice, saying to all the fowls that fly in the midst of heaven, Come and gather yourselves together unto the supper of the great God;
Rev19:18 That ye may eat the flesh of kings, and the flesh of captains, and the flesh of mighty men, and the flesh of horses, and of them that sit on them, and the flesh of all men, both free and bond, both small and great.
Rev19:19 And I saw the beast, and the kings of the earth, and their armies, gathered together to make war against him that sat on the horse, and against his army.
Rev19:20 And the beast was taken, and with him the false prophet that wrought miracles before him, with which he deceived them that had received the mark of the beast, and them that worshipped his image. These both were cast alive into a lake of fire burning with brimstone.
Rev19:21 And the remnant were slain with the sword of him that sat upon the horse, which sword proceeded out of his mouth: and all the fowls were filled with their flesh.
Rev20:1 And I saw an angel come down from heaven, having the key of the bottomless pit and a great chain in his hand.
Rev20:2 And he laid hold on the dragon, that old serpent, which is the Devil, and Satan, and bound him a thousand years,
Rev20:3 And cast him into the bottomless pit, and shut him up, and set a seal upon him, that he should deceive the nations no more, till the thousand years should be fulfilled: and after that he must be loosed a little season.
Rev20:4 And I saw thrones, and they sat upon them, and judgment was given unto them: and I saw the souls of them that were beheaded for the witness of Jesus, and for the word of God, and which had not worshipped the beast, neither his image, neither had received his mark upon their foreheads, or in their hands; and they lived and reigned with Christ a thousand years.
Rev20:5 But the rest of the dead lived not again until the thousand years were finished. This is the first resurrection.
Rev20:6 Blessed and holy is he that hath part in the first resurrection: on such the second death hath no power, but they shall be priests of God and of Christ, and shall reign with him a thousand years.
Rev20:7 And when the thousand years are expired, Satan shall be loosed out of his prison,
Rev20:8 And shall go out to deceive the nations which are in the four quarters of the earth, Gog and Magog, to gather them together to battle: the number of whom is as the sand of the sea.
Rev20:9 And they went up on the breadth of the earth, and compassed the camp of the saints about, and the beloved city: and fire came down from God out of heaven, and devoured them.
Rev20:10 And the devil that deceived them was cast into the lake of fire and brimstone, where the beast and the false prophet are, and shall be tormented day and night for ever and ever.
Rev20:11 And I saw a great white throne, and him that sat on it, from whose face the earth and the heaven fled away; and there was found no place for them.
Rev20:12 And I saw the dead, small and great, stand before God; and the books were opened: and another book was opened, which is the book of life: and the dead were judged out of those things which were written in the books, according to their works.
Rev20:13 And the sea gave up the dead which were in it; and death and hell delivered up the dead which were in them: and they were judged every man according to their works.
Rev20:14 And death and hell were cast into the lake of fire. This is the second death.
Rev20:15 And whosoever was not found written in the book of life was cast into the lake of fire.
Rev21:1 And I saw a new heaven and a new earth: for the first heaven and the first earth were passed away; and there was no more sea.
Rev21:2 And I John saw the holy city, new Jerusalem, coming down from God out of heaven, prepared as a bride adorned for her husband.
Rev21:3 And I heard a great voice out of heaven saying, Behold, the tabernacle of God is with men, and he will dwell with them, and they shall be his people, and God himself shall be with them, and be their God.
Rev21:4 And God shall wipe away all tears from their eyes; and there shall be no more death, neither sorrow, nor crying, neither shall there be any more pain: for the former things are passed away.
Rev21:5 And he that sat upon the throne said, Behold, I make all things new. And he said unto me, Write: for these words are true and faithful.
Rev21:6 And he said unto me, It is done. I am Alpha and Omega, the beginning and the end. I will give unto him that is athirst of the fountain of the water of life freely.
Rev21:7 He that overcometh shall inherit all things; and I will be his God, and he shall be my son.
Rev21:8 But the fearful, and unbelieving, and the abominable, and murderers, and whoremongers, and sorcerers, and idolaters, and all liars, shall have their part in the lake which burneth with fire and brimstone: which is the second death.
Rev21:9 And there came unto me one of the seven angels which had the seven vials full of the seven last plagues, and talked with me, saying, Come hither, I will shew thee the bride, the Lamb's wife.
Rev21:10 And he carried me away in the spirit to a great and high mountain, and shewed me that great city, the holy Jerusalem, descending out of heaven from God,
Rev21:11 Having the glory of God: and her light was like unto a stone most precious, even like a jasper stone, clear as crystal;
Rev21:12 And had a wall great and high, and had twelve gates, and at the gates twelve angels, and names written thereon, which are the names of the twelve tribes of the children of Israel:
Rev21:13 On the east three gates; on the north three gates; on the south three gates; and on the west three gates.
Rev21:14 And the wall of the city had twelve foundations, and in them the names of the twelve apostles of the Lamb.
Rev21:15 And he that talked with me had a golden reed to measure the city, and the gates thereof, and the wall thereof.
Rev21:16 And the